FISHING  SAFETY:  THE  POLICY  IMPLICATIONS  OF 

COOPERATIVES  AND  VESSEL  IMPROVEMENTS 

S.  HRG.  110–1221 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON OCEANS, ATMOSPHERE, 

FISHERIES, AND COAST GUARD 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

JULY  9,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

80–369 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2013 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  OCEANS,  ATMOSPHERE,  FISHERIES,  AND  COAST 

GUARD 

MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington,  Chairman 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine,  Ranking 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

Page 
1 
1 
1 

25 
27 

42 
44 

9 
11 
32 
34 

37 
39 

3 
5 

13 
14 

82 

60 
76 
54 
68 
72 
53 
57 

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on July 9, 2008 
Statement of Senator Cantwell 
Stevens, Hon. Ted, U.S. Senator from Alaska, prepared statement 

.................................................................................
..............................................................................
...................

WITNESSES 

Fishing Company of Alaska 

Bundy,  John,  President,  Glacier  Fish  Company  on  behalf  of  the  Freezer 
Longline Coalition  ................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Frulla,  David  E.,  Partner,  Kelley  Drye  &  Warren,  LLP,  on  behalf  of  the 
................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Hughes,  Leslie  J.,  Executive  Director,  North  Pacific  Fishing  Vessel  Owners’ 
Association (NPFVOA) Vessel Safety Program  .................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Hyde, Michael, Adviser, American Seafoods Group  ..............................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Parker,  Donna,  Director,  Government  Affairs,  Arctic  Storm  Management 
....................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Sanchirico, James, Associate Professor, Department of Environmental Science 
and  Policy,  University  of  California  at  Davis  and  University  Fellow,  Re-
sources for the Future 
.........................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Woodley,  Commander  Christopher,  Thirteenth  Coast  Guard  District  Staff, 
U.S. Coast Guard, Department of Homeland Security  .....................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Group 

APPENDIX 

Freezer Longline Coalition’s Response to David Frulla’s Testimony  ..................
Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Maria Cantwell to: 

John Bundy  .......................................................................................................
David E. Frulla  .................................................................................................
Leslie Hughes 
...................................................................................................
Michael Hyde  ....................................................................................................
Donna Parker  ....................................................................................................
James Sanchirico  ..............................................................................................
..................................................................
Commander Christopher Woodley 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

FISHING  SAFETY:  THE  POLICY 

IMPLICATIONS  OF  COOPERATIVES 

AND  VESSEL  IMPROVEMENTS 

WEDNESDAY,  JULY  9,  2008 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON OCEANS, ATMOSPHERE, FISHERIES, 
AND COAST GUARD, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The Subcommittee met, pursuant to notice, at 2:30 p.m., in room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Maria  Cantwell, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. MARIA CANTWELL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WASHINGTON 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Good  afternoon.  This  Senate  Committee  on 
Commerce, Science, and Transportation’s Subcommittee on Oceans, 
Atmosphere, Fisheries, and Coast Guard will come to order. 

We  thank  our  witnesses  for  being  here  and  for  your  indulgence 
for  not  starting  on  time  since  we  just  had  two  floor  votes.  We  ap-
preciate your patience with us. 

I  understand  my  colleague,  Senator  Stevens,  was  here  in  be-
tween  those  two  votes,  and  I  want  to  recognize  that  his  presence 
was here earlier and I am not sure if he will be returning. But we 
do have a statement for the record. I will make sure that we enter 
that statement in the record. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Stevens follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The Bering Sea and Aleutian island region off the coast of Alaska is home to the 
most productive and well managed fisheries in the world. We have no stocks subject 
to overfishing. 

However,  operating  in  this  region  does  not  come  without  its  risks.  Commercial 
fishing is one of the most dangerous occupations in the United States, with an occu-
pational  fatality  rate  that  is  35  times  higher  than  the  national  industry  average. 
In  recent  years  commercial  fishing  safety  has  improved  in  Alaska.  The  Coast 
Guard  attributes  improvements  in  fishing  vessel  safety  measures  with  saving  250 
lives  in  Alaskan  waters  since  1993.  In  1992,  36  fishermen  lost  their  lives  off  the 
coast  of  Alaska,  and  in  1994  this  number  dropped  to  8.  These  lives  were  saved  not 
only by vessel improvements but also by fishery management measures such as co-
operatives and individual fishing quotas, or IFQs. 

IFQs  and  cooperatives  have  been  enormously  beneficial  to  the  fishing  community 
in Alaska. They have helped to put an end to the ‘‘race for fish’’ and brought about 
significant conservation and safety benefits. 

However,  as  we  examine  the  proposals  today  we  must  ensure  that  the  needs  of 
Alaska’s  fishermen  and  Alaskan  coastal  communities  are  properly  addressed.  All 
stakeholders  must  be  consulted  through  an  open  process.  This  will  allow  us  to  pre-

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

2 

vent  loss  of  jobs  due  to  potential  fleet  consolidation  as  well  as  to  ensure  that  there 
are  no  negative  impacts  to  fisheries  outside  the  Bering  Sea  and  Aleutian  Islands. 

I thank the witnesses for testifying today and look forward to your testimony. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  We  are  here  today  for  a  hearing  on  fishing 
safety,  the  policy  implications  of  cooperatives  and  vessel  improve-
ments.  We  are  going  to  hear  from  Dr.  James  Sanchirico.  Is  that 
close?  Close  enough,  I  guess.  Ms.  Leslie  Hughes,  who  is  Executive 
Director  of  the  North  Pacific  Fishing  Vessel  Owners’  Association; 
and  Commander  Chris  Woodley,  Chief,  External  Affairs  Division 
from the U.S. Coast Guard. So thank you all for being here. 

I want to thank the staff and other Committee members’ staff for 
helping  us  with  this  Subcommittee  hearing  today  to  examine  fish-
ing safety and the policy implications of cooperatives and vessel im-
provements. 

Fishing  has  long  been  a  part  of  both  the  American  culture  and 
our Nation’s economic health. But the continued vitality of the fish-
ing  industry  faces  multiple  challenges.  Many  marine  species  are 
overexploited  and  face  threats  from  climate  change,  pollution,  and 
habitat  degradation.  Moreover,  commercial  fishing  is  deemed  as 
one  of  the  most  hazardous  occupations  in  the  United  States,  an 
issue  that  I  know  we  are  going  to  continue  to  explore  here  today. 
In  the  Pacific  Northwest,  our  history  is  based  on  rich  maritime 
tradition that contributes billions of dollars to the region’s economy 
each  year.  There  are  3,000  vessels  in  Washington’s  fishing  fleet 
that  employ  10,000  fishermen.  Seafood  processors  are  3,800  and 
fish wholesalers employ an additional 1,000. 

For  many  coastal  communities,  these  histories  and  economies 
have ebbed and flowed almost with our tide, and it is important for 
us  to  remember  that  these  ocean  resources  are  things  that  these 
communities  depend  on.  They  depend  on  the  public  trust  and  the 
resource to be managed appropriately. 

As  guardians  of  the  ocean  and  the  plentiful  resources,  it  is  nec-
essary that we examine the issues that are here today with the ut-
most  transparency.  We  are  here  today  to  talk  about  two  issues: 
what  improvements,  if  any,  need  to  be  made  to  the  10-year-old 
American  Fisheries  Act,  balancing  fleet  safety  and  economic  chal-
lenges; and the role of fishing cooperatives in improving safety and 
natural resource management. 

Safety  is  a  collective  responsibility,  from  the  individual  crew 
members  that  sail  in  the  open  waters  to  the  vessels  and  owners 
and  to  Government  policymakers.  When  we  grapple  with  these 
issues,  it  is  necessary  that  we  understand  the  gravity  and  the 
shared  responsibility.  It  is  a  responsibility  that  can  have  a  pro-
found impact on the lives of those who depend on this for their eco-
nomic  vitality,  and  it  is  important  that  we  continue  to  work  to-
gether to resolve these issues. 

On  March  23,  we  experienced  a  tragic  reminder  of  how  things 
can  go  wrong.  The  fishing  vessel,  Alaska  Ranger,  based  out  of  Se-
attle began sinking at approximately 2:50 a.m., and 43 crew mem-
bers  were  rescued  when  the  Coast  Guard  responded,  but  another 
five  of  the  vessel’s  crew,  including  Captain  Eric  Peter  Jacobsen, 
stayed  behind  to  ensure  the  rest  of  the  crew  escaped  safely.  These 
five  fishermen  did  not  make  it  out  of  the  harsh  waters  of  the  Ber-
ing Sea. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

3 

And  their  story  is  not  all  that  uncommon.  In  2006,  the  Coast 
Guard reported that in the decade from 1994 to 2004, 1,398 fishing 
vessels  were  lost.  Most  of  these  fishing  vessels  and  their  fatalities 
that  resulted  occurred  in  the  north  Pacific  where  the  fishermen 
from  my  home  state  of  Washington  make  their  living  and  where, 
obviously,  we  have  some  of  the  biggest  challenges  with  weather 
and  rough  waters.  When  things  go  wrong,  it  is  really  due  to  dev-
astating  failures  at  multiple  levels,  and  these  multiple  levels  re-
quire coordination between different people. 

Fishing  safety  is  not  only  about  vessels.  It  is  about  inspections, 
about  safety  equipment,  and  about  training.  In  fact,  fishing  safety 
is  closely  related  to  how  fisheries  are  managed  and  the  very  foun-
dation  that  fishing  has  come  to  be  built  on,  competition.  It  is  a 
tough business and a tough business for those who work the boats 
and  those  who  make  the  businesses  run  in  the  end.  It  is  a  tough 
business that is driven by incentives and dangerous conditions that 
work together to place a countless number of fishermen at risk. 

But  it  does  not  need  to  be  that  way.  Improvements  to  fishing 
safety  and  good  fishing  management  practice  can  and  should  be 
continued  to  be  pursued.  If  we  change  the  incentives,  we  change 
the  way  people  fish.  If  we  change  the  way  people  fish,  we  can  im-
prove the safety and prevent future tragedies at sea. 

As we discuss these issues today, safety for our vessels and fish-
ermen,  it  is  imperative  that  we  continue  to  have  an  open  process 
and to talk about policies and resource management that will help 
all of us be successful in this effort. 

I look forward to the testimony of our witnesses in exploring the 
benefits  and  challenges  of  utilizing  various  frameworks  for  better 
management of this resource. 

I look forward to continuing to dialogue with my colleagues here 
in  the  Senate  and  in  the  House  of  Representatives  on  various  pro-
posed  changes  in  these  areas  of  both  safety  and  fisheries  manage-
ment.  We  owe  it  to  our  coastal  communities  and  to  our  fishermen 
and  the  American  people  to  collectively  act  as  stewards  for  one  of 
our greatest resources, our oceans. 

And  with  that,  we  will  turn  it  over  to  our  panel  and  start  with 

Dr. James Sanchirico. Is that right? 
Dr. SANCHIRICO. It is Sanchirico. 
Senator CANTWELL. Sanchirico. Thank you. 
And if the witnesses could take 5 minutes for your testimony. We 
certainly will take information that is longer than that and you can 
submit  that  for  the  record.  But  welcome  and  thank  you  for  being 
here. 

STATEMENT OF JAMES SANCHIRICO, ASSOCIATE PROFESSOR, 
DEPARTMENT  OF  ENVIRONMENTAL  SCIENCE  AND  POLICY, 
UNIVERSITY  OF  CALIFORNIA  AT  DAVIS  AND  UNIVERSITY 
FELLOW, RESOURCES FOR THE FUTURE 
Dr. SANCHIRICO. Good afternoon, Chairman Cantwell, and thank 
you  for  the  opportunity  to  speak  with  you  today.  I  am  James 
Sanchirico,  Associate  Professor  at  the  University  of  California- 
Davis,  and  University  Fellow  at  Resources  for  the  Future.  The 
opinions  I  offer  today  are  my  own  and  should  not  be  attributed  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

4 

the  University  of  California,  Resources  for  the  Future,  or  the 
NOAA Science Advisory Board, of which I am a member. 

The  purpose  of  my  remarks  is  to  provide  a  brief  overview  of  the 
economic  benefits  of  cooperatives  and  individual  fishing  quota  sys-
tems for the management of marine commercial fisheries. 

As  the  Committee  is  fully  aware,  the  marine  species  residing  in 
U.S.  territorial  waters  and  the  men  and  women  who  make  their 
livelihood  from  them  are  at  a  critical  juncture.  Without  secure  ac-
cess  to  the  resource,  individual  rational  actors  compete  with  each 
other  to  capture  as  much  of  it  as  possible.  Operating  under  so- 
called  rule  of  capture  incentives  whereby  resources  are  not  owned 
until  on  board  a  vessel  results  in  a  competition  for  fish  that  leads 
to  low  wages,  dangerous  working  conditions,  low-valued  products, 
excess  harvesting  and  fish  processing  capacity,  and  ever  shorter 
fishing seasons. Economically depressed fisheries are vulnerable to 
short-term  thinking  and  risk  taking,  and  fishery  participants  can-
not afford to invest in long-term sustainability. 

This outcome is in nobody’s best interest. In other words, a trag-

edy of the commons ensues. 

Policies  that  address  the  rule  of  capture  incentives  include  indi-
vidual  fishing  quota  systems  and  cooperatives.  In  each  policy,  the 
allocation  of  a  catch  share  reduces  the  incentives  to  invest  in  the 
race for fish. Participants have greater certainty on their catch lev-
els  and  the  ability  to  buy  and  sell  shares  provides  flexibility  for 
participants to adjust the scale of their operations. 

Around  the  world,  fisheries  managed  with  individual  fishing 
quotas  or  cooperatives  experience  sustainable  profit  rates,  ranging 
from  20  to  60  percent.  These  overall  economic  benefits  are  indic-
ative  of  both  cost  savings  and  revenue  increases  and  derive  from 
two  aspects  of  the  programs.  First,  there  are  benefits  that  result 
directly  from  providing  ownership  of  the  catch  shares,  and  second, 
there  are  benefits  that  derive  from  the  ability  to  transfer  the 
shares from one fishing participant to another. 

The three main benefits from ownership include: the reduced in-
centive to race for fish which results in longer fishing seasons; and 
second,  the  slower  pace  of  fishing  improves  the  ability  to  optimize 
on-board  processing  facilities  that  has  resulted  in  increases  in  the 
product  recovery  rate  per  pound  of  fish  caught.  For  example,  the 
Pacific Whiting fishery has experienced increases in product recov-
ery  rate  from  17  to  24  percent,  and  according  to  one  statistic  that 
I found, this corresponds to approximately 10 million pounds of ad-
ditional product from the same catch. 

The  third  benefit  from  ownership  of  shares  is  that  it  shifts  the 
incentives  from  maximizing  the  quantity  of  fish  caught  to  maxi-
mizing the value of the catch. Throughout the world, we have seen 
shifts  in  the  product  mix  to  more  valuable  products,  whether  it  be 
in  the  New  Zealand  red  snapper  fishery  that  went  from  a  frozen 
product  to  selling  in  the  live  fish  market  in  Japan.  We  also  see 
changes in the type of fishing methods, timing, and location of fish-
ing, all with the goal of improving the quality and the value of the 
fish caught. 

The three main benefits that stem from the transferability of the 
shares  include:  one,  the  reduction  in  the  number  of  vessels  and 
fishing capacity. For example, after the first year in the implemen-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

5 

tation  of  the  Pollock  Cooperative,  only  16  out  of  the  20  vessels 
fished. In the Pacific Whiting Cooperative, only 6 out of the 10 ves-
sels fished. 

Transferability also provides greater flexibility for participants to 
match  quota  holdings  with  catches.  In  the  fisheries  I  have  looked 
at  around  the  world  that  are  operated  under  individual  fishing 
quota systems, we find that on average 30 to 40 percent of the TAC 
is being traded in any given year, which illustrates the importance 
and the economic value of allowing transferability. 

Finally,  transferability  provides  incentives  that  lead  to  the  total 
allowable catch being caught at the lowest possible costs, as higher- 
cost vessels find it more profitable to sell or trade their shares than 
to fish them. 

I  want  to  conclude  with  a  comment.  One  of  the  most  powerful 
forces  of  change  created  by  catch  share  programs  is  the  develop-
ment  of  a  constituency  whose  wealth  is  a  function  of  the  health  of 
the  marine  environment.  Wealth  creation  in  fisheries  will  lead  to 
improved stewardship, sustainability, and further innovation to in-
crease value. 

To  summarize,  in  many  fisheries,  stocks  are  overfished,  habitats 
are  degraded,  and  fishermen  are  scraping  by  from  one  season  to 
the next, and the public is receiving very little return from its ma-
rine assets. 

This does not have to be the case. There is a growing body of evi-
dence  that  management  tools,  such  as  cooperatives  and  individual 
fishing  quotas,  are  a  means  to  achieving  sustainable  marine  popu-
lations, fishing communities, and returns on our natural assets. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Sanchirico follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JAMES SANCHIRICO,  ASSOCIATE PROFESSOR,  DEPARTMENT 
OF ENVIRONMENTAL SCIENCE AND POLICY,  UNIVERSITY OF CALIFORNIA AT DAVIS 
AND UNIVERSITY FELLOW, RESOURCES FOR THE FUTURE 
Good  afternoon,  Chairman  Cantwell  and  Members  of  the  Committee  and  thank 
you for the opportunity to speak to you today. I am James Sanchirico, an Associate 
Professor  at  the  University  of  California  at  Davis  and  a  University  Fellow  at  Re-
sources  for  the  Future,  a  nonpartisan,  independent  research  organization  special-
izing in environment, energy, and natural resource issues. The opinions I offer today 
are my own and should not be attributed to the University of California, Resources 
for the Future, or the NOAA Science Advisory Board, of which I am a member. 

The purpose of my remarks is to provide a brief overview of the economic benefits 
of cooperatives and individual fishing quota systems for the management of marine 
commercial fisheries. 

I  use  the  vernacular  individual  fishing  quota  systems  (IFQs)  rather  than  dedi-
cated  access  privileges  (DAPs)  or  limited  access  privilege  programs  (LAPPs)  to  de-
scribe management (cap-and-trade) systems in which a share of the total annual al-
lowable catch is allocated to fishing participants. 

Before I begin to discuss specific types of benefits from implementing cooperatives 
and  IFQs,  it  is  instructive  to  provide  the  baseline  from  which  we  are  measuring 
these benefits. 

As  the  Committee  is  fully  aware,  the  marine  species  residing  in  U.S.  territorial 
waters and the men and women who make their livelihood from them are at a crit-
ical juncture. 

• Many species are overexploited and face additional threats from land-based pol-
lution,  habitat  damage,  and  climate  change.  Still  unknown  is  the  extent  to 
which  our  actions  affect  the  nature  of  food  webs  and  ecosystems,  with  con-
sequences yet to be determined. 
• The  vessels  and  fishing  power  of  many  U.S.  fisheries  exceed  levels  that  would 

maximize economic returns to society. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

6 

• Competition for fish leads to low wages, dangerous working conditions, and ever 
shorter  fishing  seasons.  Short  seasons  with  large  catches,  in  turn,  force  fish 
processors to invest in facilities that can handle large quantities but run at par-
tial capacity for most of the year, creating boom-and-bust cycles in local employ-
ment.  With  supply  gluts,  most  fish  are  processed  and  frozen,  even  though  con-
sumers seem to prefer fresh fish throughout the year. 

• Economically  depressed  fisheries  are  vulnerable  to  short-term  thinking  and 
risk-taking,  and  fishery  participants  cannot  afford  to  invest  in  long-term  sus-
tainability. 

These  conditions  are  not  fated,  however.  There  is  a  body  of  research  dating  back 
to  the  1950s  that  highlights  the  cause  of  these  symptoms.1 Without  secure  access 
to  the  resource,  individual  rational  actors  will  compete  with  each  other  to  capture 
as  much  of  it  as  possible.  Operating  under  so  called  ‘‘rule  of  capture’’  incentives, 
whereby  resources  are  not  ‘‘owned’’  until  onboard  a  vessel,  results  in  the  popular 
phrase,  ‘‘too  many  boats  chasing,  too  few  fish’’,  which  is  an  outcome  that  is  in  no-
body’s  best  interest.  In  other  words,  a  tragedy  of  the  commons  ensues.  I  would 
argue,  however,  that  the  problem  is  more  complicated  than  just  too  many  boats 
chasing  and  too  few  fish.  Rather,  our  marine  commercial  fisheries  are  better  de-
scribed as having too many boats, too much fishing power, too little wealth, too few 
top  predators,  too  much  habitat  damage,  too  much  human  and  capital  at  risk,  too 
few resources for monitoring and enforcement, and so on.2 

Policies  that  address  the  ‘‘rule  of  capture’’  incentives  include  IFQs  and  coopera-

tives. 

• IFQ  programs  are  analogous  to  other  cap-and-trade  programs,  such  as  the  sul-
fur  dioxide  allowance-trading  program.  They  limit  fishing  operations  by  setting 
a  total  allowable  catch  (TAC),  which  is  then  allocated  among  fishing  partici-
pants, typically based on historical catch. In most IFQ fisheries throughout the 
world, participants are able to trade their perpetual right to a share of the TAC 
and  their  annual  catch  equivalent.  The  initial  allocation  process  and  market 
rules  are  designed  and  implemented  by  the  Regional  Fishery  Management 
Councils. 

• Cooperatives,  such  as  the  Pacific  Whiting  Conservation  Cooperative,  the 
Montauk Tilefish Association, and the two in the North Pacific Pollock Fishery, 
are formed around a fishing sector that has received an allocation of the allow-
able catch and has a fixed set of participants. The allocation of the cooperative’s 
allowable  catch  to  each  member  along  with  any  trading  between  the  members 
is done through private negotiations and rules as outlined in their charter. 

While  each  policy  is  slightly  different  from  an  instrument  design  perspective  and 
the respective roles of government intervention, the key point is that both treat the 
cause  rather  than  the  symptoms  of  insecure  rights  to  our  marine  resources.3 That 
is, the allocation of shares of the TAC reduces the incentives to race for fish, as par-
ticipants have greater certainty about their catch levels, and the ability to buy and 
sell shares provides flexibility for participants to adjust the scale of their operations. 
After  discussing  the  overall  economic  benefits,  I  divide  up  the  discussion  of  the 
societal  benefits  from  these  instruments  into  the  gains  from  ownership  of  a  share 
and the gains from trading the shares. I also provide examples of those gains being 
realized.  Because  there  are  virtually  no  differences  between  a  cooperative  and  an 
IFQ-managed  fishery  along  these  two  dimensions,  I  will  not  make  a  distinction  be-
tween the benefits arising from a cooperative or IFQ fishery. 
Overall Economic Benefits 

• Between  1990  and  2003,  the  value  of  IFQ  fisheries  in  New  Zealand  (NZ)  more 

than doubled, while at the same time fish stocks were rebuilding.4 

1 See,  for  example,  H.  Scott  Gordon,  Economic  Theory  of  a  Common  Property  Resource:  The 
Fishery,  75  JOURNAL OF POLITICAL ECONOMY 124  (1954);  Garrett  Hardin,  The  Tragedy  of  the 
Commons, 162 SCIENCE 1243 (1968); and James Sanchirico and Susan Hanna, Navigating U.S. 
Fishery Policy into the 21st Century, 19 MARINE RESOURCE ECONOMICS 395 (2004). 

2 For a historical perspective on how the U.S. arrived at the current state of our marine fish-
eries,  see  J.  N.  Sanchirico  and  J.  E.  Wilen.  Global  Marine  Fishery  Resources:  Status  and  Pro-
spectus. INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF GLOBAL ENVIRONMENTAL ISSUES. Vol. 7, No. 2/3 (2007). 

3 See,  for  example,  James  E.  Wilen,  Why  Fisheries  Management  Fails:  Treating  Symptoms 

Rather Than Causes, 78 BULLETIN OF MARINE SCIENCE 529 (2006). 

4 See, R. Newell, K. Papps, and J. N. Sanchirico. Asset Pricing in Created Markets for Fishing 
Quota.  AMERICAN JOURNAL OF AGRICULTURAL ECONOMICS.  Vol.  89  No.  2  (2007);  Newell,  R.,  J. 
N.  Sanchirico,  and  S.  Kerr.  Fishing  Quota  Markets,  J.  OF ENVIRON.  ECONOMIC.  MANAGEMENT, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

7 

• The profit rate for 33 of NZ IFQ fisheries between 1990 and 2003 was estimated 
to be 20 percent, with significant variation between fish stocks, where high-val-
ued  stocks  experienced  greater  rates  than  low-valued  stocks,  everything  else 
being equal.5 

• Icelandic IFQ fisheries were estimated to yield a profit rate of 25 percent.6 
• The  British  Columbia  (BC)  Pacific  Halibut  Fishery  is  estimated  to  have  profit 

rates on the order of 60 percent.7 

• In  fisheries  without  sufficient  economic  data  to  measure  profit  changes,  total 

revenues of fisheries under an IFQ or cooperative have more than doubled.8 

• In NZ IFQ fisheries, approximately 30 percent of the cost of monitoring and en-

forcing, including scientific research, is funded by the quota owners. 

Benefits of ownership of the catch shares include: 

• Reduced incentive to race for fish, resulting in longer seasons 

» In the BC Halibut Fishery, the season length went from 10 days the year be-

fore the implementation of the IFQ (1990) to 260 days the year after.9 

» In the U.S. Pacific Halibut fishery the season length prior to implementation 
of the IFQ (1994) averaged 2–3 days. After implementation, the season length 
increased to an average of 245 days. 

» The  season  length  went  from  75  days  in  1998  to  149  days  in  1999  after  the 
creation  of  the  cooperatives  in  the  North  Pacific  Pollock  fishery,  even  though 
the  offshore  sector  had  a  reduction  in  their  allocation  of  the  TAC.  A  similar 
result occurred in the Pacific Whiting Cooperative.10 

• Slowed pace of fishing, improving the ability to optimize onboard processing fa-
cilities,  resulting  in  increases  in  the  product  recovery  rate  per  pound  of  fish 
caught 
» The  Pacific  Whiting  Cooperative  experienced  increases  in  product  recovery 
from 17 percent to 24 percent, which corresponds to approximately 10 million 
more pounds of seafood from the same catch.11 

» North Pacific Pollock Cooperatives product recovery rate went from 19 percent 

in 1998 to 30 percent in 2007.12 

• Incentives shifted from maximizing the quantity of fish caught to maximizing the 

value of the catch. 
» The product mix shifts to more valuable products, which results in higher net 

value per pound of fish caught. 

•  Since the creation of the cooperatives in the Pacific Pollock fishery, the 
share of catch going to produce fillets has increased.13 The shift to high-
er-valued end products was also evident in the Pacific Whiting Coopera-
tive. 

Vol. 49 No. 3 (2005); J. N. Sanchirico and R. Newell. Catching Market Efficiencies: Quota-based 
Fishery Management, RESOURCES, No. 150, Spring (2003). 

5 NEWELL ET AL. supra note 4. 
6 R.  Arnason.  The  Icelandic  Individual  Transferable  Quota  System:  A  descriptive  account.’’ 

MARINE RESOURCE ECONOMICS Vol. 8, No. 3 (1993). 

7 James E. Wilen. Property Rights and the Texture of Rents in Fisheries in Evolving Property 
Rights in Marine Fisheries (ed. D. Leal). Rowman and Littlefield Publishers. Oxford. UK (2005). 
8 Redstone  Strategy  Group  and  Environmental  Defense  Fund.  Assessing  the  potential  for 
LAPPs  in  U.S.  Fisheries.  (2007)  (Available  at  http://www.redstonestrategy.com/documents/ 
2007–03–26%20Assessing%20the%20Potential%20for%20LAPPs%20in%20US%20Fisheries.pdf) 

9 M.  Herrmann.  Estimating  the  induced  price  increase  for  Canadian  Pacific  halibut  with  the 
introduction of the individual vessel quota program. CANADIAN JOURNAL OF AGRICULTURAL ECO-
NOMICS Vol. 44 No. 2 (1996). 

10 R. Townsend. Producer Organizations and Agreements in Fisheries: Integrating Regulation 
and  Coasean  Bargaining  in  Rents  in  Fisheries  in  Evolving  Property  Rights  in  Marine  Fisheries 
(ed. D. Leal). Rowman and Littlefield Publishers. Oxford. UK (2005). 

11 G. Sylvia, H. Munro Mann, and C. Pugmire. Achievements of the Pacific whiting conserva-
tion cooperative: rational collaboration in a sea of irrational competition in Case Studies in Fish-
eries  Self-goverance  (Eds.  R.  Townsend,  R.  Shotton,  and  H.  Uchida)  FAO  FISHERIES TECHNICAL 
PAPER No. 504. Rome, FAO. 2008. 

12 Pollock  Conservation  Cooperative  and  High  Seas  Catchers’  Cooperative  Final  Joint  Annual 

Report 2006 to the North Pacific Fishery Management Council, January 31, 2007. 

13 Id. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

8 

live fish market in Japan.14 

•  The NZ Red Snapper fishery moved from mainly a frozen product to the 
•  In  the  BC  Halibut  fishery,  fresh  product  increased  from  42  percent  of 
•  Iceland’s  demersal  fisheries  experienced  total  revenue  increases  of  $6 

the catch to over 90 percent after implementation.15 

million in 1984 due to higher quality fish.16 

» Changes to the types of fishing methods (gear), timing, and location of fishing 

improve the quality and value of the fish caught 

•  A  skipper  in  Canada’s  fishing  quota  system  is  quoted  as  saying  how 
participants have the opportunity to fish when prices are high or ‘‘work 
the market more.’’ 17 
•  Surveys  of  Canadian  fish  processors  working  with  the  BC  Halibut 
fishermen  support  this  statement.  For  example,  they  noted  that 
fishermen  were  calling  in  to  find  out  the  expected  price  of  fish  be-
fore heading out to sea.18 

prices were traditionally higher.19 

•  NZ fishermen reported shifting fishing trips to later in the season when 
•  North  Pacific  Pollock  fishermen  report  being  able  to  better  target  fe-
•  NZ fisheries experienced changes from trawl or seining to long-lining or 
gill  netting  to  improve  on-board  handling  and  quality  of  the  caught 
fish.21 

males during the roe season.20 

Benefits of the transferability of the catch shares include: 

• Reduced number of vessels and fishing capacity. 

» In the first year after the implementation of the Pollock Cooperative, only 16 
out of the 20 vessels fished; only 6 out of 10 fished in the Pacific Whiting fish-
ery post-implementation of the cooperative.22 

» New Zealand fisheries have seen a reduction in quota owners on the order of 
35  percent  since  the  program’s  inception  in  1986.  As  of  2003,  the  majority  of 
the reductions were in mid-size firms.23 

» The  Mid-Atlantic  Surf  Clam  and  Ocean  Quahog  fishery  has  seen  over  a  54 
• Greater  flexibility  provided  for  participants  to  match  quota  holdings  with 

percent decline in the number of vessels.24 

catches. 
» The  Pacific  Whiting  Cooperative  reported  lower  rates  of  bycatch  post  imple-
mentation.25 Whether the reduction is due to the formation of the cooperative, 
however, is not clear as the other non-coop sectors have also seen a decline.26 
» Annual  trades  or  leases  of  catches  for  the  median  fish  stock  are  on  the  order 
of  40  percent  of  the  total  allowable  catch  in  New  Zealand,  30  percent  in  Ice-
land, and 40 percent in South East Australian trawl IFQ fisheries.27 
• Incentives  provided  that  lead  to  the  TAC  being  caught  at  the  lowest  possible 
costs, as higher-costs (less efficient) vessels find it more profitable to sell or trade 
their shares than to fish them. 
» Unfortunately,  the  fact  that  very  little  economic  data  and  even  less  data  on 
the  costs  of  fishing  in  IFQ  and  cooperative  fisheries  exist  precludes  me  from 

14 R. Boyd and C. Dewees. Putting theory into practice: individual transferable quotas in New 

Zealand’s fisheries. SOCIETY & NATURAL RESOURCES Vol. 5, no. 2 (1992). 

15 K. E. Casey et. al. The Effects of Individual Vessel Quotas in the British Columbia Halibut 

Fishery. MARINE RESOURCE ECONOMICS Vol. 10 no. 3 (1995); HERRMANN supra note 9. 

16 ARNASON supra note 6. 
17 Knudson,  T.  2003.  ‘‘Harvesting  the  Sea’’  Sacramento  Bee  (available  online  at  http:// 

www.sacbee.com/static/live/news/projects/denial/) 

18 CASEY ET AL.  supra  note  15. 
19 BOYD AND DEWEES, supra note 14. 
20 WILEN, supra note 7. 
21 BOYD AND DEWEES, supra note 14. 
22&& Townsend, supra note 10. 
23 J. N. Sanchirico and R. Newell. Analysis of Concentration and Consolidation in NZ Fishing 

Quota Markets: A REPORT TO THE NEW ZEALAND MINISTRY OF FISHERIES, June 2003. 

24 S. Wang. The Surf Clam ITQ Management: AN EVALUATION. MARINE RESOURCE ECONOMICS 

Vol. 10, No. 1 (1995). 

25 TOWNSEND, supra note 10. 
26 SYLVIA, supra note 11. 
27 J.  N.  Sanchirico,  D.  Holland,  K.  Quigley,  and  M.  Fina.  Catch-quota  balancing  in  Multispe-

cies Individual Fishing Quotas. MARINE POLICY Vol. 30 No. 6 (2006). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

9 

providing  examples  on  the  realized  costs  savings,  although  the  substantial 
values of quotas are indicative of both cost savings and revenue increases. 

» There are, however, some ex ante predicted estimates of the potential cost re-
ductions,  which  are  on  the  order  of  50  percent  of  total  revenues  in  the  Mid- 
Atlantic  surf  clam  and  ocean  quahog  IFQ  and  cost  reductions  ($8  million) 
greater  than  two  times  the  potential  revenue  gains  ($3  million)  for  1993  in 
the Gulf of Mexico Red Snapper fishery.28 

One  of  the  most  powerful  forces  of  change  created  by  catch-share  programs  is  a 
constituency  whose  wealth  is  a  function  of  the  health  of  the  marine  environment. 
In  an  IFQ  fishery,  the  asset  value  from  owning  quota  in  perpetuity  provides  incen-
tives  to  invest  in  the  long-term  sustainability  of  the  fishery  and  the  income  to  the 
members of the cooperative provides similar incentives.29 For example, Iceland Cod 
quota  owners  lobbied  the  government  to  create  no-take  marine  reserves  off  of  the 
northern coast of Iceland to protect spawning areas; New Zealand quota owners in-
vest  in  scientific  and  value-added  research,  and  have  voluntarily  shifted  fishing  ef-
forts away from spawning areas. 

Wealth creation will lead to improved stewardship, sustainability, and further in-

novation to increase value.30 

To  summarize,  in  many  fisheries,  stocks  are  overfished,  habitats  are  degraded, 
fishermen  are  scraping  by  from  one  season  to  the  next,  and  the  public  is  receiving 
very little return from its marine assets. 

This does not have to be the case. We have a large and growing body of evidence 
that  management  tools,  such  as  cooperatives  and  individual  fishing  quotas,  are  a 
means  to  achieving  sustainable  marine  populations,  fishing  communities,  and  re-
turns on our natural assets. 

Thank you. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you very much. 
Ms. Hughes, thank you for being here. 

STATEMENT  OF  LESLIE  J.  HUGHES,  EXECUTIVE  DIRECTOR, 
NORTH  PACIFIC  FISHING  VESSEL  OWNERS’  ASSOCIATION 
VESSEL SAFETY PROGRAM 
Ms. HUGHES. Good afternoon, Madam Chairman. Thank you very 
much  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  on  fishing  vessel  safety  today. 
I  am  Leslie  Hughes,  the  Executive  Director  of  the  North  Pacific 
Fishing  Vessel  Owners’  Association,  or  NPFVOA,  Vessel  Safety 
Program, a nonprofit organization totally dedicated to safety train-
ing  and  education  of  commercial  fishermen.  I  have  worked  in  the 
fishing  industry  for  33  years  and  23  of  those  have  been  with 
NPFVOA  since  its  inception.  I  have  served  10  years  on  the  Coast 
Guard’s  commercial  Fishing  Industry  Vessel  Safety  Advisory  Com-
mittee and have recently been reappointed for another 3-year term. 
The  vessel  safety  program  was  developed  in  1985  in  cooperation 
with  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  as  a  voluntary  effort  to  improve  the 
poor safety record of the fishing industry in the North Pacific. The 
success  of  the  program  is  evidenced  by  attendance  in  our  courses, 
which now exceeds 34,000, and of that, 70 percent is voluntary and 
not  required  by  the  Coast  Guard,  which  speaks  very  well  for  the 
industry.  It  is  regarded  by  the  Coast  Guard  as  the  model  safety 
training program for our country. 

28 Q.  Weninger.  Assessing  efficiency  gains  from  individual  transferable  quotas:  an  application 
to  the  Mid-Atlantic  surf  clam  and  ocean  quahog  fishery.  AMERICAN JOURNAL OF AGRICULTURAL 
ECONOMICS Vol.  80  No.  4  (1998);  Q.  Weninger  and  J.  R.  Waters.  Economic  benefits  of  manage-
ment reform in the northern Gulf of Mexico reef fish Fishery, JOURNAL OF ENVIRONMENTAL ECO-
NOMICS AND MANAGEMENT Vol. 46, No. 2 (2003). 

29 While the same incentives exist under both policies, they are arguably not as strong under 
a  cooperative,  as  there  is  less  long-term  certainty.  See,  for  example,  the  discussion  in  SYLVIA 
supra note 11 regarding the issues with respect to the Pacific Whiting cooperative. 

30 WILEN, supra note 3. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

10 

Our program has a regional focus, is part of the community, and 
is  very  integrated  into  the  fishing  industry.  Our  program  is  ‘‘by 
fishermen  for  fishermen,’’  and  our  membership  base  of  more  than 
200  vessels  represents  a  broad  range  of  gear  types  and  approxi-
mately  150  support  businesses  and  individuals.  Having  a  vessel 
membership  is  extremely  important  because  it  further  builds  com-
munity involvement, helps to create a safety culture, and funds the 
program. 

NPFVOA  serves  a  very  diverse  fleet  that  home-ports  in  Seattle 
and  operates  primarily  in  Alaska.  The  Seattle-based  vessels  ac-
count  for  about  85  percent  of  the  catch  in  Alaska,  which  equates 
to about 50 percent of the Nation’s entire seafood harvest. 

Our  main  interaction  with  this  industry  is  through  safety  train-
ing, which we regard as a key component of safety and unquestion-
ably  a  key  factor  in  the  prevention  of  casualties  and  improved 
emergency response. Other key factors are professional crews, well- 
constructed  and  maintained  vessels,  Coast  Guard  regulations  and 
oversight, and how fisheries are managed. 

And  I  would  now  like  to  address  several  management  schemes 
on  which  this  hearing  is  focusing,  the  first  being  the  AFA  vessel 
replacement. 

The AFA has by most measures been an extremely good piece of 
legislation  as,  in  part,  it  has  established  a  well-reasoned  rational-
ized  fishery  management  program  for  our  Nation’s  largest  fishery, 
Bering Sea pollock. Its shortcoming is that it precludes vessel own-
ers  the  ability  to  replace  AFA-qualified  vessels  that  could  become 
worn out and increasingly unsafe over time. Under current law, to 
be  replaced,  a  vessel  must  be  a  total  constructive  loss.  This  is  an 
unreasonable  predicament  that  badly  needs  to  have  the  language 
amended  so  that  vessel  owners  can  replace  aging  vessels  that  be-
come unsafe with new and modern vessels. 

Others  here  can  address  replacement  language  details,  but  the 
need is clear. Most of the Bering Sea pollock trawlers, for instance, 
were  built  in  the  1970s  and  1980s  with  a  hull  life  expectancy  of 
about 30 years. So corrective actions now are extremely timely. 

Second,  rationalized  fishery  management  and  vessel  safety. 
Rationalized  fishery  management  programs  off  Alaska  now  exist 
for  halibut,  sablefish,  Bering  Sea/Aleutian  pollock,  Bering  Sea/ 
Aleutian  king,  Tanner,  and  snow  crab  and  for  the  Amendment  80 
groundfish  trawl  fleet.  These  fisheries  are  managed  by  either  co- 
ops  or  IFQ’s.  These  management  programs  are  similar  in  many 
ways  and  they  share  common  advantages  to  vessel  operations  and 
vessel  safety.  Harvest  quotas  are  allocated  to  co-op  members  or  to 
individual owners for their exclusive usage during an extended sea-
son,  which  result  in  the  following  benefits.  Vessels  can  plan  for 
their season and conduct their fishing of their quota during reason-
able  weather  at  a  reasonable  pace  to  be  safe  and  maximize  eco-
nomic returns, fleet consolidations, especially in the more overcapi-
talized fisheries, and improved economic viability for the active ves-
sels. 

Example.  The  notoriously  dangerous  crab  fishery  sustained  an 
average  of  eight  fatalities  per  year  in  the  1990s,  but  in  the  past  3 
years  under  IFQ’s,  there  have  been  zero  fatalities  and  no  search 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

11 

and  rescue  missions  on  vessels  participating  in  rationalized  crab 
fisheries. 

And last, the Freezer Longline Cooperative. Thirty-two of the 36 
vessels  in  the  Freezer  Longline  fleet  are  active  members  of 
NPFVOA.  Thirty-four  of  the  36  are  members  of  the  Freezer 
Longline  Coalition  that  are  asking  Congress  to  be  allowed  to  form 
a co-op. The NPFVOA strongly supports the Freezer Longline Coa-
lition’s ability to form a co-op which I believe will promote safer op-
erations, minimize loss of life and vessel casualties, and improve ef-
ficiencies. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Hughes follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF LESLIE J. HUGHES, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, NORTH PACIFIC 

FISHING VESSEL OWNERS’ ASSOCIATION (NPFVOA) VESSEL SAFETY PROGRAM 

Thank you, Madame Chairwoman and Members of the Subcommittee, for the op-

portunity to testify today at this important hearing on fishing vessel safety. 

I am Leslie Hughes, Executive Director of the North Pacific Fishing Vessel Own-
ers’  Association  (NPFVOA)  Vessel  Safety  Program,  a  non-profit  association  totally 
dedicated  to  safety  training  and  education  of  commercial  fishermen.  Our  facility  is 
located  in  Seattle.  I  have  worked  for  NPFVOA  since  the  inception  of  the  Vessel 
Safety  Program  23  years  ago,  and  prior  to  that  I  worked  for  a  leading  Northwest 
naval architect and maritime law firm. During my career I have worked closely with 
many governmental agencies and served 10 years on the Coast Guard’s commercial 
Fishing  Industry  Vessel  Safety  Advisory  Committee  (CFIVSAC).  I  was  recently  re- 
appointed to that committee for another three-year term. 
The Vessel Safety Program 

The  NPFVOA  Vessel  Safety  Program  was  developed  in  1985  in  cooperation  with 
the U.S. Coast Guard as a voluntary effort to improve the poor safety record of the 
commercial  fishing  industry  in  the  North  Pacific.  Since  the  mid-1980s,  I  have  seen 
significant improvements in safety practices within the industry. The success of our 
program  is  evidenced  by  attendance  in  NPFVOA’s  Coast  Guard-approved  safety 
training  courses,  which  now  exceeds  34,000,  and  of  which  70  percent  is  voluntary 
and not required by the Coast Guard. 

It  is  extremely  important  that  a  program  like  this  is  built  upon  a  cooperative  ef-
fort  between  industry  and  the  Coast  Guard.  Our  program  has  a  regional  focus,  is 
part  of  the  community,  and  is  very  integrated  into  the  fishing  industry.  We  main-
tain  that  our  program  is  ‘‘by  fishermen  for  fishermen.’’  We  raise  funds  to  support 
NPFVOA  mostly  by  vessel  dues  for  membership,  by  class  fees  and  by  charging  for 
educational safety materials we have developed. Having a vessel membership is ex-
tremely  important  as  it  further  builds  community  involvement,  and  helps  to  create 
a  ‘‘safety  culture.’’  NPFVOA’s  membership  base  is  comprised  of  more  than  200  ves-
sels, representing a broad range of gear types, and approximately 150 support busi-
nesses and individuals. 

Although  NPFVOA’s  Vessel  Safety  Program  is  portable,  it  has  been  and  remains 
focused on a very diverse and dynamic fleet that home ports in the Seattle area and 
operates  primarily  in  Alaska.  Seattle-area  fishing  vessels  account  for  about  85  per-
cent  of  the  catch  in  Alaska,  which  equates  to  approximately  55  percent  of  the  Na-
tion’s  entire  seafood  harvest.  The  fleet  ranges  from  32  ft  gill  net  vessels  operated 
by  crews  of  one  or  two  people  to  350  ft  factory  trawlers  with  crews  of  more  than 
120 people with diverse jobs and skills. NPFVOA’s primary interaction with this in-
dustry  is  through  safety  training,  which  we  regard  as  a  key  component  of  safety. 
It  has  unquestionably  been  a  vital  factor  in  improving  how  casualties  can  be  pre-
vented, and how people respond if faced with an emergency. 

Other  key  factors  to  the  safety  of  our  fishing  fleets  are  professional  crews,  well 
constructed  and  maintained  vessels,  Coast  Guard  regulations  and  oversight,  and 
how  fisheries  are  managed.  The  Fishing  Vessel  Safety  Act  of  1988  implemented  by 
the Coast Guard in 1991 emphasized response capabilities, with much less emphasis 
on  preventative  measures.  Some  regional  Coast  Guard  oversight  actions  and 
changes to how certain fisheries are managed have contributed significantly to pre-
vention of casualties. 

I  would  now  like  to  address  several  management  schemes  on  which  this  hearing 

is focusing: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

12 

American Fisheries Act (AFA) Vessel Replacement 

The American Fisheries Act (AFA) has by most measures been an extremely good 
piece of legislation, as in part, it has established a well reasoned ‘‘rationalized fish-
ery management program’’ for our Nation’s largest fishery—Bering Sea pollock. The 
shortcoming of this act is that it precludes vessel owners the ability to replace AFA 
qualified  vessels  that  could  become  worn  out  and  increasingly  unsafe  over  time. 
Under  current  law,  to  be  replaced,  a  vessel  must  be  a  total  constructive  loss.  This 
is an unreasonable predicament that badly needs to have the language amended so 
that vessel owners can replace aging vessels that become unsafe with new and mod-
ern vessels. Others on this and the next panel are better qualified than I to discuss 
replacement  language  details  but  the  need  is  clear.  Most  of  the  Bering  Sea  pollock 
trawlers  were  built  in  the  1970s–1980s  with  hull  life  expectancy  of  25–30  years. 
Corrective actions are now extremely timely. 
Rationalized Fishery Management and Vessel Safety 

Open  access  fishery  management  regimes  influence  safety  because  they  establish 
the  rules  by  which  fishermen  compete  against  one  another.  Under  the  right  condi-
tions, these regimes create latent unsafe conditions in the form of a highly competi-
tive  economic  operating  environment  where  fishermen  are  likely  to  significantly  in-
crease  risk-taking  behaviors.  These  behaviors  include  vessel  overloading,  operating 
with minimal or no rest, and intentionally operating in hazardous weather in order 
to  maximize  catch  and  improve  economic  gain.  Rationalized  fishery  management 
has  the  potential  to  positively  impact  safety  by  removing  the  economic  necessity  of 
these risk-taking behaviors. 

Rationalized  fishery  management  programs  off  Alaska  now  exist  for  halibut,  sa-
blefish,  Bering  Sea/Aleutian  pollock,  Bering  Sea/Aleutian  king,  Tanner  and  snow 
crab  and  for  the  Amendment  80  ground  fish  trawl  fleet  or  by  individual  fishing 
quotas  (halibut,  sablefish  and  crab).  These  management  programs  are  similar  in 
many ways and they share common advantages to vessel operations and vessel safe-
ty. Harvest quotas are allocated to cooperative members or to individual vessel own-
ers for their exclusive usage during an extended season. In practice, this means that 
vessels can plan for their season, and they can conduct their fishing, of their quota, 
during  reasonable  weather  at  a  reasonable  pace  to  be  safe  and  maximize  economic 
returns. Additional benefits under a quota-based system include fleet consolidations, 
especially in the more over-capitalized fisheries, and improved economic viability for 
the active vessels. 

I will offer one example of positive results—the notoriously dangerous Bering Sea/ 
Aleutian  king,  Tanner  and  snow  crab  fishery.  In  the  decade  of  the  1990s,  prior  to 
rationalization, these crab fisheries sustained an average of eight fatalities per year. 
In the past 3 years under new Individualized Fishing Quotas (IFQ’s) fisheries man-
agement,  there  have  been  zero  fatalities  and  no  Coast  Guard  Search  and  Rescue 
missions on vessels participating in rationalized crab fisheries. 
Freezer Longline Cooperative 

Thirty-two  of  the  36  vessels  in  the  freezer  longline  fleet  are  active  members  of 
the NPFVOA Vessel Safety Program. Thirty-four of the 36 vessels (94.4 percent) are 
members  of  the  Freezer  Longline  Coalition  that  are  asking  Congress  to  be  allowed 
to  form  a  cooperative.  The  NPFVOA  strongly  supports  the  Freezer  Longline  Coali-
tion’s  ability  to  form  a  cooperative,  which  I  believe  will  promote  safer  operations, 
minimize loss of lives and vessel casualties, and improve efficiencies. 

To conclude, speaking for the Pacific Northwest and Alaska, there is no doubt that 
significant  improvements  to  safety  have  occurred  since  the  mid-1980s  when  the 
NPFVOA  Vessel  Safety  Program  was  established.  The  National  institute  of  Safety 
and  Health  (NIOSH)  reports  there  has  been  a  51  percent  decline  in  fatality  rates 
among  commercial  fishermen  in  Alaska  from  1990  to  2006.  I  believe  such  statistics 
are  attributable  to  the  safety  training  infrastructure  that  exists  in  our  region,  the 
proactive  safety  efforts  by  our  fishermen,  and  the  rationalized  fishery  management 
systems that have been put in place. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  today  on  behalf  of  the  NPFVOA  Vessel 

Safety Program, and for holding this important hearing. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you. 
Commander Woodley, thank you very much for being here. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

13 

STATEMENT  OF  COMMANDER  CHRISTOPHER  WOODLEY, 
THIRTEENTH  COAST  GUARD  DISTRICT  STAFF,  U.S.  COAST 
GUARD, DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY 
Commander  WOODLEY.  Thank  you,  Madam  Chair,  for  the  oppor-
tunity  to  testify  today.  I  am  Commander  Chris  Woodley  from  the 
Thirteenth Coast Guard District in Seattle. 

Today  I  will  provide  testimony  regarding  the  safety  performance 
of  cooperative  and  quota-based  fishery  regimes,  how  such  regimes 
may  affect  the  freezer  longline  fleet  of  the  Bering  Sea/Aleutian  Is-
lands,  and  will  then  briefly  discuss  the  safety  implications  of  the 
vessel  replacement  limitations  as  found  in  the  American  Fisheries 
Act. 

While  the  Coast  Guard  has  long  recognized  potential  safety  con-
cerns associated with open access fisheries and the attendant prob-
lems  caused  by  the  race  to  fish,  we  as  an  agency  historically  have 
been reluctant to support or oppose quota cooperative fishery man-
agement  programs  primarily  because  of  the  associated  allocative 
controversies associated with those programs. 

In the past 15 years, however, the North Pacific Fishery Manage-
ment  Council  has  implemented  such  programs  for  four  major  fish-
eries  in  the  Bering  Sea/Aleutian  Island  management  areas.  There 
has  been  sufficient  passage  of  time  for  researchers  to  objectively 
and  scientifically  evaluate  the  safety  performance  in  the  halibut 
and  sablefish  IFQ  fishery,  the  Bering  Sea/Aleutian  Island  pollock 
catcher/processor  cooperative,  and  the  rationalized  Bearing  Sea/ 
Aleutian  Island  king  and  Tanner  crab  fisheries.  The  safety  per-
formance  for  each  of  these  fisheries  was  evaluated  using  specific 
metrics before and after implementation of quota-based or coopera-
tive fishery programs. A summary of this research is as follows. 

Researchers found that quota-based and cooperative fishery man-
agement  regimes  have  a  strong  potential  to  improve  safety  over 
open  access  fisheries.  What  is  of  note  is  that  the  improvements 
were  operational  and  behavioral  in  nature  and  they  are  not  easily 
achieved  by  the  Coast  Guard’s  limited  legislative  authority  over 
commercial fishing vessels and their crews. 

Within each of the fisheries researched, we found that the fishing 
season  lengths  had  increased,  reducing  pressure  to  take  shortcuts 
on  safety  and  allowing  vessel  masters  the  ability  to  avoid  fishing 
in  poor  weather.  Furthermore,  more  fishing  days  provided  stable 
employment  opportunities  for  full-time  professional  crews,  and  an-
other  improvement  noted  was  that  the  fisheries  proceeded  at  a 
slower  pace,  which  resulted  in  reduced  fatigue  for  crew  members 
and higher quality product. 

Fishery-specific  safety  improvements  are  as  follows.  In  the  Alas-
ka halibut and sablefish fishery, there were measurable declines in 
the  fatality  rates  and  search  and  rescue  rates  after  the  implemen-
tation of the IFQ system in 1995. In the king and Tanner crab fish-
ery,  vessels  were  found  to  carry  fewer  pots,  reducing  overloading 
and  capsizing  lists,  and  most  importantly,  there  have  been  no  fa-
talities, no vessel losses, and no search and rescue cases conducted 
by  the  Coast  Guard  since  the  implementation  of  the  crab  rational-
ization program. 

Based  upon  the  record  of  safety  improvements  documented  in 
other  fleets,  formation  of  the  Freezer  Longline  Cooperative  could 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

14 

potentially  lead  to  slower  fishing  and  processing  pace,  increased 
fishing  days,  flexibility  to  allow  operators  to  avoid  severe  weather, 
reduced  fatigue  among  crew  members,  a  more  experienced  profes-
sional  crew,  and  finally  reduced  pressure  to  fish  when  the  vessel 
and crew are not ready. 

While  this  academic  research  has  recorded  positive  results  and 
identified  a  potential  for  safer  operations  in  these  fisheries,  it  is 
important  to  note  that  fishery  management  changes  alone  are  not 
a  panacea.  There  still  remain  very  real  economic  pressures  which 
can  influence  risk-taking  behaviors  by  fishermen.  As  such,  the 
Coast  Guard  believes  that  optimizing  safety  performance  in  the 
context  of  quota  and  cooperative  fisheries  can  best  be  achieved 
through  concurrent  improvements  in  overall  vessel  condition  and 
crew competencies. 

Within the freezer longline fleet, 30 of 36 vessels are already en-
rolled  in  the  Alternate  Compliance  and  Safety  Agreement.  This 
program was specifically developed for this and the freezer trawler 
fleet  and  participation  requires  vessel  owners  to  possess  updated 
stability  reports,  conduct  regular  dry  dockings,  inspect  main  pro-
pulsion  and  electrical  machinery,  upgrade  fire  prevention  systems, 
carry  enhanced  lifesaving  equipment,  and  greatly  increase  crew 
emergency  training  requirements.  To  date  the  fleet  has  invested 
over  $40  million  to  meet  these  ACSA  standards.  The  high  safety 
standards of this program, combined with the potential safety ben-
efits of a cooperative fishery structure, should significantly enhance 
safety for the 1,200 people working in the freezer longline fleet. 

Last, I would like to discuss the provisions of the American Fish-

eries Act. 

Provisions  of  the  American  Fisheries  Act  restrict  construction  of 
new fishing and fish processing vessels in certain Bering Sea/Aleu-
tian  Island  fisheries  and  impose  length,  tonnage,  and  horsepower 
limitations  on  new  vessels  constructed  in  other  fisheries.  With  the 
average  age  of  fishing  vessels  in  the  Bering  Sea/Aleutian  Island 
fleet  being  25  and  30  years  old,  these  vessels  are  nearing  the  end 
of  their  service  life.  Given  the  increased  safety  risks  associated 
with  older  vessels,  safety  would  best  be  served  by  providing  vessel 
owners  the  ability  to  retire  aging  vessels  and  replace  them  with 
modern  vessels.  In  removing  AFA  restrictions,  safety  would  be 
greatly enhanced because replacement vessels will be built to meet 
more  stringent  safety  requirements,  especially  as  it  relates  to  wa-
tertight  integrity  and  stability,  and  in  the  case  of  fish  processing 
vessels, vessels would need to be classed and load-lined. 

That  concludes  my  testimony,  Madam  Chair,  and  thank  you  for 
this opportunity again. I would be pleased to answer any questions 
that you have. 

[The prepared statement of Commander Woodley follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF COMMANDER CHRISTOPHER WOODLEY, THIRTEENTH COAST 
GUARD DISTRICT STAFF, U.S. COAST GUARD, DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY 
Good  afternoon,  Madam  Chair,  and  distinguished  Members  of  the  Committee.  I 
am  Commander  Christopher  Woodley,  Chief  of  External  Affairs  for  the  Thirteenth 
Coast  Guard  District.  I  am  pleased  to  have  this  opportunity  to  appear  before  you 
today  to  discuss  Commercial  Fishing  Vessel  Safety  and  the  Coast  Guard’s  safety 
program and initiatives. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

15 

The  Coast  Guard’s  Commercial  Fishing  Vessel  Safety  (CFVS)  Program  is  aimed 
at improving safety in the commercial fishing industry, reducing the number of ves-
sels lost, and reducing the number of fishing-related fatalities. The thrust of the ex-
isting CFVS Program is to gain compliance with the CFVS regulations through edu-
cational,  voluntary,  no-fault,  dockside  safety  examinations  and  other  outreach  ef-
forts. Regulatory enforcement is accomplished through at-sea boardings, which com-
plement  the  CFVS  Program.  We  also  balance  our  prevention  efforts  with  our  re-
sponse capabilities to minimize the consequences of the inevitable casualties that do 
occur. 

Historically,  commercial  fishing  has  been  one  of  the  most,  if  not  the  most,  haz-
ardous  occupations,  in  the  United  States.  In  2006,  the  Bureau  of  Labor  Statistics 
found  that  commercial  fishermen  and  workers  aboard  uninspected  fishing  vessels 
died  at  a  rate  of  141  per  100,000.  For  comparison,  the  fatality  rate  for  the  towing 
industry,  another  uninspected  segment  of  the  marine  industry,  was  17  per  100,000 
workers,  and  in  the  American  workplace  as  a  whole,  the  rate  was  four  deaths  per 
100,000 workers. 

CFVS  has  long  been  a  matter  of  concern  to  the  Coast  Guard,  but  limitations  on 
regulating  the  safety  of  commercial  fishing  vessels  have  been  encountered  because 
they  are  classified  as  ‘‘uninspected  vessels.’’  From  the  1930s  to  the  1980s,  various 
legislative  proposals  were  introduced  to  increase  safety  standards  for  commercial 
fishing vessels, such as requirements for periodic safety inspections, watertight com-
partments,  and  licensing  of  vessel  operators,  but  none  of  these  proposals  came  to 
fruition. 

In  1971,  the  Coast  Guard  conducted  a  study  and  cost-benefit  analysis  of  alter-
native  safety  programs  for  commercial  fishing  vessels.  The  report  documented  the 
fishing industry’s poor safety record and attributed it to the fact that fishing vessels, 
with  few  exceptions,  have  traditionally  been  exempted  from  the  safety  regulations 
required  of  other  commercial  vessels.  The  study  recommended  licensing  of  masters, 
mandatory  safety  standards  including  full  inspection  and  certification  of  new  ves-
sels,  and  mandatory  and  voluntary  standards  combined  with  inspection  and  certifi-
cation  of  existing  vessels.  The  report  also  drew  parallel  comparisons  to  the  Small 
Passenger Vessels Safety Act of 1956, which required structural and loading stand-
ards  and  inspections  on  those  vessels  and  led  to  an  80  percent  reduction  in  pas-
senger deaths. 

Proposed  fishing  vessel  safety  legislation  based  on  the  study  was  deferred  until 
the  National  Marine  Fisheries  Service  (NMFS)  of  the  Department  of  Commerce 
(DOC) could complete a study on commercial fishing vessel insurance. In 1975, DOC 
recommended an alternative proposal for a voluntary safety program for fishing ves-
sels.  In  July  1976,  the  Secretary  of  Transportation  forwarded  copies  of  the  Coast 
Guard’s  1971  study  to  the  Senate  Committee  on  Commerce  and  the  House  Com-
mittee on Merchant Marine and Fisheries, but did not recommend a legislative pro-
gram,  citing  the  inflationary  impact  to  the  economy  and  an  increased  interest  in  a 
voluntary program by the commercial fishing industry. 

In 1978, the Coast Guard initiated a voluntary dockside uninspected vessel exam-
ination program. The purpose of the program was to improve safety throughout the 
uninspected  fleet,  including  commercial  fishing  vessels.  A  project  to  develop  a  tri-
ennial dockside educational examination program was initiated, but was terminated 
in 1981. 

The  1980s  saw  a  renewed  awareness  of  fishing  vessel  safety,  several  tragedies, 
and finally safety standards legislation. A Coast Guard Fishing Vessel Safety Initia-
tive  Task  Force  1984  studied  how  fishing  vessel  safety  could  be  improved,  and  the 
Task  Force  recommended  a  two-pronged  approach.  One  part  of  the  program  pro-
moted vessel safety through voluntary standards published in a Coast Guard Navi-
gation  and  Vessel  Inspection  Circular  (NVIC)  in  1986.  The  standards  were  written 
primarily  for  fishing  vessel  designers,  builders,  outfitters,  and  marine  surveys,  and 
they are still referenced today. The second part of the program promoted crew safety 
through a safety guide developed by the Coast Guard and the North Pacific Fishing 
Vessel  Owners’  Association  (NPFVOA),  and  both  were  permanently  adopted  by  the 
Coast Guard Marine Safety Program in January 1987. 

The  House  Merchant  Marine  and  Fisheries  Committee’s  Subcommittee  on  Coast 
Guard  and  Navigation  held  a  series  of  hearings  on  marine  safety  in  1984,  which 
resulted  in  statutory  amendments  defining  fishing  industry  vessels  and  clarifying 
inspection, licensing and manning requirements for fish processing vessels. 

In August 1985, the WESTERN SEA, a seventy-year-old purse-seiner with a crew 
of  six,  disappeared  in  the  Bering  Sea.  Only  the  body  of  crewmember  Peter  Barry 
was recovered. After the death of their son, Ambassador Robert Barry and his wife 
Peggy Barry worked to galvanize safety advocates, government officials, lawmakers, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

16 

casualty survivors and families of other fishermen lost at sea to renew the campaign 
for congressionally mandated safety standards. 

By  1987,  bills  were  introduced  to  address  fishing  vessel  safety  and  insurance  li-
ability.  One  bill  specifically  addressed  vessel  inspections,  on-board  equipment  re-
quirements, licensing and training of masters and crew, casualty reporting, and the 
establishment  of  a  Fishing  Vessel  Safety  Advisory  Committee.  A  September  1987 
National  Transportation  Safety  Board  (NTSB)  study  on  ‘‘Uninspected  Commercial 
Fishing  Vessels’’  added  support  for  the  safety  legislation  being  considered.  The 
NTSB  testified  at  hearings  on  their  recommendations,  to  include  minimum  stand-
ards  for:  safety  training,  basic  lifesaving  equipment  to  include  exposure  suits,  ap-
proved  life  rafts,  emergency  radios,  Emergency  Position  Indicating  Radiobeacons 
(EPIRBs),  flooding  detection  and  dewatering  systems,  fire  detection,  fixed  fire-
fighting systems, periodic inspection, prohibition of the use of alcohol or drugs when 
engaged  in  commercial  fishing  operations,  education  regarding  the  dangers  of  toxic 
gases in unventilated spaces, and the need for research on vessel stability. 

The  Commercial  Fishing  Industry  Vessel  Safety  Act  of  1988  (P.L.  100–424)  was 
signed  into  law  by  the  President  on  September  9,  1988.  This  resulted  in  the  first 
safety  legislation  enacted  in  the  United  States  applying  specifically  to  commercial 
fishing vessels, and the Act gave the Coast Guard authority to prescribe safety regu-
lations.  The  Commercial  Fishing  Industry  Vessel  Safety  Advisory  Committee 
(CFIVSAC) was formed, and in 1989, it began to aid the Coast Guard in the devel-
opment  of  safety  regulations.  They  were  published  as  46  CFR  Part  28,  Require-
ments for Commercial Fishing Industry Vessels and became effective on September 
15, 1991. In 1996, some requirements for safety equipment and vessel operating pro-
cedures were modified, but actions related to immersion suit and extended stability 
requirements were deferred. Those pending proposals were terminated in 1998. 

Pursuant to the Act, the Coast Guard began developing a plan for licensing opera-
tors of federally documented fishing industry vessels. The CFIVSAC prepared a de-
tailed  report  for  the  Coast  Guard  and  recommended  ‘‘certification’’  of  operators  in-
cluding  ‘‘competency’’  requirements.  In  January  1992,  ‘‘A  Plan  for  Licensing  Opera-
tors  of  Uninspected  federally  Documented  Commercial  Fishing  Industry  Vessels’’ 
was  submitted  to  Congress.  In  May  1993,  a  revised  plan  was  submitted.  In  1996, 
a request was made for authority to license operators of commercial fishing industry 
vessels. Despite these efforts, to date no such authority has been granted. 

Also  as  mandated  by  the  Act,  the  National  Research  Council  (NRC)  conducted  a 
study  on  fishing  vessel  safety  and  the  need  for  vessel  inspections.  Their  report 
‘‘Fishing  Vessel  Safety—Blueprint  for  a  National  Program’’  was  published  in  1991. 
It was reviewed by the Coast Guard and the CFIVSAC. Several of the recommenda-
tions  were  endorsed  including  the  establishment  of  an  inspection  program  for  com-
mercial fishing industry vessels. 

In  November  1992,  the  Coast  Guard  submitted  a  report  to  Congress  requesting 
authority to carry out commercial fishing industry vessel inspections under a three- 
tiered  approach:  (1)  Allow  for  self-inspection  of  new  and  existing  vessels  less  than 
50  feet  in  length,  (2)  Allow  for  third  party  examination  of  new  and  existing  vessels 
greater than or equal to 50 feet but less than 79 feet in length, and (3) Require more 
extensive  Coast  Guard  inspection  and  load  line  assignment  on  vessels  79  feet  or 
greater in length. In addition, the inspection plan would have required new vessels 
79  feet  or  more  in  length  to  be  designed  and  built  to  class  standards,  and  existing 
vessels  of  that  length  could  have  additional  hull  and  machinery  standards  imposed 
if  authority  was  granted.  As  with  the  licensing  plan,  no  additional  authority  has 
been granted. 

In  the  absence  of  authority  to  inspect  commercial  fishing  industry  vessels,  the 
Coast  Guard  embarked  on  an  outreach  and  education  program.  The  most  note-
worthy  of  these  efforts  is  our  voluntary  dockside  examination.  During  these  vol-
untary examinations, a Coast Guard examiner works with vessel owners, operators 
and  crew  to  explain  requirements,  check  compliance  with  all  Federal  regulations, 
and  when  possible,  assist  the  crew  in  correcting  deficiencies.  Any  discrepancy  dis-
covered is brought to the crew’s attention, but no penalties result. 

In  carrying  out  the  CFVS  Program,  the  Coast  Guard  established  new  positions 
that  were  distributed  across  Coast  Guard  Headquarters,  each  District  Office,  and 
all  Marine  Safety  Offices  (now  Sectors)  throughout  the  country.  Several  additional 
positions were established in the program in 1996 to assist in training Boarding Of-
ficers.  To  provide  essential  training  and  encourage  fishermen’s  participation  in  the 
CFVS  Program,  the  Coast  Guard  placed  damage  control  training  trailers,  damage 
stability trainers, intact stability trainers, and EPIRB test kits at District or Sector 
offices throughout the country. 

Aggressive  safety  outreach  initiatives  are  complemented  by  compliance  boardings 
at  sea.  Enforcement  of  certain  critical  safety  and  survival  equipment  carriage  re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

17 

quirements  deter  non-compliance.  Vessels  found  to  be  lacking  critical  equipment, 
being operated in an unsafe manner, or otherwise characterized as having especially 
hazardous  conditions  on  board,  have  their  voyages  terminated.  In  addition,  vessels 
identified  as  high  risk,  as  determined  by  regional  enforcement  or  safety  personnel, 
may be targeted for boardings when sighted underway. 

Despite  the  progress  as  a  result  of  the  Act,  the  safety  regulations,  and  various 
safety initiatives, the Coast Guard believes further significant risks remain. For ex-
ample,  in  a  three-week  period  during  January  1999,  four  clam-fishing  vessels 
(ADRIATIC,  BETH  DEE  BOB,  CAPE  FEAR,  and  ELLIE–B),  one  conch-fishing  ves-
sel  (PREDATOR),  and  eleven  fishermen  were  lost.  As  a  result  of  this  surge  of  cas-
ualties,  the  Coast  Guard  convened  a  Fishing  Vessel  Casualty  Task  Force  on 
January 27,  1999,  that  was  comprised  of  representatives  from  the  Coast  Guard, 
NOAA, NMFS, NTSB and OSHA, along with industry advisors. The Task Force was 
charged  with  evaluating  the  circumstances  of  the  recent  accidents,  examining  the 
incidents  in  context  of  historical  data  for  loss  of  life  and  property,  providing  quick 
feedback to the industry on the safety issues, reviewing the current CFVS Program 
and past recommendations that have potential for reducing loss, recommending the 
most  significant  measures  that  would  have  great  potential  for  reducing  loss  of  life 
and  property,  and  developing  direction  and  an  action  plan  to  be  pursued  by  the 
CFIVSAC, the Coast Guard, and industry. 

The Task Force issued their report in March 1999. For this report, the Task Force 
examined  two  five-year  periods—one  period  prior  to  passage  of  the  Commercial 
Fishing  Industry  Vessel  Safety  Act  (CFIVSA)  of  1988,  and  the  second  period  after 
the  safety  regulations  became  effective  in  1991.  From  1984–1988,  519  lives  and 
1,177 vessels were lost during commercial fishing operations. From 1994–1998, 351 
lives  and  699  vessels  were  lost  in  the  industry.  This  represents  approximately  37 
percent fewer lives and vessels lost. 

The  results  of  this  Task  Force  indicated  that  the  Coast  Guard’s  CFVS  Program 
coincided with a reduction in fishing vessel casualties. Several other factors are also 
believed to have contributed to the reduction in fatalities, in addition to the imposi-
tion of safety requirements. First is the reduction in the number of vessels and com-
mercial  fishing  effort  due  to  the  distressed  nature  of  the  industry.  Second,  many 
fisheries  management  practices  overseen  by  the  National  Marine  Fisheries  Service 
(NMFS)  have  changed  to  give  increased  emphasis  on  safety.  The  third  factor  con-
tributing to reduced fatalities is partnerships with those organizations that are also 
concerned  with  safety  within  the  commercial  fishing  industry.  Most  prominent 
among  these  partners  is  the  National  Institute  for  Occupational  Safety  and  Health 
(NIOSH). NIOSH opened a field station in Anchorage, Alaska shortly after passage 
of the Act to focus on improved safety within the industry. Working with the Alaska 
Department  of  Fish  and  Game  has  resulted  in  a  significant  improvement  in  some 
Alaskan fisheries as well. 

The  Task  Force  also  concluded  that  most  casualties  could  be  prevented  and  that 
the  continued  high  loss  rates  and  risk  to  fishermen  was  not  acceptable.  The  Task 
Force believed it was time to go beyond the minimal standards and strive for break-
through  levels  of  loss  reduction  in  the  fishing  industry.  The  report,  ‘‘Living  to  Fish 
Dying  to  Fish,’’  contained  59  safety  recommendations  divided  into  seven  categories: 
Coordinate  Fishery  Management  with  Safety;  Establish  Operator  and  Crew  Stand-
ards; Ensure Vessels Comply with Standards; Establish Safety and Stability Stand-
ards;  Improve  Program  Management;  Conduct  Research  and  Development;  and  In-
form Fishermen. 

Subsequent  to  the  Task  Force  findings,  the  CFIVSAC  met  at  Coast  Guard  Head-
quarters  to  review  and  evaluate  the  Task  Force  recommendations.  At  the  same 
time, CFVS Coordinators from each Coast Guard District, the CFVS Program Man-
ager,  and  fisheries  law  enforcement  representatives  met  to  discuss  the  Task  Force 
report. Both groups provided recommendations for implementing the immediate and 
short  term  initiatives  to  improve  safety  in  the  fishing  industry.  Many  of  those  ac-
tions were taken, others have been initiated over the following years, and others are 
still  being  pursued.  The  following  are  key  actions  that  have  been  taken  since  2000. 
• The Coast Guard expanded training of NMFS agents and observers on the dock-
side examination program and fishing vessel safety matters and now sends rep-
resentatives  to  Regional  Fisheries  Management  Council  meetings  to  promote 
safety concerns. 
• The Coast Guard increased promotional activities on safety and survival and in-
• The  Coast  Guard  expanded  the  role  of  the  Auxiliary  in  the  CFVS  Program.  In 
some  areas,  Auxiliary  examiners  account  for  approximately  one  third  of  exami-
nations conducted. 

cluded fishing vessel safety programs in industry day-type activities. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

18 

• The Coast Guard established new positions in the CFVS Program and a Fishing 
Vessel  Safety  Division  at  the  Headquarters  level.  The  positions  added  CFVS 
personnel  at  each  of  the  Regional  Fisheries  Training  Centers,  the  CFVS  Pro-
gram  staff,  and  numerous  Marine  Safety  Offices  (now  Sectors)  throughout  the 
country. 

• The  Coast  Guard  improved  casualty  investigation  and  data  analysis  to  support 
risk based decisionmaking and examines casualties for ‘‘lessons learned’’ to pro-
vide feedback to the industry to improve safety. Consequences articles are sent 
to a national industry magazine. 

• The Coast Guard has developed better lines of communication with the commer-
cial  fishing  industry  and  established  a  website  (www.fishsafe.info)  on  fishing 
vessel safety items. 

• The Coast Guard publishes safety information fliers, quick reference cards, and 
equipment  requirement  pamphlets  for  distribution  to  the  fishermen  during 
dockside  contacts  and  other  outreach  programs.  These  items  are  being  trans-
lated into Spanish and Vietnamese. 

• Coast Guard examiners emphasize emergency preparedness drills as part of the 

voluntary dockside vessel safety examinations. 

• The Coast Guard initiated ‘‘Safe Catch’’ programs in several regions where cer-
tain  types  of  fisheries  are  known  to  be  high  risk,  such  as  Alaska,  the  Pacific 
Northwest,  and  the  Northeast.  Under  these  programs,  several  examiners  visit 
those  port  areas  prior  to  the  season  opening  offering  safety  examinations  and 
drill training to ensure the fishermen and their vessels are ready to get under-
way. Vessels that do not participate can expect to be boarded during the fishery 
and checked for full safety and survival equipment compliance. 

• The  Coast  Guard  has  submitted  proposals  to  conduct  projects  for  mandatory 
dockside  safety  examinations  in  certain  regions  of  the  country  where  data 
shows fatality rates are the highest. 

• The Coast Guard is considering options for developing appropriate fishing vessel 
operator  and  crew  competency  standards  that  directly  addresses  casualty  risk. 
• The Coast Guard is considering options for developing appropriate fishing vessel 
safety  and  stability  standards  that  directly  address  casualty  risk.  We  are  cur-
rently working on a regulatory project to extend stability and watertight integ-
rity standards to new fishing vessels 50 feet or greater in length. 

These  improvements  to  the  Coast  Guard’s  CFVS  Program  have  increased  safety 
and  have  contributed  to  lower  fatality  and  vessel  loss  rates  in  the  commercial  fish-
ing industry. Through increased Coast Guard presence on the docks, risk-based and 
regionally focused compliance boardings, and other agencies’ requirements for safety 
examinations,  fishing  vessel  safety  and  awareness  have  improved.  In  2000,  the 
number  of  fatalities  dropped  to  37,  over  50  percent  from  the  77  fatalities  in  1999. 
We  believe  this  was  a  direct  result  of  the  findings,  recommendations,  and  safety 
awareness generated by the Task Force subsequent to the multiple deadly sinkings 
in  January  1999.  In  2001,  fatalities  spiked  to  58.  Most  of  these,  however,  can  be 
attributed to one incident, the sinking of the ARCTIC ROSE which claimed 15 lives. 
An  overview  of  the  statistics  and  measures  for  the  CFVS  program  for  1992–2007 
are provided in Table 1. 

The impact of the safety legislation and regulations, and subsequent safety initia-
tives can be seen in the reduction of fatality averages, but are not as significant for 
vessel  losses.  Prior  to  the  Act  passage  in  1991,  fatalities  averaged  around  120  per 
year.  After  the  Act  and  until  the  Task  Force  in  1999,  the  fatality  average  dropped 
to  about  76  per  year.  Following  the  Task  Force  to  present,  the  fatality  average  has 
been approximately 42 per year. For the same time periods, the averages for vessel 
losses fell from approximately 138 to 100. 

Table 1.—Commercial Fishing Vessel Safety (CFVS) Statistics 1992–1999 

Voluntary Dockside Exams 
Safety Decals Issued 
CFV Fatalities (Operational) 
Vessel Losses (Operational) 

1992 

1993 

1994 

1995 

1996 

1997 

1998 

1999 

3,662 
1,661 
85 
139 

7,162 
3,432 
89 
148 

7,212 
3,545 
75 
153 

7,808 
3,929 
62 
117 

6,843 
3,719 
82 
166 

6,351 
3,451 
61 
138 

5,652 
3,485 
71 
125 

7,225 
3,992 
77 
123 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

19 

Commercial Fishing Vessel Safety (CFVS) Program Measures 2000–2007 

Voluntary Dockside Exams 
Safety Decals issued 
Compliance Boardings 
CFV Fatalities (Operational) 
Vessel Losses (Operational) 

2000 

2001 

2002 

2003 

2004 

2005 

2006 

2007 

7,193 
3,294 
3,883 
37 
85 

6,527 
3,681 
3,610 
58 
133 

5,826 
1,846 
3,845 
37 
122 

5,636 
1,880 
4,876 
43 
107 

7,024 
2,518 
6,174 
37 
112 

7,408 
2,500 
7,088 
42 
99 

7,936 
3,204 
7,032 
42 
75 

7,417 
3,063 
7,078 
31 
61 

In  a  more  recent  safety  initiative,  an  alternate  compliance  and  safety  agreement 
program  was  developed  with  the  industry.  The  Bering  Sea/Aleutian  Island  (BS/AI) 
and  Gulf  of  Alaska  (GOA)  freezer  longliner  and  freezer  trawler  fleet,  referred  to  as 
the  Head  and  Gut  (H&G)  fleet,  occupy  a  unique  niche  in  the  North  Pacific  fishing 
industry,  both  with  regards  to  vessel  operations  and  to  their  regulatory  status  as 
‘‘fishing  vessels.’’ 1 Unlike  other  catcher  vessels  which  deliver  fish  in  the  round  to 
shore plants, H&G vessels catch, sort, head, eviscerate, clean, and prepare fish into 
various fish products on board the vessel. These products are then frozen, packaged, 
and  stored  on  board  until  offloaded.  There  are  approximately  40  freezer  longliners 
and  23  freezer  trawlers  which  make  up  the  H&G  fleet.  These  vessels  range  in 
length from 90 feet to 220 feet. 

To  create  fish  products  on  board,  H&G  vessels  have  a  crew  complement  which 
range  from  15–55  people,  with  an  average  size  of  20  crew  members  for  H&G 
longliners  and  35  crew  members  for  H&G  trawlers.  In  contrast,  the  crew  size  of  a 
fish  catcher  vessel  in  the  Bering  Sea  is  typically  5–6  crew  members.  Because  the 
H&G  operation  requires  production,  freezing  and  packaging  of  their  catch,  haz-
ardous gases (anhydrous ammonia or Freon), foam insulated cargo holds, and flam-
mable packaging materials are present on board in large amounts. Additionally, be-
cause  of  their  ability  to  store  frozen  catch  on  board,  these  vessels  can  operate  in 
the most remote areas of the Bering Sea, far from search and rescue support. These 
factors result in increased safety and operational risks to this fleet. 

More  than  any  other  fishery  in  the  North  Pacific,  the  safety  issues  facing  this 
fleet  are  inseparably  intertwined  with  the  statutory  definition  of  ‘‘fish  processing,’’ 
fishery  resource  management  issues,  and  an  inability  to  come  into  compliance  with 
existing  safety  regulations.  To  address  the  safety  problems  and  the  other  conflicts 
associated  with  the  H&G  fleet,  the  Coast  Guard  developed  a  broad-based  initiative 
called the Alternate Compliance and Safety Agreement (ACSA). 

The  Coast  Guard  developed  the  ACSA  initiative  with  extensive  consultation  and 
support  from  the  North  Pacific  Longline  Association,  the  Groundfish  Forum,  the 
North  Pacific  Fishing  Vessel  Owners  Association,  and  numerous  vessel  owners  and 
operators from the H&G fleet. The overarching goals for this initiative are to signifi-
cantly improve safety in the H&G fleet in a reasonable and practicable manner. The 
initiatives allowed the H&G fleet to continue production of its historically important 
fish  product  lines.  It  integrates  certain  aspects  of  fishery  management  with  vessel 
safety by taking into account the H&G fleet’s need to meet future by-catch Improved 
Retention/Improved Utilization (IR/IU) requirements. 

Freezer  longliners  are  referred  to  within  the  industry  as  longline  catcher  proc-
essors  or  factory  longliners.  There  are  29  Washington-based  freezer  longliners. 
These  vessels  are  primarily  120  to  190  feet  in  length,  steel  hulled,  shelter  decked, 
predominantly  of  schooner  style,  but  also  house  forward  style.  Freezer  longliners 
have  limited  deck  lifting  gear  but  have  a  characteristic  starboard  side  hull  cutout 
line  hauling  station  under  the  shelter  deck  and  a  second  cut  in  the  stern  shelter 
deck area for gear setting. Most freezer longliners are equipped with automatic bait-
ing machines which enables them to bait and haul about 30,000 to 40,000 hooks per 
day.  Below  decks,  these  vessels  are  set  up  much  like  similar-size  freezer  trawlers 
with heading and gutting machines, plate freezers and lower level freezer holds for 
their  frozen  products.  With  one  or  two  exceptions  these  vessels  are  not  loadlined. 
Freezer  longliners  harvest  primarily  Pacific  cod  from  the  BS/AI.  Secondary  fish-
eries include halibut and sablefish under the individual fishing quota (IFQ) system, 
and  some  Greenland  turbot.  Several  vessels  in  this  fleet  also  dress  and  custom 
freeze salmon during their off cod season summer period. 

A  typical  vessel  in  this  fleet  is  corporate  owned  and  has  a  fair  market  value  of 
$3.5–$6.0 million. This fleet is fairly stable in numbers although substantial owner-
ship  changes  have  occurred  over  the  past  several  years  due  to  financial  problems 
of some vessel owners. Revenues realized by this fleet likely reached a low point in 

1 A  fishing  vessel  is  defined  in  Title  46  United  States  Code  (USC),  Section  2101  (11a)  as  a 
vessel ‘‘commercially engages in the catching, taking, or harvesting of fish or an activity that can 
reasonably be expected to result in the catching, taking, or harvesting of fish.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

20 

1998  due  both  to  depressed  Asian  market  prices  for  headed  and  gutted  frozen  cod 
and reductions in Bering Sea cod catch quotas. The economics of this fleet have im-
proved. This fleet is very single species dependent and would be adversely impacted 
by further reductions in cod catch quotas. Freezer longliner cod fisheries begin Jan-
uary 1, extend into April or May, then start again September 15 and carry into No-
vember  or  December.  Secondary  fisheries  for  Greenland  turbot  typically  follow  the 
spring cod fishery. In-port time for freezer longliners is primarily in the late spring 
to early September and in the late fall to mid-December. This fleet uses Fishermen’s 
Terminal, but at a modest level due to their long season and yard schedules. 

Freezer  trawlers  homeported  in  Washington  and  conducting  groundfish  fisheries 
in  Alaska  number  19  vessels.  Freezer  trawlers  are  primarily  130  to  200  feet  in 
length,  steel  hulled,  stern  ramp  trawlers  rigged  with  one  or  two  gantries  and  on- 
deck  lifting  gear  much  as  catcher  trawlers.  Below  the  fishing  deck  is  the  fish  proc-
essing  deck  with  plate  freezers  where  their  catches  are  headed,  gutted,  cleaned, 
sized  and  frozen  in  blocks  each  weighing  about  400  pounds.  Below  the  processing 
deck are the freezer holds capable of storing 200–500 metric tons of frozen product. 
Off loads are primarily to freighters for export of their product to Japan and Korea, 
but also include offloads shore side to freezer vans for domestic and European mar-
kets. Freezer trawlers harvest primarily flounders like yellowfin sole, rock sole, flat-
head sole, and Dover sole, as well as Atka mackerel and a variety of rockfishes. 

A  typical  freezer  trawler  is  corporate  owned  and  has  a  fair  market  value  of  $5.0- 
$8.5  million.  The  freezer  trawler  fleet  is  stable  in  number  of  vessels,  moderately  to 
well maintained and is economically viable but somewhat economically depressed at 
present. Revenues realized by this fleet have fallen by more than 20 percent in the 
past 5 years due primarily to the state of the Asian economies coupled with the clo-
sure  of  some  of  their  best  fishing  grounds  for  protection  of  Bering  Sea  crab  and 
Steller  sea  lions.  The  economics  of  this  fleet  are  heavily  tied  to  Asian  exports  and 
to  the  Asian  economy.  Freezer  trawler  revenues  in  the  next  5  years  will  likely  re-
main  somewhat  depressed  due  to  the  combination  of  competing  supplies  of  headed 
and  gutted  fish  from  Russian  waters  harvested  by  Japanese  and  Korean  vessels. 
Also, bycatch restrictions imposed on this fleet in Alaska to protect crab and halibut 
are likely to become more restrictive. 

Freezer trawlers fisheries are spread out over about 9 months per year. Their op-
erations  begin  January  20  and  typically  wind  down  in  October.  Their  in-port  times 
are  primarily  late  October  through  early  January.  During  this  period  some  freezer 
trawlers  moor  at  NW  Dock  2,  for  repairs  and  re-provisioning.  Overall,  this  fleet’s 
use of the Fishermen’s Terminal is fairly limited to shipyard work during their lim-
ited lay-up period. 

Commercial  fishing  off  the  coasts  of  California,  Oregon  and  Washington  pose  a 
concern  to  the  Coast  Guard’s  safety  program.  The  fatality  rate  in  this  region  is 
about double the national rate, with the Dungeness crab fishery having the highest 
rate.  Most  of  the  fatalities  occur  as  a  result  of  their  vessels  capsizing  or  sinking. 
A  large  percentage  of  fatalities  also  occur  from  falls  overboard.  Weather  conditions 
and  large  waves  are  contributing  factors  in  these  casualties,  as  well  as  lack  of  use 
of lifesaving equipment. The Coast Guard has stepped up initiatives to educate fish-
ermen on the hazards they may face, ensuring they have the required safety equip-
ment and are trained in its use, and is seeking to examine vessels before the fishing 
seasons. 

In  an  effort  to  improve  safety  throughout  the  commercial  fishing  industry  and  in 
all regions of the country, the Coast Guard is trying to reach more fishermen. Com-
pliance  with  the  safety  regulations  is  required,  but  participation  in  Coast  Guard 
programs  and  dockside  examinations  is  voluntary.  The  Coast  Guard  published  an 
Advance  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  (ANPRM)  for  Commercial  Fishing  Vessel 
Safety  on  March  31,  2008.  The  proposed  changes  would  further  enhance  safety  by 
adding  new  requirements  for,  but  not  limited  to:  stability  on  vessels  50–79  feet; 
maintenance  and  self-examination;  safety  and  other  training;  drill  conductors  on 
board;  survival  suits  in  seasonally  cold  waters,  and  documentation  of  maintenance, 
testing, and training performed. The Coast Guard is seeking comments on the need 
for and the impact of the rules being considered on the industry and individual fish-
ermen. 

The  Administration,  including  the  Coast  Guard  and  NMFS,  strongly  support  im-
provements in the safety of fishing vessels and fishing operations. NMFS is respon-
sible  for  ensuring  that  fisheries  management  promotes  safety.  With  a  reauthorized 
Magnuson-Stevens  Fishery  Conservation  and  Management  Act,  NMFS  has  the  au-
thority to promote safer fishing operations in several ways: (1) better focused assess-
ments  of  the  safety  impacts  of  management  measures,  (2)  stronger  safety  require-
ments  of  our  observer  program,  (3)  limited  access  privilege  programs  that  improve 
safety,  (4)  financial  incentives  that  reduce  the  costs  of  safety  upgrades,  and  (5)  col-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

21 

laboration  with  other  agencies  in  negotiations  paving  the  way  for  eventual  ratifica-
tion  and  entry  into  force  of  an  existing  international  agreement  on  fishing  safety. 
We  believe  that  continued  progress  in  vessel  standards  and  fisheries  management 
is the most practical and comprehensive strategy for achieving sustainable improve-
ments in safety at sea. 

In  summary,  the  Congress,  Commercial  Fishing  Industry  Vessel  Safety  Advisory 
Committee,  commercial  fishing  industry,  NMFS,  and  the  Coast  Guard  have  all 
worked to improve safety on commercial fishing vessels, but there is still much work 
that can be done. We are continuously improving our response posture and capabili-
ties so as to minimize the consequences when vessel casualties do occur. 

Thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  discuss  commercial  fishing  vessel  safety.  I  will 

be pleased to address any questions that you may have. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you, Commander Woodley, and thank 

you to all the panelists. 

Actually,  Commander  Woodley,  I  think  I  am  going  to  start  with 

you. Do you know, is there a safety record for the fleet overall? 

Commander WOODLEY. For the longline fleet, ma’am? 
Senator CANTWELL. In general. 
Commander  WOODLEY.  Yes.  The  Coast  Guard  does  track  safety 
at a district level, individual casualties, both major casualties such 
as  vessel  loss  or  loss  of  personnel,  down  to  individual  casualties 
such  as  loss  of  propulsion,  loss  of  electrical,  things  like  that.  So, 
yes, we do track all of that. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  So  do  you  put  a  grade  to  it  or  how  do  you 

determine—— 

Commander  WOODLEY.  With  the  Bering  Sea/Aleutian  Island 
freezer  longline  fleet,  the  fleet  actually  has  a  very  good  safety 
record  as  compared  to  other  fisheries.  Their  primary  problem  is 
man  overboard,  followed  by  occasional  industrial  accidents  that 
happen  in  the  factory  and  are  matters  of  ocean  jurisdiction.  But 
then  you  also  have  the  rare  but  very  high  risk  potential  of  vessel 
loss such as the fishing vessel Galaxy where you can lose numerous 
crew  very  quickly,  and  that  was  actually  the  reason  the  Alternate 
Compliance  and  Safety  Program  was  put  together,  was  to  prevent 
those catastrophic casualties. 

Senator CANTWELL. Is that where we should be directing our at-

tention? Is that what you are saying? 
Commander WOODLEY. Yes, ma’am. 
Senator CANTWELL. In all the safety issues, you think where the 
Coast  Guard  or  all  of  us  should  be  directing  our  attention  is  rela-
tion to man overboard or—— 

Commander  WOODLEY.  Man  overboard  is  a  big  problem  nation-
ally, but I think that is probably one of the most difficult issues to 
solve. The focus again that we looked at for the Bering Sea and the 
Alternate Compliance and Safety Program was looking at the issue 
of  vessel  loss  and  preventing  that  through  preventative  measures 
such  as  new  stability  reports,  hull  inspection,  dry  docking,  things 
like that. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  So  where  does  vessel  replacement  fit  into 

Commander  WOODLEY.  Vessel  replacement  fits  into  that  in  that 
because  you  have  older  vessels,  as  these  vessels  get  older,  they 
tend  to  incur  more  safety  problems  over  time.  It  gets  more  expen-
sive to maintain them. So building new vessels with the new safety 
requirements that are required as part of the Fishing Vessel Safety 
Act would significantly upgrade the safety of those boats. 

that? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

22 

Senator  CANTWELL.  So  how  would  you  rank  that  then?  Some-
thing that is important to get done? I mean, you said you had this 
compliance program for safety and management. 

Commander  WOODLEY.  Yes,  ma’am.  In  the  context  of  the  Bering 
Sea/Aleutian Island fisheries, that is one of the top priorities of the 
Thirteenth District is to get all those vessels through the program. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  So  I  am  asking  where  does  vessel  replace-

ment fit into that? Is it an addition and—— 

Commander WOODLEY. Yes. 
Senator  CANTWELL.—desperately  needed  or  is  this  program 

working well? 

Commander  WOODLEY.  I  think  ultimately  because  the  Alternate 
Compliance  Program  is  an  alternative  program  to  class  and  load 
line,  the  goal  for  the—I  am  speaking  particularly  of  the  fish  proc-
essing vessels—would be to get new vessels in there. That is where 
your  highest  risk  is.  That  is  where  the  most  people  are  on  board, 
and  that  is  the  Coast  Guard’s  focus.  We  would  like  to  see  those 
boats. 

Senator CANTWELL. Better vessels. 
Commander WOODLEY. Yes, ma’am. 
Senator CANTWELL. It is part of the consideration. OK. 
Ms.  Hughes,  in  your  experience,  do  you  believe  that  we  need 

more stringent safety regulations? 

Ms.  HUGHES.  My  perspective  on  that  is  that  what  we  have  got 
from  the  Fishing  Vessel  Safety  Act  of  1988  was  pretty  much  the 
closest  thing  we  will  see  to  a  one-size-fits-all  regulatory  package, 
but it is not really looking at prevention. It predominantly address-
es  emergency  response.  So  I  think  we  need  to  collectively  be  look-
ing  at  more  preventative  measures.  For  instance,  in  the  vessel  re-
build  issue,  a  safe  platform  is  one  of  the  key  elements  that  you 
want. You want to keep people out of the water. That is when their 
risk is the greatest. 

Another  interesting  statistic  is  that  the  National  Institute  of 
Safety  and  Health,  NIOSH,  their  Alaska  field  office  did  a  study  of 
the  casualties,  which  they  track  very  closely  in  Alaska.  The  cas-
ualty  rate  in  the  commercial  fishing  industry  between  1999  and 
2006  was  reduced  by  51  percent,  which  is  really  significant.  So  I 
think that—— 

Senator CANTWELL. By reducing the race for fish you are saying. 
Ms.  HUGHES.  Well,  that  is  certainly  a  definite  part  of  it  for  the 
fisheries  that  were  rationalized  during  that  period  of  time.  There 
are a lot of factors that actually have to play together to really get 
a safety culture and make the improvements. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  So  what  further  practices  do  you  think  that 

we need to do in vessel replacement? 

Ms. HUGHES. I think that when I answered your question before, 
it was really that we need Coast Guard oversight. If you look even 
around  the  country,  nationally  the  Coast  Guard’s  oversight  of  the 
industry varies dramatically, and in some areas it is virtually non-
existent. So what we have had with District 13 and District 17 and 
largely  the  work  of  Commander  Woodley  is  some  initiatives  that 
absolutely were factors in the reduction of the casualty rate. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Commander  Woodley,  would  you  like  to  re-

spond to that? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

23 

Commander  WOODLEY.  Madam  Chair,  the  major  reduction  that 
Leslie spoke of as measured by NIOSH was in the Bering Sea/Aleu-
tian  Island  crab  fleet  from  1999  through  2005  where  the  Coast 
Guard  implemented  at-the-dock  stability  checks  prior  to  the  start 
of  the  red  king  crab  and  opilio  crab  fisheries.  The  Coast  Guard 
came into the ports of Dutch Harbor, St. Paul, and King Cove and 
examined the vessels as they were loading their boats to make sure 
that they were not overloading because what we found in our com-
pany  analysis  through  the  1990s  was  that  was  the  primary  cause 
of  vessel  loss,  was  overloading  boats,  boats  operating  fully  loaded 
in  poor  weather  and  icing  conditions.  And  by  going  on  board  and 
spot-checking boats and making sure they were not overloaded and 
also  making  sure  that  all  the  proper  lifesaving  equipment  was  on 
board and functional, not only did we prevent casualties, but when 
the rare casualties did occur, they had the proper safety equipment 
and were able to get rescued. 

Senator CANTWELL. Dr. Sanchirico, is there more that we should 
be  doing  on  fishing  management  that  would  help  in  the  safety  re-
gime area? 

Dr.  SANCHIRICO.  I  think  that  this  hearing  and  moving  rational-
ization  forward  throughout  the  country  is  the  way  to  achieve  most 
of  the  safety  gains  that  we  have  heard  about  today.  And  so  as 
much  as  this  Committee  can  do  that,  I  think  that  is  the  way  we 
need  to  go  to  address  the  safety  issues.  There  is  just  no  way  in  a 
race  for  fish  that  safety  concerns  will  rise  to  the  level  necessary 
that we think they should as a society. There is just too much com-
petition  for  that  catch.  And  so  once  you  remove  the  race  to  fish 
with  rationalization,  then  you  will  see  the  slower  pace  of  fishing 
and the gains associated with that in safety. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  So,  Ms.  Hughes,  before  you  were  starting  to 
talk  about  the  longliner  issue  and  whether  you  think  that  would 
be  a  good  management  system  for  more  safety  in  that  particular 
area. 

Ms. HUGHES. Positively. They are the last major fishery in Alas-
ka  that  has  not  been  rationalized.  For  instance,  in  the  Bering  Sea 
pollock  fleet,  the  requirement  for  that  group  to  form  a  cooperative 
was  at  the  80  percent  level,  and  right  now  the  members  in  the 
Longline Coalition would be 94.4 percent, with just two vessels not 
in  favor  of  that.  So  it  would  seem  reasonable  to  me  that  they 
should  not  necessarily  be  held  to  a  higher  standard  than  the  pol-
lock fleet. If 80 percent was acceptable for them, it would seem rea-
sonable for this group as well, given the benefits. 

Senator CANTWELL. And how about—I do not know if you are fa-
miliar, but there is a Coast Guard bill in the House of Representa-
tives  as  well  that  is  considering  safety  inspections  twice  every  5 
years,  required  safety  training  and  implementation  of  vessel  con-
struction  standards.  Have  you  reviewed  that  legislation?  Do  you 
have any thoughts on that language? 

Ms.  HUGHES.  Right,  yes.  Of  course,  the  devil  is  in  the  details. 
But  there  are  certainly  a  lot  of  positive  aspects  to  that  House  bill. 
There  are  some  that  I  do  not  honestly  know  what  the  real  reper-
cussions  would  be  nationally  to  take  some  of  those  down  to  a  50- 
foot  length  vessel.  That  would  be  best  left  to  naval  architects  and 
class societies. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

24 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Commander  Woodley,  do  you  have  any  com-

ments about that? 

Commander  WOODLEY.  The  Coast  Guard  supports  the  section 
307  provisions  of  House  bill  2830,  but  as  Leslie  said,  there  are  a 
lot of issues in the details of how it would work out. And we would 
have to be careful to avoid inadvertent consequences. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  We  have  not  talked  about—I  mean,  we  are 
talking  about  safety  from  a  whole  variety  of  perspectives,  obvi-
ously,  training  and  vessels  and  management  policies.  But  Dr. 
Sanchirico,  if  you  could  talk  about  the  environmental  impacts  of 
fisheries  management  and  cooperatives.  Are  we  getting  something 
additionally? 

Dr.  SANCHIRICO.  There  are  a  couple  areas  where  slowing  down 
the race for fish, addressing the rule of capture incentives has envi-
ronmental benefits. First, it is how the total allowable catch is set, 
where  total  allowable  catch  is  the  catch  on  fishing  in  these  sys-
tems.  And  so,  for  example,  in  some  of  the  New  Zealand  fisheries 
that  I  have  studied,  when  they  went  into  the  individual  fishing 
quota  system,  they  had  significant  reductions  in  the  TAC’s.  Since 
that  time,  those  stocks  have  since  recovered,  and  what  we  have 
found  is  that  those  fisheries  actually  turned  out  to  be  the  most 
profitable  or  have  seen  the  greatest  increases  in  profit  in  the  New 
Zealand system. In other words, there is an important link between 
the  ecological  sustainability  and  the  economic  return,  the  profit-
ability of a fishery. 

Second,  the  slower  pace  of  fishing  is  completely  consistent  with 
a  reduction  in  habitat  damage.  For  example,  in  the  New  Zealand 
red  snapper  fishery,  they  went  from  a  trawl  fishery,  which  was  a 
frozen  product,  to  a  fishery  that  sells  into  the  live  fish  market.  As 
a  result,  the  fishery  is  being  harvested  by  very  different  types  of 
gear, and one that is much more minimizing in terms of its poten-
tial habitat damages. 

With  respect  to  by-catch  issues,  we  have  seen  discussions  in  the 
literature about potential reductions in levels of by-catch on ration-
alized  fisheries.  British  Columbia  groundfish  fisheries  has  some  of 
the most work done there. 

And  finally,  as  I  touched  on  in  my  testimony,  the  creation  of 
wealth  in  these  fisheries  creates  stewardship  incentives,  and  we 
have  seen  these  incentives  manifest  around  the  world.  For  in-
stance,  there  are  examples  in  Iceland  where  the  cod  fishery  under 
an individual fishing quota system lobbied the government to close 
spawning  areas  that  were  currently  open  to  fishing.  We  have  the 
same  sort  of  experiences  in  New  Zealand  where  the  industry 
turned  around  and  lobbied  for  creation  of  marine  reserves  or  clo-
sures  in  particular  areas  or  moved  their  fishing  at  different  times 
of  the  year  to  avoid  spawning  aggregations.  So  we  see  it  through 
multiple  dimensions,  but  it  goes  back  to  ending  the  race  for  fish, 
allocating  shares  to  the  catch  and  creation  of  wealth  that  ensues. 
Senator CANTWELL. Well, thank you very much. I want to thank 
the  panelists.  We  have  a  second  panel  that  I  want  to  get  to  only 
because  I  have  been  handed  the  note  that  we  are  probably  going 
to have another vote at 4 o’clock. So I thank you for your patience, 
as  I  said  earlier,  and  if  you  would  be  open  to  any  other  questions 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

25 

we  might  submit  to  you  for  the  record.  We  appreciate  your  timely 
answers to those. 

So  now  we  will  call  up  the  second  panel,  if  we  could.  Mr.  John 
Bundy,  President  of  Glacier  Fish  Company;  Mr.  Mike  Hyde,  Advi-
sor  for  American  Seafoods  Group;  Ms.  Donna  Parker,  Director  of 
Government  Relations  for  Arctic  Storm;  and  Mr.  David  Frulla, 
Partner at Kelley Drye, representing the Fishing Company of Alas-
ka. Welcome to all of you. Thank you for being here today. 

As  with  the  previous  panel,  if  you  could  keep  your  remarks  to  5 
minutes.  We  are,  obviously,  willing  to  accept  longer  testimony  for 
the  record,  but  to  give  us  time  to  get  through  the  second  panel, 
that would be much appreciated. It looks like we are going to start 
with  you,  Mr.  Bundy.  We  appreciate  you  being  here,  as  well  as 
many  of  the  other  people  from  the  panel  traveling  from  the  other 
coast to be here in Washington, D.C. 

STATEMENT OF JOHN BUNDY, PRESIDENT, 

GLACIER FISH COMPANY ON BEHALF OF THE 

FREEZER LONGLINE COALITION 

Mr.  BUNDY.  Madam  Chair,  thank  you  for  having  this  hearing. 
My name is John Bundy. My perspective is as President of the Gla-
cier  Fish  Company  and  having  recently  completed  9  years  on  the 
North  Pacific  Council.  Glacier  is  based  in  Seattle,  owned  by  two 
families principally and in addition by the Norton Sound Economic 
Development  Corporation  which  represents  15  member  commu-
nities of over 8,400 people in the Bering Strait region of northwest 
Alaska. 

Glacier  owns  and  operates  two  trawl  pollock  vessels,  now  three, 

and two freezer longline vessels. 

I am going to talk about first the freezer longline proposal. I am 

testifying on this matter for the Freezer Longline Coalition. 

The members of the coalition are the owners of 34 of the 36 ves-
sels authorized by the council to participate in the freezer longline 
sector  of  the  Bering  Sea  cod  fishery.  This  fishery  is  the  first  cod 
fishery  in  the  world  to  receive  certification  from  the  Marine  Stew-
ardship Council as sustainable, but under the current fishery man-
agement  plan,  it  is  still  a  race  for  fish,  resulting  in  substantial 
safety concerns and unnecessary waste. 

Fishery  cooperatives  and  other  forms  of  rationalization  are  not 
new  management  concepts  to  West  Coast  fisheries.  The  freezer 
longline  cod  sector  is  the  last  remaining  major  fishery  yet  to  be 
rationalized in the Bering Sea. 

You  have  already  heard,  I  think,  compelling  testimony  today 
about  voluntary  harvest  co-ops  being  superior  management  tools 
for safety and numerous other reasons. The benefits of those co-ops 
are summarized by the State of Washington in its letter of support 
and  also  the  Environmental  Defense  Fund  in  its  letter  of  support. 
They  include  a  list:  improved  safety,  reduced  ecosystem  impacts, 
increased  product  quality  and  supply  to  consumers,  removal  of  in-
centives for overcapitalization, improved financial stability. Fishing 
in  a  co-op  will  allow  the  fleet  to  slow  down  and  choose  better 
weather.  No  longer  will  the  skipper  and  crew  feel  compelled  to 
start on January 1 regardless of ice and storm conditions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

26 

The  problem  that  we  have  is  that  a  voluntary  harvest  coopera-
tive  requires  100  percent  agreement  for  the  simple  reason  that  a 
non-member  is  free  to  continue  racing  for  the  entire  quota.  Over  4 
years  now,  our  sector  has  worked  to  establish  a  cooperative  with 
100  percent  approval,  but  has  failed  in  that  respect  because  one 
company  has  refused  to  participate.  Faced  with  this  type  of  situa-
tion,  Congress  in  the  AFA  adopted  the  approach  that  we  advocate 
here:  define  a  subpool  of  the  quota  which  reflects  what  the  non- 
joiners would reasonably be expected to harvest under current con-
ditions  and  let  them  race  for  it  and  leave  the  remainder  to  the  co- 
op to be managed by the council and the National Marine Fisheries 
Service. 

The  legislation  proposed  by  the  coalition  would  not  in  any  man-
ner  lesson  the  council’s  authority  to  manage  the  cod  fishery.  It 
would simply provide a basic tool, modeled on the AFA, that would 
allow formation of a voluntary harvest cooperative. 

Support  for  this  also  comes  from  the  State  of  Washington  which 
states  in  its  letter,  ‘‘The  Department’’—‘‘Department’’  referring  to 
the Department of Fish and Wildlife—‘‘is strongly in support of co-
operative  fishing  efforts  for  the  Washington  and  Alaska  based 
fleets,’’ supported the recent actions by the Council in restructuring 
the  cod  fishery,  and  the  department  expected  that  the  freezer 
longline  sector  would  be  able  to  form  a  voluntary  cooperative  as  a 
result of the Council’s action. 

But  now  it  appears  that  without  Congressional  action,  the  race 
for  fish  will  continue.  And  we  respectfully  ask  the  Members  of  the 
Subcommittee  to  act  by  introducing  legislation  that  would  provide 
the fleet a basic tool to form the co-op. 

Now,  in  the  little  bit  of  time  I  have  left,  I  am  going  to  comment 
also  on  the  AFA  rebuild  issue.  Really,  the  first  panel  pretty  much 
covered  my  arguments.  So  let  me  just  mention  a  couple  of  things 
sort of, I guess, defensively. 

The  question  has  been  asked,  since  those  restrictions  are  in  the 
AFA, why do you not stick by your deal? The answer is that when 
we, the pollock industry, did the AFA, it was pretty much an exper-
iment. We did not know exactly what would be the outcome of the 
AFA in terms of rationalizing the fisheries. The offshore, for exam-
ple, had to be able to form a voluntary co-op, which they were able 
to  do.  And  in  fact,  every  single  vessel  in  the  pollock  industry,  over 
200  of  them,  ended  up  in  co-ops.  So  the  legislation  was  very  effec-
tive in rationalizing that fishery, and now we have a known entity. 
And  for  that  reason,  the  restrictions  really  no  longer  make  sense 
because we know what we have. 

And only two concerns have been raised that I am aware of. One 
is, will allowing the vessels to modernize themselves and to rebuild 
or  replace  somehow  upset  the  co-ops  and  upset  the  rationalization 
and  the  achievements  that  we  have  achieved?  The  answer  is  that 
the  co-ops  have  simply  proven  so  valuable  that  they  are  going  to 
be  staying  there,  and  NMFS  certainly  supports  them.  And  the  en-
tire industry, all sectors of the industry, supports the ability to re-
build or replace as needed. 

The second concern that I have heard is that perhaps with bigger 
vessels or greater technology, there would be a spillover effect into 
other  fisheries.  That  will  not  happen  because  the  AFA  itself  has 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

27 

built in a number of restrictions preventing pollock vessels partici-
pating  in  other  groundfish  fisheries.  This  legislation,  as  passed  by 
the  House  twice,  would  even  add  more  restrictions  so  that,  for  ex-
ample, if a vessel is replaced, the old vessel must exit from all fish-
eries in the U.S. 

So I will end with that. Thank you, Madam Chair. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Bundy follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOHN BUNDY, PRESIDENT, GLACIER FISH COMPANY ON 

BEHALF OF THE FREEZER LONGLINE COALITION 

Thank you, Madame Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee, for the oppor-
tunity  to  testify.  I  am  John  Bundy,  president  of  Glacier  Fish  Company.  Based  in 
Seattle, Washington, Glacier Fish Company is principally owned by two Seattle fish-
ing  families  and  the  Norton  Sound  Economic  Development  Corporation  (NSEDC). 
NSEDC is a private nonprofit corporation representing 15 member communities and 
over  8,400  people  in  the  Bering  Strait  Region  of  Northwestern  Alaska.  NSEDC  is 
one of six Community Development Quota (CDQ) organizations. I have a broad per-
spective  of  fisheries  management  issues  in  the  North  Pacific  having  recently  com-
pleted 9 years of service on the North Pacific Fisheries Management Council (Coun-
cil)  on  which  I  was  one  of  three  voting  members  appointed  by  the  Governor  of  the 
State of Washington. 

Glacier  Fish  Company  owns  and  operates  three  trawl  catcher/processor  vessels 
that  participate  in  the  Bering  Sea  Alaska  pollock  fishery.  Two  of  those  vessels  are 
eligible as well to participate in the catcher/processor sector of the west coast Pacific 
whiting fishery. Our company also operates two freezer longline vessels that partici-
pate in the Bering Sea/Aleutian Island (BSAI) Pacific cod fishery. 

I  am  here  to  testify  today  in  favor  of  two  issues  being  considered  by  the  Sub-
committee.  The  first  issue  is  a  legislative  proposal  to  facilitate  the  formation  of  a 
fish  harvesting  cooperative  for  the  freezer  longline  sector  of  the  BSAI  Pacific  cod 
fishery. The second issue is a provision in the House-passed Coast Guard reauthor-
ization bill, H.R. 2830, relating to the replacement, rebuilding and retirement of ves-
sels  identified  in  the  American  Fisheries  Act  (AFA)  as  eligible  to  participate  in  the 
Bering Sea pollock fishery. This provision was also included in the Coast Guard re-
authorization bill in the 109th Congress, which passed the House, but was not taken 
up by the Senate. 
Freezer Longline Cooperative Proposal 

I  am  testifying  on  this  matter  as  a  Board  member  of  the  Freezer  Longline  Coali-

tion and on its behalf. 

The  members  of  the  Coalition  are  the  owners  of  34  of  the  36  vessels  authorized 
by  the  Council  to  participate  in  the  freezer  longline  sector  of  the  BSAI  cod  fishery. 
Our  members  are  united  in  their  commitment  to  sustainable  fishing  practices  evi-
denced  by  the  fact  that  our  fishery  is  the  first  cod  fishery  in  the  world  to  receive 
certification from the Marine Stewardship Council (MSC) as sustainable, eco-friend-
ly  and  well-managed.  The  MSC  certification  is  the  most  widely  recognized  and  re-
spected mark for sustainable well-managed fisheries. The certification requires that 
a  team  of  independent  scientists  investigate  and  find  the  fishery  resource  to  be 
healthy,  not  in  danger  of  being  overfished,  and  harvested  in  a  sustainable  manner. 
The Coalition is committed to improving fishing practices and ensuring the produc-
tivity and sustainability of the Pacific cod resource. 

I would like to provide the Committee a brief overview of the freezer longline fleet 
and  how  it  operates  in  the  Pacific  cod  fishery.  The  fleet  consists  of  36  vessels  that 
catch, process, freeze and package fish on board the vessel while at sea. The vessels 
use  specialized  longlines  with  individually  baited  hooks  to  catch  the  resource.  Each 
line  is  set  and  hauled  every  day;  the  fish  are  individually  taken  off  the  hook  and 
flash  frozen  within  a  matter  of  hours.  This  method  of  fishing  allows  the  operators 
to  maintain  the  highest  quality  level.  The  use  of  longlines  also  allows  the  fleet  to 
make  important  adjustments  in  selective  gear  and  bait  methods  to  avoid  bycatch, 
ensuring  not  only  the  health  of  the  cod  fishery  but  of  the  other  fish  species  in  the 
marine ecosystem. In addition, the fishing methods employed by the freezer longline 
sector  are  very  low  impact,  minimizing  damage  to  the  ocean  floor  and  interaction 
with corals, plant life, and other marine life. 

While the Freezer Longline Coalition is extremely proud of its sustainable and low 
impact fishing practices, it still has concerns regarding the management of the fish-
ery. Under the current fishery management plan, there is a ‘‘race for fish’’ resulting 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

28 

in substantial safety concerns, unnecessary waste of the fishery resource, and envi-
ronmental  consequences  that  could  be  avoided  by  cooperative  harvest  behavior.  Be-
cause  the  fleet  is  over-capitalized,  the  total  harvesting  capacity  is  greater  than  the 
available quota of cod. This results in extremely short seasons with operators racing 
to maintain or increase their ‘‘share’’ of the catch within the short time allowed be-
fore  the  quota  has  been  caught.  We  refer  to  this  as  the  ‘‘Olympic  system’’  because 
the incentives inherent in a common pool of fish causes vessel owners to concentrate 
their  efforts  and  investments  on  catching  and  processing  the  maximum  amount  of 
cod  that  their  vessels  can  handle  in  the  shortest  possible  time.  This  practice  re-
quires vessel operators to take safety risks and naturally leads to waste. Under the 
‘‘race for fish,’’ vessel operators must fish in weather conditions that jeopardize ves-
sel  safety.  Many  less  valuable  parts  of  the  cod  fish  are  often  discarded  along  with 
other  bycatch  to  make  room  in  the  hold  for  more  valuable  products  so  the  vessels 
can continue fishing as long as possible. Fishing crews often throw excess provisions 
and  bait  over  the  side  to  make  room  for  a  few  more  cases  of  cod  before  the  season 
ends because if not harvested now the cod will be ‘‘lost’’ to that vessel operator. 

The  formation  of  a  cooperative  in  this  sector  would  eliminate  the  waste  inherent 
in the ‘‘Olympic System.’’ Providing this sector with tools to voluntarily fish coopera-
tively  will  mean  that  vessel  operators  can  slow  down  their  harvest  rates  with  the 
knowledge that they will still be able to catch their share of the resource. The mem-
bers  of  the  cooperative  will  convert  energy  and  investment  previously  used  only  to 
maximize  the  daily  catch  of  cod  to  improving  safety  and  maximizing  the  value  of 
their share by increasing yield and quality of all products and species caught. Oper-
ating  in  risky  weather  will  no  longer  be  an  economic  necessity.  Far  less  will  go  to 
waste.  We  know  that  recovery  rates  in  some  rationalized  fisheries  have  been  in-
creased  by  as  much  as  50  percent  and  bycatch  rates  have  been  cut  by  40  percent. 
By  operating  in  a  cooperative  structure,  vessel  safety  will  be  enhanced  and  our 
members  will  become  even  better  stewards  of  the  resource  because  they  will  have 
a greater long-term vested interest and better tools to manage it sustainably. 

Fishery  cooperatives  and  other  forms  of  rationalization  are  not  new  management 
concepts  to  West  Coast  fisheries.  In  fact,  the  freezer  longline  Pacific  cod  sector  is 
the  last  remaining  major  fishery  yet  to  be  rationalized  in  the  BSAI  region  of  the 
North Pacific. A cooperative for the freezer longline Pacific cod sector will be similar 
to  other  successful  voluntary  harvest  cooperatives  currently  in  place,  including  nu-
merous  BSAI  Pollock  cooperatives  implemented  under  the  American  Fisheries  Act 
(AFA), the offshore cooperative in the Pacific whiting fishery off the coast of Oregon 
and  Washington,  cooperatives  in  the  BSAI  flatfish  trawl  fisheries,  a  cooperative  in 
the  Gulf  of  Alaska  rockfish  fishery,  and  numerous  cooperatives  formed  in  various 
BSAI crab fisheries. A voluntary harvest cooperative for our Coalition members will 
provide the same public and private benefits as experienced by these other rational-
ized fisheries. 

The benefits of a voluntary harvest cooperative are numerous. The support letter 

from the State of Washington Department of Fish & Wildlife sums it up well: 

(1)  improved  safety  at  sea,  (2)  reduced  impacts  to  the  ecosystem,  (3)  stronger 
support  for  sustainable  fishery  management,  (4)  increased  product  quality  and 
supply to consumers, (5) removal of incentives for overcapitalization, and (6) im-
proved financial stability for participants in the cooperative. 

Fishing  in  a  cooperative  will  allow  the  fleet  to  slow  down  the  fishery  and  choose 
better weather in which to fish. No longer will the skipper and crew feel compelled 
to  start  at  midnight  on  January  1  regardless  of  storm  and  ice  conditions.  A  slower 
pace  will  allow  the  crew  more  time  to  rest  and  provide  greater  job  stability  by  ex-
tending the fishery over most of the year. The fleet can be more selective in fishing 
operations  which  will  help  to  reduce  incidental  bycatch  of  non-target  species  and 
have  less  fishing  impact  on  the  environment.  Capital  investment  to  enhance  a  ves-
sel’s  prospects  in  the  ‘‘race  for  fish’’  will  be  converted  to  technology  to  enhance  the 
value of the fishery, reduce waste and lower fuel consumption and the fleet’s carbon 
footprint. 

A  voluntary  harvest  cooperative  requires  100  percent  agreement  because  non- 
members  in  the  same  sector  are  free  to  continue  to  race  for  the  entire  quota.  Over 
the last four and half years, the fishermen in the freezer longline Pacific cod sector 
have worked to establish a cooperative with 100 percent approval of the fishery par-
ticipants. However, despite all of the proven benefits of a cooperative, one company 
with two of the fleet’s 36 vessels has decided it does not want to participate. Faced 
with  this  situation,  Congress  in  the  AFA  adopted  the  approach  we  advocate  here: 
define a sub-pool of the quota which reflects what the non-joiners would reasonably 
be expected to harvest and let them race for it; and leave the remainder for the vol-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

29 

untary  harvest  cooperative  to  manage  under  supervision  of  the  Council  and  Na-
tional Marine Fisheries Service. 

The  legislation  proposed  by  the  Coalition  would  not  grant  any  resources  to  any 
individual, vessel or company. It would not in any manner lessen the North Pacific 
Council’s authority and responsibility to manage and conserve the BSAI cod fishery, 
or to make new or different allocations in the future. It would simply provide a basic 
tool modeled on the AFA that would allow formation of a voluntary harvest coopera-
tive. 

Specifically, it would provide that if 80 percent or more of the fleet wishes to form 
a voluntary harvest cooperative, NMFS will divide the total cod quota for the sector 
into two parts based on historical vessel harvests in a reasonably recent set of years. 
The  cooperative  would  then  manage  the  part  equal  to  the  collective  catch  history 
of its members, and parties wishing to continue the derby style of fishing would be 
free to do that by accessing the collective catch history of the non-cooperative mem-
bers. 

The  owners  of  all  but  two  of  the  36  fishing  vessels  in  our  fleet  have  signed  an 
agreement  to  form  a  voluntary  harvest  cooperative.  There  is  broad  support  for  the 
cooperative  form  of  management  from  other  West  Coast  commercial  fishing  groups 
and harvest cooperatives, as well as fishery management agencies and financial in-
stitutions that provide support for the fleet. All six Alaska Community Development 
Quota  (CDQ)  groups,  representing  65  Alaska  Native  coastal  communities,  support 
legislation  that  will  permit  the  formation  of  a  voluntary  harvest  cooperative,  which 
will provide additional resources for needed economic development in rural western 
Alaska.  The  Environmental  Defense  Fund,  fisheries  scientists  and  safety  organiza-
tions all support this outcome, as does the State of Washington. In its letter of sup-
port, the Director of the Washington Department of Fish & Wildlife states: 

The Washington Department of Fish and Wildlife is strongly in support of coop-
erative  fishing  efforts  for  the  Washington  and  Alaska  based  fleets  operating  in 
Federal waters off the coast of Alaska. . . . WDFW supported the recent actions 
of  the  . . .  Council  in  restructuring  the  Pacific  Cod  fishery  in  the  Bering  Sea 
and  Aleutian  Islands  (Amendment  85),  and  expected  that  the  Freezer  Longline 
sector would be able to form a voluntary cooperative as a result of the Council’s 
action. 

But  formation  of  a  voluntary  harvest  cooperative  has  been  stymied  by  a  single 
company.  The  need  for  a  resolution  is  urgent.  The  fishing  seasons  for  Pacific  cod 
continue  to  shorten,  creating  uncertainty  for  the  industry  and  loss  of  stable  work. 
This year’s ‘‘A’’ season was the shortest on record, as was the year before that, and 
the  year  before  that.  As  fuel  prices  increase  and  the  Pacific  cod  allocation  drops  to 
its  lowest  point  in  recent  years,  participants  are  forced  into  an  increasingly  dan-
gerous race for the fish. Captains and crews fish around the clock, sometimes with-
out  sleep  and  without  regard  to  bad  weather,  to  catch  as  much  of  the  resource  as 
quickly  as  possible  before  the  fishery  is  closed.  The  race  for  fish  encourages  risk- 
taking behavior and is wasteful. Our sector needs the tools necessary to form a vol-
untary harvest cooperative to slow down the fishery and stabilize the industry. 

For  more  than  4  years,  in  a  transparent  process  open  to  all,  our  group  has  tried 
its best to include everyone in a voluntary agreement to form a harvest cooperative, 
but it now appears that without congressional action the race for fish in the Pacific 
cod  longline  sector  will  never  end.  On  behalf  of  all  the  members  of  the  Freezer 
Longline Coalition I respectfully ask the members of the Subcommittee to act quick-
ly  in  introducing  legislation  that  provides  the  fleet  with  tools  needed  to  end  the 
derby style race for fish in the BSAI freezer longline cod fishery. 

The  freezer  longline  sector  of  the  Pacific  cod  fishery  has  a  long  and  positive  his-
tory  of  working  with  fisheries  managers  and  Congress  to  promote  sustainable  fish-
ing practices. Leaders in the fleet have supported Council and Congressional actions 
to eliminate the race for fish, minimize bycatch, and reduce capacity. Establishment 
of a voluntary harvest cooperative is a vital step in this progression, and important 
to the ongoing health of the resource and safety of the fleet. 
American Fisheries Act Vessel Amendment 

The  AFA  vessel  amendment  in  the  House  Coast  Guard  reauthorization  bill  pro-
vides  a  vessel  owner  the  discretion  to  replace,  rebuild  or  retire  an  AFA-qualified 
vessel  when  there  is  a  business  case  to  do  so.  This  proposal  updates  current  law 
that  prohibits  the  replacement  of  any  AFA-qualified  Bering  Sea  pollock  fishing  or 
fish processing vessel except in the calamitous ‘‘event of the actual total loss or con-
structive total loss’’ of the vessel. Current law further limits the flexibility of a ves-
sel  owner  by  essentially  requiring  that  any  such  replacement  vessel  not  exceed  the 
length, tonnage and engine horsepower of the original vessel. Coupled with an exist-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

30 

ing  regulatory  regime  that  essentially  limits  the  rebuilding  of  an  existing  vessel  to 
its  current  length,  vessel  owners  are  restricted  to  business  plans  adopted  in  the 
1980s when virtually the entire fleet of Bering Sea pollock catcher, catcher/processor 
and mothership vessels entered the fishery. 

As explained below, the AFA vessel provision updates current law to promote effi-
ciency,  including  energy  efficiency,  and  enhanced  utilization  of  fishery  resources. 
The  provision  is  intended  to  promote  international  competitiveness  for  U.S.  fishers 
and processors in the largest and one of the most important U.S. fisheries. This pro-
vision  will  not  result  in  overcapitalization  of  the  pollock  fleet  nor  will  it  have  ad-
verse  conservation  impacts.  In  fact,  it  could  further  reduce  fleet  capacity  and  pro-
vide conservation benefits by reducing the environmental footprint of the fleet. 

The AFA provided a three-sector split of the Bering Sea pollock fishery and identi-
fied  either  by  vessel  name  or  qualifying  criteria  the  vessels  eligible  to  participate 
in  each  sector.  While  the  Act  treats  each  sector  of  the  pollock  fishery  (onshore, 
mothership  and  catcher/processor)  somewhat  differently,  the  Act  contemplated  that 
a  fish  harvesting  cooperative,  or  cooperatives,  would  form  within  each  of  the  three 
sectors, and that proved true. Fish harvesting cooperatives establish individual pol-
lock allocations among cooperative members that yield a number of benefits, includ-
ing removing any incentive for employing fish harvesting and fish processing capac-
ity  beyond  what  is  needed  to  optimize  catching  and  processing  of  the  allowable 
quota. 

The  Bering  Sea  pollock  fish  harvesting  cooperatives  established  a  decade  ago  are 
an  unqualified  success.  The  cooperatives  have  achieved  measurable  conservation 
benefits,  resolved  overcapitalization  concerns,  and  resulted  in  economic  and  social 
stability for fishery participants. These improvements are the direct result of ending 
the ‘‘race for fish.’’ In considering the AFA vessel amendment, the first public policy 
question  to  be  addressed  is  whether  allowing  AFA-qualified  vessels  to  be  replaced 
at  the  owners’  discretion  and  without  size  restrictions  will  undermine  fish  har-
vesting  cooperatives  and  spark  a  return  to  a  race  for  fish.  The  answer  is  clearly 
‘‘no.’’  The  efficiencies  achieved  through  individual  allocations  in  terms  of  reducing 
operating  costs  and  increased  revenues  from  optimized  utilization  of  the  resource 
are  so  significant  that  the  cooperative  structures  in  the  Bering  Sea  pollock  fishery 
will be preserved at all costs. 

Continuation  of  the  cooperative  structure  is  ensured  by  other  safeguards  as  well. 
For  example,  the  contractual  cooperative  agreement  among  catcher/processor  sector 
participants  requires  unanimous  consent  among  co-op  members  to  dissolve  the  co- 
op.  In  short,  the  smallest  company  or  the  company  with  the  oldest  and  least  effi-
cient  vessel,  or  vessels,  has  a  veto  against  dissolution  of  the  catcher/processor  co- 
op. With regard to the catcher vessel fleet, the AFA provides a formula for allocating 
pollock  individually  among  qualified  vessels,  so  there  is  no  incentive  to  replace  or 
rebuild  vessels  to  catch  fish  faster  since  individual  allocations  are  fixed  in  the  law. 
Vessel  operators  support  the  AFA  vessel  amendment  because  it  will  allow  them  to 
operate more efficiently within the current co-op structure. 

AFA  vessel  operators  are  seeking  the  amendment  as  a  necessary  means  to  maxi-
mize the value of their individual fish allocations and reduce costs. While the Alas-
ka  pollock  fleet  consists  of  safe  and  seaworthy  vessels,  almost  all  of  the  19  AFA- 
qualified catcher/processors, three at-sea processing mothership vessels, and roughly 
100  catcher  vessels  were  either  built,  or  converted  from  some  other  use,  to  pollock 
fishing  and  fish  processing  vessels  between  1980  and  1990.  The  restrictions  in  cur-
rent  law  regarding  when  a  vessel  can  be  replaced  and  to  what  size  inhibit  further 
improvements in fleet performance. 

With  respect  to  the  catcher/processor  fleet,  the  larger  at-sea  processors  have  on-
board  factories  equipped  to  produce  two  primary  product  forms  derived  from  the 
flesh  of  the  fish—fillet  and  surimi  products.  Surimi  is  a  minced  fish  product  used 
to make imitation crab and other analog products. Larger at-sea processors can also 
accommodate  machinery  for  producing  fish  meal  and  fish  oil  from  inedible  portions 
of  the  pollock  (skin,  bones  and  viscera.)  Although  it  has  a  variety  of  uses,  pollock 
fish  meal  is  most  often  sold  for  fish  feed  in  aquaculture  operations.  Fish  oil,  which 
is  a  byproduct  of  the  fish  meal  production  process,  is  used  in  boilers  onboard  the 
vessels  as  a  substitute  for  diesel  fuel  and  has  the  advantage  of  achieving  both  cost 
savings and lower emissions in generating energy. 

Smaller at-sea processing vessels, however, are limited primarily to employing fil-
let making equipment, which limits product marketing flexibility. Space limitations 
in  the  factory  also  preclude  making  fish  meal  and  fish  oil  from  which  vessel  opera-
tors  can  derive  additional  revenue  and  reduce  costs.  Increasing  vessel  size,  which 
the current AFA does not allow for vessels over 165 feet in length, is the only option 
for vessel operators seeking to enhance utilization and derive more value from their 
assigned quota. Increasing vessel size also allows for increased onboard cold storage 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

31 

capacity. The more product that can be frozen and stored onboard the vessel at any 
one  time  reduces  the  number  of  trips  to  shore  for  offloading,  which  increases  effi-
ciency and reduces fuel costs. 

Passage  of  the  amendment  will  also  help  safeguard  family  wage  fishing  and  fish 
processing  jobs.  Removing  vessel  size  restrictions  that  inhibit,  or  preclude,  invest-
ments  in  new  technology  and  value-added  processing  equipment  helps  U.S.  fishing 
operations compete better against lower foreign labor costs. If our freezer holds are 
filled  with  relatively  unprocessed  fish,  value-added  processing  will  be  performed  in 
China  or  other  countries  with  low  labor  costs.  We  can  keep  these  manufacturing 
jobs  in  the  U.S.,  however,  if  we  have  the  latitude  to  configure  our  vessels  to  take 
full advantage of state-of-the-art processing technologies. 

For  a  catcher  vessel,  increasing  vessel  size  allows  for  greater  fish  hold  capacity. 
Greater  fish  hold  capacity  means  fewer  trips  are  needed  to  catch  an  individual’s 
quota limit, which again means reduced fuel usage and greater efficiency. The AFA 
vessel  amendment  also  contains  a  provision  that  allows  for  the  retirement  of  less 
efficient  or  older  catcher  vessels.  Currently,  as  implemented,  the  AFA  requires  the 
owner  of  a  qualified  catcher  vessel  delivering  to  an  inshore  cooperative  to  provide 
evidence  that  the  vessel  holds  a  valid  fishing  permit  before  the  National  Marine 
Fisheries Service (NMFS) issues that vessel’s annual pollock allocation. As a result, 
a fleet owner with a less efficient vessel, or vessels, who aggregates his or her catch 
allowances and fishes them on more efficient vessels must still moor, maintain and 
insure  vessels  that  are  no  longer  operating  in  the  fishery.  The  same  circumstance 
applies  to  vessel  owners  leasing  their  annual  quota  to  be  harvested  by  owners  of 
other  AFA-qualified  catcher  vessels.  The  AFA  vessel  amendment  allows  for  AFA- 
qualified vessels to be retired and for the owners of such vessels to assign the quota 
to another vessel or vessels. Importantly, any retired AFA-qualified vessel must sur-
render  its  fishery  endorsement  ensuring  that  it  cannot  fish  in  any  other  U.S.  fish-
ery. 

A second public policy question to be answered is whether allowing AFA-qualified 
vessels  to  be  replaced  or  rebuilt  without  constraints  on  size  will  have  negative  ef-
fects  on  other  fisheries.  The  answer  is  ‘‘no.’’  The  AFA  already  imposes  significant 
restrictions  on  participation  by  AFA-qualified  vessels  in  other  fisheries.  The  AFA 
vessel  amendment  adds  more  restrictions.  As  noted  above,  any  replaced  vessel  for-
feits its fishery endorsement, which disqualifies the vessel from participating in any 
other U.S. fishery. The amendment also prohibits any replacement catcher vessel— 
regardless  of  whether  or  not  the  vessel  increases  its  size—from  harvesting  fish  in 
any  region  other  than  the  North  Pacific,  except  for  the  west  coast  Pacific  whiting 
fishery.  The  AFA  already  imposes  this  limitation  on  the  three  AFA-qualified 
motherships  and  19  catcher/processors.  Any  AFA-qualified  rebuilt  vessel  that  in-
creases  beyond  its  current  size  will  also  be  prohibited  from  harvesting  fish  in  any 
region  other  than  the  North  Pacific,  except  for  the  Pacific  whiting  fishery.  Within 
the North Pacific region, any AFA-qualified replacement vessel or rebuilt vessel that 
increases  in  length  beyond  the  vessel  length  specified  on  its  current  groundfish  li-
cense would be prohibited from fishing in the North Pacific’s Gulf of Alaska manage-
ment  area.  In  sum,  the  AFA  vessel  amendment  further  reduces  opportunities  for 
vessels  from  the  Bering  Sea  pollock  fishery  to  ‘‘spillover’’  into  other  U.S.  fisheries. 
The Alaska pollock fishery has a number of strengths. Fish stocks are healthy and 
robust.  The  fishery  has  undergone  an  independent  environmental  audit  and  been 
certified  as  sustainable  by  the  World  Wildlife  Fund-backed  Marine  Stewardship 
Council.  The  value  of  the  Alaska  pollock  fish  products  at  the  primary  processing 
stage  is  nearly  $1.0  billion  annually.  As  one  of  the  largest  fisheries  in  the  world, 
Alaska pollock competes strongly in the very competitive global whitefish commodity 
market. Alaska pollock products are high quality and in strong demand in the U.S., 
Japan, U.K. and EU markets, among others. Passage of the AFA vessel amendment 
will  provide  U.S.  fishers  and  fish  processors  the  flexibility  to  optimize  operations, 
promote fuller utilization of the resource, increase operational efficiency, and main-
tain international competitiveness. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  today  on  these  two  important  issues.  I 
will  be  pleased  to  answer  any  questions  that  you  or  other  Subcommittee  Members 
might have. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you, Mr. Bundy. 
Mr. Hyde, thank you for being here. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

32 

STATEMENT OF MICHAEL HYDE, ADVISER, 

AMERICAN SEAFOODS GROUP 

Mr. HYDE. Good afternoon, Madam Chairman. Thank you for the 

opportunity to speak to the Committee today. 

My  name  is  Mike  Hyde.  I  am  appearing  on  behalf  of  American 
Seafoods  Company.  American  Seafoods  Company  is  based  in  Se-
attle. We have 7 of the 20 eligible AFA catcher/processors. We also 
have  three  freezer  longline  vessels  that  target  cod.  We  have  proc-
essing operations in Alabama and Massachusetts. We have 28 indi-
vidual  owners  and  2  CDQ  group  owners.  The  CDQ  groups  own 
more than half the company and benefit over 9,000 residents in 21 
different communities. 

My  personal  involvement  in  the  North  Pacific  fisheries  has  been 
extensive,  more  than  30  years.  I  have  been  a  deckhand,  a  Federal 
observer, a vessel owner, a lawyer, a fisheries manager. From 1998 
through 2005, I served as the President of American Seafoods Com-
pany  and  was  intimately  involved  in  the  negotiation  of  the  Amer-
ican  Fisheries  Act  and  the  Pollock  Conservation  Cooperative,  the 
cooperative  that  governs  the  catcher/processor  sector  of  the  Bering 
Sea pollock fishery. 

My  plan  is  to  focus  today  on  one  aspect  of  the  American  Fish-
eries  Act.  It  is  the  harvesting  cap  that  was  imposed  as  part  of  the 
legislative  language  of  the  cap.  In  order  to  talk  about  our  position 
on  that,  it  might  be  helpful  to  describe  a  little  bit  of  background 
of the American Fisheries Act. 

When that act was passed, American Seafoods was the dominant 
player in the pollock fishery. We had 16 vessels, all but 2 of which 
we  had  acquired  through  acquisition  of  other  companies.  We  were 
100  percent  foreign  owned,  and  there  was  great  concern  that  be-
cause  of  loopholes  in  the  Americanization  requirements,  that  we 
would  continue  to  be  foreign  owned  and  we  would  continue  to  get 
significantly larger. 

So  as  part  of  the  American  Fisheries  Act,  a  provision  was  in-
cluded  that  said  no  single  company  can  harvest  more  than  17.5 
percent  of  the  directed  pollock  fishery.  That  was  intended  to  keep 
American Seafoods at the level it was anticipated it would have at 
that point. 

The  act  also  included  directions  to  the  North  Pacific  Council  to 
look  at  these  caps  and  to  impose  a  processing  cap  on  the  pollock 
fishery. 

That is how we get to where we are today. We have a processing 
cap that the council adopted of 30 percent, and we continue to have 
a harvesting cap of 17.5 percent. 

This  leads  to  significant  inequities  between  American  Seafoods 
and  our  other  major  competitors,  Trident  Seafoods  and  Nissui  and 
Maruha,  because  those  companies  are  allowed  to  continue  to  proc-
ess  up  to  30  percent,  but  effectively,  because  we  only  can  process 
what we catch, we are limited to 17.5 percent. In the ensuing years 
since the passage of AFA, we have watched these other competitors 
continue to grow while we have remained relatively static. 

Another  issue  that  the  harvesting  cap  creates  for  us  is  because 
it  is  described  as  a  percentage  of  the  pollock  quota,  the  amount 
that  we  can  process  each  year  fluctuates  greatly.  The  harvest  of 
Alaska  pollock  has  ranged  anywhere  from  under  a  million  tons  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

33 

over a million and a half tons. Because we are limited to 17.5 per-
cent of that, the amount that we can catch and process and deliver 
to  our  customers  varies  significantly  year  after  year,  just  another 
issue that faces American Seafoods and its owners that is not faced 
by our major competitors. 

When you look at these sorts of restrictions, you have to say, why 
do we have restrictions? In general the approach is that you should 
not have restrictions on operating and economic efficiencies on com-
panies  unless  you  can  show  that  there  is  a  demonstrated  need.  So 
far, we have not seen that demonstrated need. We have tried to ad-
dress  some  of  the  concerns  that  have  been  raised.  One  of  them  is 
that if American Seafoods is allowed to get bigger, we will take fish 
from other companies. 

The  response  is  simple.  We  cannot  take  fish  from  other  compa-
nies.  We  have  a  rationalized  system,  and  the  only  way  American 
Seafoods can get more fish is if it is able to purchase it from other 
companies. There has to be a willing seller on the other side. 

I have addressed the other arguments that we have heard in my 

written testimony. 

The last issue that I would like to focus on proposed is the issue 
of linkage between the different amendments to the American Fish-
eries  Act.  There  are  three  proposals  that  are  on  the  table  right 
now. 

The first one would allow replacement of existing American Fish-
eries  Act  vessels.  We  have  heard  testimony  about  the  benefits  of 
doing that, and we agree that there are substantial potential bene-
fits.  In  the  American  Fisheries  Act  catcher/processor  fleet,  though, 
safety is not one of those benefits. Nearly all the vessels are classed 
and all the vessels are load-lined. I do not believe there is any safe-
ty  issue  that  our  fleet  faces  that  can  be  addressed  through  a  new 
vessel that has not already been addressed on the existing vessels. 
As  Ms.  Parker’s  testimony  points  out,  the  real  issue  here  is  effi-
ciency  of  the  vessels.  American  Seafoods  has  a  fleet  that  is  phe-
nomenally  efficient  compared  to  our  competitors,  and  the  replace-
ment  vessel  proposal  would  allow  our  competitors  to  build  vessels 
that  are  significantly  more  efficient  than  the  American  Seafoods 
vessels.  The  ramifications  of  that  to  us  are  that  we  are  very  de-
pendent  on  our  CDQ  fisheries.  Ms.  Parker  has  quoted  some  num-
bers in her written testimony. While the actual percentages quoted 
are  incorrect,  she  is  correct  about  the  trend.  American  Seafoods  is 
heavily  dependent  on  the  CDQ  fisheries.  The  reason  that  we  have 
such  a  large  share  of  those  fisheries  is  because  of  the  efficiency  of 
our  vessels.  All  of  that  is  at  risk  if  we  allow  replacement  vessels 
to come in that are more efficient than the American Seafoods ves-
sels. 

In summary, I think the three things that are being proposed in 
connection  with  the  American  Fisheries  Act  all  make  sense,  but 
they really have to be done as a package to be fair to all the play-
ers in the industry. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Hyde follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

34 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MICHAEL HYDE, ADVISER, AMERICAN SEAFOODS GROUP 
Good afternoon, Madame Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee. My name 
is Mike Hyde and I am testifying today on behalf of American Seafoods Group with 
respect  to  the  harvest  cap  restrictions  in  the  American  Fisheries  Act.  I  will  also  be 
pleased to respond to questions about other issues related to North Pacific fisheries. 
As  background,  American  Seafoods  is  a  Seattle  based  company  that  owns  seven  of 
the  twenty  catcher  processors  authorized  under  the  AFA  to  operate  in  the  catcher 
processor sector of the Bering Sea pollock fishery. It also owns three freezer longline 
vessels that operate in the Bering Sea Pacific cod fishery and it operates land-based 
processing plants in Massachusetts and Alabama. The Company employs over 1900 
individuals  and  is  owned  by  a  diverse  group  of  28  individual  owners  and  two  Alas-
kan  Community  Development  Quota  (‘‘CDQ’’)  groups  representing  21  western  Alas-
ka communities and their more than 9000 residents. I have been involved in North 
Pacific  fisheries  for  over  30  years  as  a  deckhand,  Federal  observer,  vessel  owner, 
lawyer  and  vessel  manager.  I  served  as  the  President  of  American  Seafoods  Com-
pany  from  1998  through  2005  and  was  intimately  involved  on  behalf  of  the  Com-
pany in the negotiation of the American Fisheries Act and the formation of the Pol-
lock Conservation Cooperative. 
1. American Fisheries Act History 

The  American  Fisheries  Act  (the  ‘‘AFA’’)  was  adopted  in  October,  1998  after 
months of intense negotiation among industry participants, state and Federal regu-
lators  and  Congressional  staff.  Four  primary  goals  of  the  AFA  were:  (1)  Americani-
zation of vessel ownership, (2) reallocation of pollock to shoreside operations, (3) ra-
tionalization  of  the  Bering  Sea  pollock  fishery  and  (4)  reduction  in  the  size  of  the 
overcapitalized  catcher  processor  fleet.  In  addition,  the  AFA  included  a  number  of 
fishery protection measures. 

In  October,  1998,  American  Seafoods  was  the  largest  participant  in  the  pollock 
fishery  and  was  100  percent  Norwegian-owned.  It  had  expanded  aggressively  from 
its original two catcher processors to sixteen vessels through the acquisition of com-
peting  companies.  Because  of  State  Department  concerns  about  investment  protec-
tion  obligations  between  the  United  States  and  certain  foreign  nations,  the  Ameri-
canization provisions in the AFA were modified from initial drafts to exempt certain 
foreign-owned  companies  from  the  Americanization  requirements  (section  213(g)). 
This  revision  gave  rise  to  concerns  that  American  Seafoods  would  remain  foreign- 
owned  and  continue  to  grow  aggressively.  In  part  to  address  this  concern,  section 
210(e)  (Excessive  Shares)  was  added  to  the  draft  AFA.  Section  210(e)(1)  imposed  a 
limit on the amount of pollock that could be harvested by any one entity: 

Harvesting.  No  particular  individual,  corporation,  or  other  entity  may  harvest, 
through  a  fishery  cooperative  or  otherwise,  a  total  of  more  than  17.5  percent 
of the pollock available to be harvested in the directed pollock fishery. 

The  referenced  percentage  was  the  approximate  amount  of  the  directed  pollock 
fishery that American Seafoods was anticipated to receive in the negotiations to es-
tablish  the  Pollock  Conservation  Cooperative,  the  cooperative  that  rationalized  the 
catcher  processor  sector  of  the  Bering  Sea  pollock  fishery.  This  harvesting  limit  ef-
fectively stopped the growth of what was thought at the time to be a foreign-owned 
pollock  harvesting  company  (as  noted  American  Seafoods  is  now  100  percent  U.S. 
owned). 

In contrast, section 210(e)(2) of the AFA addresses pollock processing (as opposed 

to harvesting) and provides in part: 

Processing.  Under  the  authority  of  section  301(a)(4)  of  the  Magnuson-Stevens 
Act  (16  U.S.C.  1851(a)(4)),  the  North  Pacific  Council  is  directed  to  recommend 
for  approval  by  the  Secretary  conservation  and  management  measures  to  pre-
vent  any  particular  individual  or  entity  from  processing  an  excessive  share  of 
the pollock available to be harvested in the directed pollock fishery. 

At  its  October  2000  meeting,  the  North  Pacific  Council  took  final  action  on  the 
pollock processing cap. The Council analyzed a range of possible caps at 10 percent, 
20 percent and 30 percent. After extensive staff reports, public comment and Coun-
cil discussion, Council members agreed that there was no compelling evidence of any 
benefit  to  be  gained  from  a  processing  cap.  The  feeling  of  the  Council  members  is 
reflected in the statement of Council member Bob Penney: 

Being big ain’t always bad . . . You need big at the times of low, you need the 
flywheel  of  stability,  companies  that  can  tough  it  out.  In  times  of  good  times, 
nobody  likes  big,  but  you  like  them  when  it’s  low  because  they’re  in  it  for  the 
long  haul,  they  have  to  stay,  they  bring  stability.  Now,  we  don’t  know  for  sure 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

35 

what’s  going  to  affect  this  cap,  what’s  going  to  come  out  of  it.  But  those  people 
have  the  capital,  they  can’t  quit,  they  have  to  stay  and  they  become  like  a 
flywheel in times of down markets. So don’t think of good times, think of down 
times, you need big in bad times. 

Although the sentiment of Council members was that no processing cap was nec-
essary,  the  Council  acknowledged  the  mandate  from  Congress  in  the  AFA  and 
adopted  the  highest  cap  in  the  range  that  it  analyzed,  a  processing  cap  of  30  per-
cent. 
2. Issues 

As  a  general  principle,  governmental  restrictions  on  economic  and  operating  effi-
ciencies  of  private  companies  should  be  limited  to  circumstances  in  which  a  need 
for  a  restriction  is  identified  and  the  proposed  restriction  is  fair  and  equitable  and 
addresses  the  identified  need.  American  Seafoods  believes  that  the  current  har-
vesting  cap  fails  to  meet  either  of  these  criteria  and  should  be  raised  to  at  least 
match the current processing cap. 
a. Harvesting vs. Processing Caps. 

As mentioned above, the North Pacific Council members examined in great detail 
the  need  for  processing  caps  and  based  on  their  conclusion  that  no  need  had  been 
identified,  set  the  pollock  processing  cap  at  30  percent—the  highest  level  they  had 
analyzed.  We  believe  that  if  the  Council  had  examined  the  need  for  a  pollock  har-
vesting cap, the Council would have reached the same conclusion and these two caps 
would be equal. Unfortunately, because the harvesting cap was established by Con-
gress before the Council acted on the processing cap, the two caps are not the same 
and  create  a  very  unequal  playing  field  between  catcher  processors  and  other  proc-
essors. 

The only sector of the Bering Sea pollock fishery in which the American Seafoods 
vessels are allowed to operate is the catcher processor sector. Catcher processors are 
vessels that perform exactly as the name implies: they catch fish and process them 
directly  onboard.  Because  the  only  source  of  pollock  for  a  catcher  processor  is  the 
fish  that  it  catches  itself,  its  operations  will  always  be  limited  by  the  lower  of  any 
applicable  harvesting  or  processing  cap.  This  has  created  the  inequitable  situation 
in  the  Bering  Sea  pollock  fishery  that  American  Seafoods  is  limited  to  harvesting 
and processing a maximum of 17.5 percent of the directed pollock catch while large 
competitors such as Trident Seafoods, Nissui and Maruha can effectively control the 
harvesting and processing of up to 30 percent of the directed pollock catch. 

In  the  mothership  and  shoreside  sectors  of  the  pollock  fishery,  processors  insure 
the  delivery  of  pollock  to  their  processing  plants  through  the  restrictions  on  the 
movement  of  catcher  vessels  that  were  included  in  the  AFA,  through  delivery  re-
strictions in each of the coop agreements and through private contracts directly with 
those  catcher  vessels  that  the  processors  do  not  already  own.  The  harvesting  cap 
does not restrict the amount those companies process because, in contrast to catcher 
processors,  motherships  and  shoreside  processors  simply  arrange  for  third  parties 
to  catch  and  deliver  those  amounts  of  pollock  that  if  caught  by  their  own  boats 
would cause them to exceed the 17.5 percent harvesting cap. 

For  all  Bering  Sea  processors  (including  catcher  processors),  the  important  sta-
tistic  is  not  how  much  fish  you  catch  but  how  much  fish  you  process.  The  majority 
of  processed  pollock  is  sold  in  export  markets  and  the  strength  of  a  company  in 
international  markets  is  significantly  dependent  on  the  volume  of  processed  fish  it 
controls.  American  Seafoods  competes  with  a  large  handicap  when  Trident,  Nissui 
and  Maruha  can  control  up  to  30  percent  of  the  Bering  Sea  pollock  and  American 
Seafoods  has  access  to  only  17.5  percent  of  the  directed  pollock  fishery  plus  those 
amounts  of  the  CDQ  pollock  allocation  that  the  Company  can  lease  from  CDQ 
groups. 
b. Operating Stability. 

The harvesting cap limits any company to harvesting a maximum of 17.5 percent 
of  the  directed  pollock  fishery.  Because  this  cap  is  set  as  a  percentage  rather  than 
as  a  fixed  amount,  it  causes  unreasonable  restraints  on  American  Seafoods’  ability 
to maintain a steady business operation. The total allowable catch of pollock in the 
Bering  Sea  fluctuates  widely.  In  recent  years,  the  quota  has  ranged  from  a  low  of 
less  than  1.0  million  metric  tons  to  a  high  of  nearly  1.5  million  metric  tons.  When 
the  quota  is  near  the  top  of  the  cycle,  nearly  all  of  the  AFA-eligible  catcher  proc-
essors are used in order to provide the necessary capacity to harvest the quota. On 
the other hand, when the quota is near the low end of the cycle, all operators could 
benefit from the option to harvest and process the fish through quota lease arrange-
ments  aboard  the  most  efficient  vessels  in  the  fleet,  most  of  which  belong  to  Amer-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

36 

ican Seafoods. However, because the harvest cap limits the percentage of the pollock 
quota that American Seafoods can harvest, when the quota drops, so does the limit 
on  American  Seafoods  which  forces  the  less  efficient  vessels  to  continue  operations. 
In addition to reducing the overall operating efficiency of the fleet, the harvesting 
cap works to reduce economic efficiency and market stability. To achieve the highest 
prices  and  create  stable  relationships,  a  supplier  needs  to  be  reliable.  While  shore-
side  and  mothership  processors  have  no  effective  limit  on  how  much  they  process, 
American Seafoods’ production varies widely year to year. Given the opportunity, in 
low quota years American Seafoods would lease quota at market rates from the less 
efficient  operators  who  could  maximize  their  gain  by  leasing  quota.  However,  the 
current harvesting cap makes that impossible. This leads to less efficient vessels op-
erating  in  the  reduced  pollock  fishery,  depriving  both  American  Seafoods  and  the 
owners  of  the  less  efficient  vessels  from  maximizing  operating  and  economic  effi-
ciencies. 
c. Concerns? 

It  is  natural  to  expect  companies  that  hope  to  acquire  additional  quota  to  oppose 
the lifting of restrictions that handicap only their competitors. If a statutory restric-
tion  removes  American  Seafoods  from  the  quota  marketplace,  thereby  allowing  a 
competitor  to  purchase  quota  at  a  reduced  value,  it  is  predictable  that  the  compet-
itor will hope to maintain that restriction. What is unclear is whether there are le-
gitimate  reasons  to  maintain  the  harvesting  cap  at  its  current  level.  Because  we 
have not heard publicly from opponents of raising the harvesting cap, I will address 
those concerns that have been described to us in meetings with Congressional staff. 
1. American Seafoods will drive us out of business. In an Olympic style race for 
fish,  the  least  efficient  operators  are  always  at  risk  of  being  hurt  by  the  most 
efficient  operators.  However,  in  the  rationalized  pollock  fishery  created  by  the 
AFA,  each  company  operates  with  its  individual  quota  and  the  most  efficient 
operators pose no risk to others. If the harvest cap is increased, American Sea-
foods cannot unilaterally impact any other company’s quota. In order for Amer-
ican  Seafoods  to  purchase  or  lease  additional  quota,  there  has  to  be  a  willing 
seller on the other side of the transaction and any company that is not a willing 
seller will not be impacted. 
2. American Seafoods will purchase all available quota. History has proven that 
this  concern  is  not  warranted.  Since  implementation  of  the  AFA,  the  owners  of 
four  of  the  seven  catcher  vessels  that  received  allocations  of  catcher  processor 
quota under the AFA have been sold. The quota amounts on each of these ves-
sels was small enough that American Seafoods could have purchased them and 
remained  under  the  harvesting  cap.  In  fact,  American  purchased  only  one  of 
these  four  vessels  and  it  was  the  one  with  the  smallest  quota.  The  other  three 
vessels were all purchased by separate catcher processor companies. 
3. A larger American Seafoods will drive down market prices. This argument re-
flects just the opposite of what is likely to occur in the event of a larger Amer-
ican  Seafoods.  Of  the  four  major  processors  in  the  Bering  Sea  pollock  industry, 
American  Seafoods  is  the  only  one  that  is  not  heavily  vertically  integrated. 
Vertically integrated companies such as Nissui or Maruha are not hurt by lower 
commodity prices because they can make up the loss they incur on lower priced 
raw  materials  upon  the  sale  of  higher  margin  finished  goods.  American  Sea-
foods  does  not  have  that  opportunity  and  therefore  has  the  motivation  to  de-
mand the highest possible prices for its processed pollock. These higher market 
prices  then  benefit  not  only  American  Seafoods  but  other  smaller  processing 
companies  and  even  the  fishermen  to  the  extent  they  are  paid  based  on  reve-
nues to the pollock processor. 

d. AFA Amendment Package. 

Industry  participants  have  proposed  three  amendments  to  the  AFA.  Each  pro-
posed  amendment  is  intended  to  provide  vessel  owners  with  new  flexibility  to  im-
prove the efficiencies and economics of their operations. However, each of the three 
proposed amendments is likely to benefit only a subset of AFA participants. The re-
placement vessel provision is likely to benefit only those owners with the least effi-
cient  vessels.  For  companies  such  as  American  Seafoods,  whose  vessels  are  already 
among  the  most  efficient  vessels  in  the  fleet,  it  is  actually  a  competitive  disadvan-
tage to allow others to build new and more efficient vessels. American Seafoods har-
vests  a  large  percentage  of  the  CDQ  pollock  because  its  vessels  are  already  highly 
efficient,  giving  it  both  the  capacity  and  the  financial  strength  to  pay  high  CDQ 
lease rates. This competitive advantage will be lost to any new replacement vessels. 
The  inshore  permit  stacking  provision  will  be  a  huge  benefit  to  vessel  owners  who 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

37 

will  be  allowed  to  combine  quotas  on  a  limited  number  of  vessels  and  retire  their 
least  efficient  vessels  but  it  will  benefit  only  participants  in  the  inshore  sector  and 
does  not  even  extend  to  the  catcher  vessels  in  the  other  two  pollock  sectors.  Al-
though the increase in the harvest cap will apply to all companies, realistically, only 
those  companies  that  are  at  or  near  the  current  harvest  cap  are  likely  to  benefit. 
Each  of  these  three  provisions  provides  relief  from  unnecessary  restrictions  and 
should  be  supported.  However,  it  is  critical  that  they  be  supported  as  a  package  so 
that  the  benefits  of  any  AFA  amendments  are  spread  equitably  among  all  of  the 
AFA  participants.  This  balanced  approach  is  consistent  with  the  approach  taken 
when  the  AFA  was  originally  enacted  and  should  be  continued  in  any  AFA  amend-
ment package. 

In  summary,  the  current  harvest  cap  has  created  an  unequal  playing  field  that 
has  unfairly  disadvantaged  American  Seafoods.  It  has  created  economic  and  oper-
ating inefficiencies that are not producing offsetting value. We respectfully ask that 
this  committee  look  favorably  on  legislation  to  increase  the  AFA  harvesting  cap  as 
part of a balanced AFA amendment package. 

Thank you for your time. I am pleased to answer any questions. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you for your testimony. 
Ms. Parker, welcome. Thank you for being here. We look forward 

to your testimony. 

STATEMENT OF DONNA PARKER, DIRECTOR, GOVERNMENT 

AFFAIRS, ARCTIC STORM MANAGEMENT GROUP 

Ms.  PARKER.  Thank  you,  Madam  Chair,  and  thank  you  for  the 

opportunity to testify today. 

My  name  is  Donna  Parker.  I  represent  Arctic  Storm,  a  company 
based  in  Seattle.  We  have  two  catcher/processors  and  two  catcher 
vessels  with  long  histories  in  this  industry.  All  four  of  them  are 
AFA-qualified. 

I  am  going  to  speak  on  two  issues.  One  is  in  support  of  mod-
ernization  of  the  fleet  through  rebuild  and  replacement,  and  the 
other  is  in  opposition  to  increasing  the  excessive  harvesting  share 
cap. 

In  support  of  the  modernization,  Congress  passed  the  American 
Fisheries  Act  for  a  number  of  reasons,  but  primarily  to  resolve 
chronic  overcapitalization  of  the  Bering  Sea  pollock  fishery.  And 
there  were  two  components  to  that  that  AFA  provided  a  tool  box 
to  solve.  One  was  the  buyback.  Another  was  a  formation  of  co-ops. 
There  was  a  lot  of  uncertainty  surrounding  these.  It  was  un-
known  whether  the  co-ops  would  form.  It  was  unknown  whether 
the  buybacks  were  sufficient.  For  that  reason,  there  were  con-
straints  put  in  on  the  rebuild  and  replacement  of  these  vessels  so 
that  we  would  not  have  a  huge  capitalization  problem  all  over 
again. 

As  those  before  me  have  testified,  AFA  has  been  a  remarkable 
success. The co-ops have formed. The buyback was successful. And 
so  what  we  have  now  are  older  vessels  that  have  to  compete  in  a 
world  economy  with  one  hand  tied  behind  their  backs.  I  will  give 
you an example. A 30-year-old Cadillac, marvelous vehicle, kept in 
prime  shape  by  replacing  parts  in  a  race  across  the  country  with 
BMWs,  Audis,  and  Mitsubishis.  It  is  going  to  get  there.  Everyone 
will  arrive  safely,  but  it  will  be  a  lot  more  expensive  in  terms  of 
gas and the repairing of parts along the way. 

I will give you a couple of examples for our own vessels. The Arc-
tic  Fjord  is  285  feet  compared  to  the  Arctic  Storm,  which  is  325. 
That  difference  causes  a  difference  of  650  tons  of  freezer  hold  ca-
pacity, which means the Fjord has to leave the fishing grounds five 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

38 

times more than the other boat. That is a quarter a million gallons 
in extra fuel. That increases our costs. 

Additionally, a fish oil plant, which would supplement our diesel 

fuel 1,200 to 2,500 gallons a day, needs additional space. 

Additionally,  a  fish  meal  plant,  which  turns  fish  waste  into  fish 
food,  and  increases  our  recovery  rates  from  2.5  to  5  percent  is  not 
possible  unless  we  can  do  a  rebuilding  of  our  vessels,  an  increase 
in size if necessary. 

So  again,  allow  us  to  compete  in  the  world  marketplace.  The 
overcapitalization will not occur because of the success of AFA, and 
the spill-over effects, as Mr. Bundy said, have been constrained on 
other  fisheries  in  Alaska,  other  fisheries  in  the  United  States.  So 
we urge you to support that. 

In regards to the excessive share cap, as I said, Americanization, 
overcapitalization,  and  reallocation  were  primary  purposes  of  the 
American  Fisheries  Act.  What  it  was  is  really  a  course  correction. 
The Magnuson-Stevens Act was passed in 1976. One of its primary 
purposes was to Americanize the fishery. But that is not what hap-
pened.  What  happened  is  that  within  a  matter  of  10  years,  there 
was  extreme  overcapitalization.  Too  much  of  it  went  offshore.  Too 
much of it went to foreign ownership. AFA was a course correction 
which  set  limits  on  that,  required  Americanization,  shifted  15  per-
cent  of  the  offshore  to  the  inshore  through  the  buy-out  provision, 
as well as a reallocation, and changed the ownership requirements. 
What  that  did  is  allowed,  through  that  buy-out,  a  transition.  It 
established a cap, as Mr. Hyde said, at 17.5 percent. And American 
was  really  the  poster  child  for  all  that,  a  very  efficient  organiza-
tion,  but  it  was  very  large,  very  offshore,  very  foreign.  So  it  was 
capped at this. 

When  the  processing  cap  was  established  inshore,  there  were 
only six inshore companies as opposed to 130 harvesting vessels. So 
it  is  really  apples  and  oranges.  There  is  nothing  constraining 
American  from  increasing  its  processing  shares  or  increasing  its 
CDQ. American, because it is large, because it is more competitive, 
has  been  able  to  increase  its  CDQ  share,  and  they  can  increase  it 
more. 

But there are three issues at stake here. 
One  is  this  does  not  apply  just  to  American  Seafoods.  We  are 
talking  about  them  because  they  are  raising  the  issue.  It  applies 
to  all  participants.  And  if  the  harvesting  share  were  to  match  the 
processing  share,  then  all  the  shore-based  processors  could  buy  all 
their catcher vessels, and the more that they buy, the less competi-
tive and the less ability of the individual catcher vessels to survive. 
Furthermore,  as  I  said,  they  are  unconstrained.  They  can  pur-

chase more CDQ. 

And  finally,  if  30  percent  or  something  like  is  the  number,  what 
you are really saying is four players can control the largest fishery 
in  the  United  States.  So  the  real  question  is  putting  too  much  of 
the  fishery  into  too  few  hands.  What  do  you  want  it  to  look  like? 
Do  you  want  independent  catcher  vessels?  Do  you  want  multiple 
players?  At  some  point,  big  is  too  big  and  the  smaller  players  are 
marginalized and unable to compete. 

So,  for  instance,  in  our  company  where  we  have  primarily  five 
families that own the boats, and they are passing it on to their gen-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

39 

erations, is it going to be marginally able to compete, or is it going 
to put it at a disadvantage and end up in a situation where it sells 
to  a  corporation?  So  do  you  want  families  or  corporations  owning 
the fishery? 

Thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Parker follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DONNA PARKER, DIRECTOR, GOVERNMENT AFFAIRS, 

ARCTIC STORM MANAGEMENT GROUP 

Madame Chairman, Members of the Committee: 
Thank you for the opportunity to appear before the Members of the Subcommittee 
and to provide testimony on these important fishery issues. I am Donna Parker, the 
Director  of  Government  Affairs  for  Arctic  Storm  Management  Group.  Arctic  Storm 
is based in Seattle, Washington and operates four commercial fishing vessels in the 
North  Pacific  and  West  Coast  fisheries.  Two  of  the  vessels  are  catcher-processors 
that  harvest  and  process  seafood  and  two  are  catcher  vessels.  All  four  vessels  have 
a long history of participation in the development of these fisheries and all four are 
American Fisheries Act (AFA)-qualified vessels that participate as members in AFA 
pollock fishing cooperatives. 

I am here to testify today on two issues of interest to this Subcommittee. My first 
comments are intended to speak in strong support of amending the American Fish-
eries  Act  (AFA)  to  promote  vessel  safety  and  the  economic  competitiveness  of  the 
Alaska pollock fishery by providing vessel owners with discretion to replace, rebuild 
or retire an AFA-qualified vessel. The focus of my other comments will be in opposi-
tion  to  amending  the  AFA  excessive  harvesting  share  cap.  There  has  been  an  at-
tempt to link these two issues which we believe is without merit. 
Support Amendment to Replace, Rebuild and Retire AFA Qualified Vessels 
Congress passed the American Fisheries Act (AFA) in 1998, principally, to resolve 
chronic  overcapitalization  in  the  Nation’s  largest  fishery,  the  Bering  Sea  (BS)  pol-
lock  fishery.  The  AFA  included  a  buyback  of  certain  fishing  vessels  and  created  a 
framework that allowed the three industry sectors—onshore, mothership and catch-
er/processor—to  form  fish  harvesting  cooperatives  for  the  purpose  of  ‘‘rationalizing’’ 
the  fishery.  Rationalizing  fisheries  means  ending  the  often  wasteful  race  among 
fishery  participants  to  catch  as  much  of  the  available  quota  as  quickly  as  possible. 
Uncertain  whether  the  vessel  buyback  program  and  formation  of  fish  harvesting 
cooperatives  would  succeed,  Congress  included  an  additional  measure  intended  to 
address  excess  capacity.  The  AFA  included  strict  limitations  on  replacing  vessels 
identified in the Act as eligible to participate in the BS pollock fishery. 

The  AFA  has  proven  to  be  an  unqualified  success.  The  vessel  buyback  provisions 
and  the  fish  harvesting  cooperatives  instituted  in  all  sectors  of  the  fishery  have  re-
solved  overcapitalization  in  the  fishery.  The  fish  harvesting  cooperatives  are  pri-
marily responsible for resolving overcapitalization as they effectively remove any in-
centive to employ fishing capacity beyond what is needed to catch the allowable fish-
ing quota in a deliberate, economically rational manner. 
Removing  Unnecessary  Restrictions  on  Vessel  Replacement  Promotes  Safety, 

Efficiency and International Competitiveness 

Under  current  law,  the  AFA  permits  the  replacement  of  an  AFA-eligible  vessel 
only  in  such  limited  instances  where  a  qualified  vessel  is  rendered  an  ‘‘actual  total 
loss  or  constructive  total  loss.’’  The  Act  should  be  amended  to  allow  AFA-qualified 
vessels  to  be  replaced  at  the  owners’  discretion.  Because  of  the  AFA’s  success  in 
rationalizing  the  BS  pollock  fishery,  restrictions  on  replacing  or  improving  vessels, 
including  arbitrary  limits  on  vessel  length,  tonnage  or  engine  horsepower,  are  no 
longer necessary. 

Most AFA vessels were built in the 1980s. Confining their operations to business 
plans  and  technology  available  thirty  years  ago  does  not  make  sense  in  a  global 
economy. In any modern business, in order to remain competitive you have to oper-
ate  efficiently.  Under  the  current  restrictions  of  the  AFA,  vessel  owners  are  often 
constrained  by  space  limitations  that  force  them  to  operate  less  efficiently.  For  in-
stance, smaller boats are constrained in their ability to operate both surimi and fil-
let  lines  to  meet  the  needs  of  the  market  and  the  appetites  of  the  U.S.  consumer. 
Space limitations also constrain the ability to install fish meal plants that allow full 
utilization  of  the  fishery  byproducts,  fish  oil  plants  that  convert  fish  waste  into  a 
substitute  for  diesel  fuel,  and  increased  cargo  hold  capacity  which  reduces  the 
amount of trips required to unload the vessel. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

40 

For instance, one of our catcher-processors, the Arctic Fjord packs 920 tons of fin-
ished product while the larger, Arctic Storm, packs 1540 tons. That difference in ca-
pacity  forces  the  Fjord  to  make  five  additional  trips  a  year  to  and  from  the  fishing 
grounds  to  unload  product  using  approximately  220,000  gallons  of  fuel.  At  current 
costs  of  $4.20/gallon,  these  trips  increase  operating  costs  substantially.  It  also  con-
tributes  to  unnecessarily  extending  our  carbon  footprint  at  a  time  when  reduction 
of carbon usage has been identified as a high priority. Related to that issue is need-
ed  space  to  construct  a  fish  oil  conversion  plant.  Use  of  fish  oil  to  fuel  a  catcher- 
processor  is  expected  to  offset  diesel  fuel  consumption  by  1,200  to  2,500  gallons  a 
day. Like several other AFA catcher-processors, the Arctic Fjord is not large enough 
to  accommodate  construction  of  a  fish  meal  plant  without  rebuilding  the  hull.  Fish 
meal plants turn fish waste into fish food for aquaculture operations in Asia. It also 
increases our recovery rates by approximately 2.5 to 5 percent of round weight. 

For  a  catcher  vessel,  increasing  vessel  size  allows  for  greater  hold  capacity  and 
so  reduces  the  number  of  trips  needed  to  harvest  its  catch  quota.  The  proposed 
amendment also contains a provision that allows for retirement of less efficient and 
aging vessels. Currently, AFA requires that the owner of a catcher vessel delivering 
to  a  shoreside  cooperative  maintain  that  vessel  and  permit  in  order  to  receive  its 
annual  allocation  of  pollock.  The  AFA  vessel  amendment  allows  AFA-qualified 
catcher  vessels  to  be  retired  and  for  the  owners  of  such  vessels  to  assign  the  quota 
to another vessel or vessels. To avoid negative impacts to other fisheries, any retired 
AFA-qualified vessel must surrender its fishery endorsement and so cannot partici-
pate in other U.S. fisheries. 

Because  current  regulations  prevent  us  from  replacing  our  existing  vessels,  we 
must  replace  parts  of  the  vessels  piece  by  piece  as  they  wear  out.  We  are  forced  to 
figure out how to make these hulls last forever without the opportunity to take ad-
vantage  of  more  efficient  technology  available  to  our  industry.  While  the  AFA  fleet 
is operated and maintained to ensure maximum safety conditions, it seems counter 
to the promotion of the safety of human life at sea, as called for in National Stand-
ard 10 of the Magnuson-Stevens Act, to prohibit AFA-eligible vessels from being re-
placed  or  efficiently  rebuilt  using  state-of-the-art  technology  and  architectural  de-
signs that can simultaneously accomplish premium safety and efficiency. 

The  arbitrary  limits  on  length,  tonnage  and  engine  horsepower  of  replacement 
vessels  stipulated  in  the  AFA  are  unnecessary.  To  help  foster  safety,  product  qual-
ity,  innovation  and  efficiency—all  of  which  contribute  to  Alaska  pollock  producers 
remaining  competitive  in  the  international  whitefish  market—it  is  critically  impor-
tant  to  remove  limitations  in  current  law  on  replacement  of  AFA-qualified  vessels. 
The  Success  of  Fish  Harvesting  Cooperatives  Demonstrates  That  There  Will  Be  No 
from  Removing  Restrictions  on 

Adverse  Fishery  Management 
Replacement Vessels 

Impacts 

The  fish  harvesting  cooperatives  in  the  BS  pollock  fishery  made  possible  by  the 
AFA  are  an  unqualified  success.  Under  the  cooperatives,  qualified  fishermen  enter 
into  contractual  arrangements  specifying  each  individual’s  share  of  the  catch.  Fish-
ing and processing then proceeds in the most efficient manner to enhance utilization 
and maximize the value of harvested fishery resources. Prior to passage of the AFA, 
the  BS  pollock  fleet  could  catch  the  entire  year’s  quota  in  approximately  90  days. 
Since  1998,  the  length  of  the  fishing  season  has  doubled.  In  the  catcher-processor 
sector, although 19 vessels are eligible to participate in the fishery, each year three 
or four of the less efficient vessels remain in port. The Pollock Conservation Cooper-
ative  (PCC)—the  catcher-processor  sector  fish  harvesting  cooperative—reports  that 
due  to  the  deliberate  pace  of  fishing  and  use  of  the  most  efficient  vessels,  the  fleet 
is  producing  nearly  50  percent  more  fish  products  per  pound  of  fish  harvested  than 
what the fleet achieved under the pre-AFA ‘‘race for fish’’ system. Removing unnec-
essary  restrictions  in  the  AFA  on  replacement  vessels  will  allow  for  more  improve-
ments in this area. 

There  are  also  demonstrated  conservation  benefits  of  cooperative  fishing.  While 
the mid-water trawl Alaska pollock fishery has always ranked as one of the world’s 
‘‘cleanest’’  fisheries,  under  the  fishing  cooperative  less  than  0.5  percent  of  what  is 
harvested  is  discarded.  Prior  to  formation  of  cooperatives,  discard  rates  were  some-
what higher. Eliminating the ‘‘race for fish’’ has allowed fishermen to target market- 
sized pollock, utilize more of any incidental catches of non-target species, and to in-
stitute voluntary bycatch reduction programs to minimize incidental catches of non- 
target species. 

It  is  also  important  to  note  that  there  will  be  no  effects  on  other  fisheries  as  a 
result  of  removing  restrictions  on  replacing  or  improving  AFA-eligible  vessels.  The 
AFA  provides  for  strict  limits  on  participation  by  AFA-qualified  fishing  vessels  in 
other  fisheries,  and  this  proposal  increases  those  safeguards.  For  instance,  any  re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

41 

placed  vessel  is  prohibited  from  participating  in  any  fishery  outside  the  North  Pa-
cific  and  the  West  Coast  hake  fishery.  And  any  rebuilt  or  replaced  vessel  that  in-
creases  its  length  would  be  prohibited  from  fishing  in  the  Gulf  of  Alaska.  Any  re-
tired  AFA-qualified  vessel  must  surrender  its  fishery  endorsement  ensuring  it  can-
not  fish  in  any  other  U.S.  fishery.  In  this  way  all  other  fishery  participants  in  the 
U.S.  are  protected  from  enhanced  efficiencies  gained  by  replaced,  rebuilt  or  retired 
AFA vessels. 

In  sum,  the  AFA  has  succeeded  in  removing  excess  capacity  from  the  BS  pollock 
fishery.  The  advent  of  fish  harvesting  cooperatives  has  removed  any  incentive  for 
increasing fishing effort and created opportunities for maximizing utilization of fish-
ery  resources.  We  urge  that  the  overly  restrictive  replacement  vessel  language  of 
AFA be amended to enable Alaska pollock producers to meet national fishery policy 
objectives of promoting the safety of life at sea and to enhance efficiency and inter-
national competitiveness in the Nation’s largest fishery. 
Oppose  Amendment  of  the  AFA  17.5  percent  Excessive  Harvesting  Share 

Cap 

The  AFA  has  been  remarkably  successful  in  stabilizing  the  Bering  Sea  pollock 
fishery,  once  marred  by  bitter  allocation  battles  that  devalued  the  fishery  and  hurt 
all  participants  as  well  as  the  U.S.  consumer.  When  the  AFA  was  enacted  in  Octo-
ber  1998,  it  provided  the  tools  to  accomplish  four  primary  goals;  Americanization, 
decapitalization,  reallocation  and  rationalization.  During  detailed  negotiations  each 
of  these  goals  were  balanced  in  order  to  make  the  others  possible.  One  of  the  key 
provisions  was  to  reduce  the  dominance  of  American  Seafoods  which  had  grown 
from  three  to  16  vessels  in  8  years.  Some  of  these  vessels  were  financed  and  built 
in  Norwegian  shipyards.  They  were  among  the  largest  and  most  modern  vessels 
built during the late 1980s and so contributed to the over-capitalization of the Ber-
ing Sea pollock fishery during the 1990s. 

The AFA authorized a $90 million payment to American Seafoods to permanently 
remove nine of the 16 vessels from the fishery reducing its historical harvest share 
to  17.5  percent.  The  Federal  Government  paid  American  $20  million  and  the  re-
maining  $70  million  is  a  federally  guaranteed  loan  still  being  paid  off  by  catcher 
vessels  participating  in  the  inshore  fishery.  This  action  accomplished  two  goals;  it 
reallocated an additional 10 percent of the pollock fishery to the inshore sector and 
it reduced the dominance of a single company in the Nation’s largest fishery. While 
other companies could have offered vessels for sale under this arrangement, it made 
most sense for American to offer its most inefficient vessels for sale in exchange for 
keeping  its  most  efficient  vessels.  To  its  credit,  participation  by  American  in  this 
arrangement was a critical ingredient to the successful negotiation of AFA. 

To  ensure  future  balance  and  diversity  in  the  industry,  an  excessive  harvesting 
share cap of 17.5 percent was installed as a key feature of the AFA. American Sea-
foods now proposes to increase the harvesting cap and has argued that this increase 
is linked to the proposed amendment which would allow AFA vessels to rebuild, re-
place  or  retire  aging  AFA  vessels.  The  rationale  for  this  linkage  is  unclear  but 
seems to focus on two issues. 

The first issue is concern that if AFA vessels are allowed to become more efficient, 
some participants may have an incentive to terminate the Pollock Conservation Co-
operative  (PCC)  and  return  to  a  race  for  fish.  This  issue  was  remedied  when  mem-
bers  of  the  PCC  agreed  to  require  unanimous  consent  by  all  members  to  terminate 
the coop. This means, the offshore catcher-processor cooperative which allocates har-
vest  shares  among  members  could  not  be  terminated  unless  all  participants  agreed 
to  it.  In  this  way  American  Seafoods  and  all  other  members  would  not  be  put  at 
risk of losing its share of pollock due to modification of the AFA rebuild and replace-
ment provisions. 

The second issue seems to be concern that in setting the 17.5 percent cap, Amer-
ican  was  allowed  to  operate  the  most  efficient  fleet.  In  allowing  other  vessels  to 
modernize, the argument seems to be that American is losing its competitive advan-
tage  and  should  be  compensated  by  allowing  it  to  increase  its  market  share.  In 
other  words,  if  American  Seafoods  is  unable  to  increase  its  market  share,  the  re-
maining  fleet  should  not  be  permitted  to  effectively  compete  in  the  world  market-
place. 

Importantly,  these  arguments  have  failed  to  persuade  most  AFA  participants  to 
support an increase in the harvest share cap, including other companies that are ei-
ther  approaching  the  cap  or  are  currently  limited  by  the  cap.  Most  participants  feel 
that,  in  allowing  the  pollock  fleet  to  modernize,  the  proposed  amendment  to  rebuild 
and replace vessels levels the playing field rather than disadvantages any one partic-
ipant. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

42 

It  should  also  be  noted  that  in  owning  17.5  percent  of  the  pollock  fishery  har-
vesting capacity, American controls 40 percent of the offshore sectors allocation. Ad-
ditionally,  American  also  harvests  most  of  the  Community  Development  Quota 
(CDQ) which is not subject to the harvesting cap. The CDQ quota comprises 10 per-
cent of the Bering Sea pollock fishery. Before AFA, American harvested only 5 per-
cent  of  the  CDQ  quota.  Today,  it  harvests  about  two-thirds  of  the  CDQ  quota.  In 
so  doing,  it  has  increased  its  total  harvesting  share  to  about  23  percent  of  the  Na-
tion’s largest fishery. 

For our company and others, this issue is simply one of putting too much control 
in the hands of too few. At some point, a much larger company puts smaller compa-
nies  at  a  significant  disadvantage  and  destabilizes  the  fishery.  For  the  Bering  Sea 
fishery,  that  point  has  been  established  at  17.5  percent  of  the  harvesting  capacity. 
The majority of Bering Sea participants have not been persuaded that a compelling 
reason exists to change that excessive share limit. We continue to believe that a cap 
set  at  17.5  percent  is  a  critical  part  of  the  AFA  package  and,  if  increased,  may  de-
stabilize  the  fishery.  We  do  not  believe  updating  AFA  vessel  rebuild  and  replace-
ment requirements will destabilize the pollock fishery or disadvantage any one com-
pany.  These  are  two  separate  issues  and  should  be  treated  separately.  Specifically, 
the  safety  and  efficiency  of  the  entire  AFA  fleet  should  not  be  jeopardized  by  the 
desire of a single company to exceed the current harvest share limit. 

Finally,  American  Seafoods  is  an  efficient  and  well  managed  seafood  company. 
After  passage  of  the  AFA,  American  was  quick  to  comply  with  Americanization  of 
its  ownership.  It  has  diversified  its  operations  nationally  and  internationally.  It  is 
a well-respected participant in the pollock fishery. Our comments have focused only 
on  American  Seafoods  insofar  as  it  is  the  only  company  to  request  an  increase  in 
the excessive harvesting share cap. 

Thank  you  again  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  on  these  fishery  issues.  We  urge 
you to support the proposed amendment that will allow pollock fishery participants 
to  rebuild,  replace  and  modernize  our  fleet  so  that  we  can  successfully  compete  in 
the global marketplace. We also urge that you keep the excessive harvesting cap in 
place to protect the current balance and diversity that benefits most participants in 
the fishery as well as the U.S. consumer. 

This concludes my comments. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you very much. 
Mr. Frulla, thank you very much for being here. We look forward 

to your testimony. 
STATEMENT OF DAVID E. FRULLA, PARTNER, KELLEY DRYE & 
WARREN,  LLP,  ON  BEHALF  OF  THE  FISHING  COMPANY  OF 
ALASKA 
Mr.  FRULLA.  Thank  you,  Madam  Chair.  Good  afternoon.  My 
name is David Frulla. I am here testifying today on behalf of a Se-
attle-based  fishing  company,  the  Fishing  Company  of  Alaska,  or 
FCA.  I  am  a  partner  in  Kelley  Drye  &  Warren,  LLP,  resident  in 
our Washington, D.C. office. Since 2006, we have served as counsel 
to  FCA  for  certain  regulatory  and  lobbying  matters,  including  the 
legislative proposal for a freezer longline cooperative and the vessel 
replacement  issues  that  are  before  the  Subcommittee  today.  I  will 
address  both  issues,  including  by  offering  fair  solutions  consistent 
with existing law. 

Detailed written testimony has been submitted for the record. 
By  way  of  background,  FCA  was  the  first  to  begin  freezer 
longlining  operations  for  Pacific  cod  in  the  Bering  Sea  in  the  late 
1980s. 

Unfortunately,  the  fishery  sector  has  become  overcapitalized  de-
spite efforts by NMFS and the North Pacific Council to cap and re-
duce  capacity  and  to  protect  historic  participants.  The  council  im-
plemented  a  vessel  moratorium  in  1995,  a  license  limitation  pro-
gram  in  2000,  and  then  a  fisheries  endorsement  requirement  in 
2002. Congress authorized a buyout in 2005. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

43 

Despite  these  efforts,  five  new  very  active  vessels  entered  the 
sector  between  2000  and  2006.  Marginal  permits  that  qualified  for 
an LLP based on landings in only 1 of the 4 qualifying years were 
placed  on  new  full-time  vessels,  including  the  newly  built,  highly 
efficient  Bering  Leader.  But  while  capacity  has  increased,  the  Pa-
cific cod stock and allowable catch levels have decreased. 

Nor  has  the  buyback  program  been  particularly  effective.  The 
$35 million that Congress authorized bought only three vessels, in-
cluding two that began fishing post moratorium and one latent per-
mit.  We  understand,  moreover,  that  one  of  these  entities  is  now 
seeking to use its buyback funds to reenter the fishery with a new 
vessel. 

Now  essentially  the  same  private  entity  that  administered  this 
ineffective buyback is proposing legislation for its own private coop-
erative. FCA has four main concerns with this legislative proposal. 
While  safety  is  an  important  consideration,  it  should  not  be  used 
to  justify  a  fundamentally  flawed  cooperative  proposal  that  is  con-
trary  to  legal  standards  and  express  council  and  congressional 
goals for this fishery. 

Madam  Chair,  the  Coast  Guard  noted  the  allocation  issues  and 

our concerns are as follows. 

First,  as  a  matter  of  policy,  North  Pacific  Council  and  not  Con-
gress should be authorizing the formation of cooperatives and allo-
cating this fishery to individual participants. 

Second,  the  proposed  cooperative  uses  landings  over  only  the 
2003  to  2005  period  to  allocate  the  fishery,  even  though  it  used  a 
5-year  period  to  administer  the  buyback.  As  we  have  shown,  other 
Council  and  Congressional  rationalization  plans  in  the  North  Pa-
cific,  including  that  for  Pacific  cod,  used  far  more  comprehensive 
qualification periods. The allocation time period was truncated spe-
cifically to secure the participation in the co-op of recent aggressive 
sector entrants. However, this has come at the expense of FCA and 
historic  participants  whose  allocations  would  be  reduced  as  a  re-
sult. 

Such a reallocation is not consistent with the Magnuson-Stevens 
Act,  particularly  as  reauthorized.  The  MSA  requires  consideration 
of recent and historic participation in any such allocation. 

The legislative proposal is also flatly consistent with the morato-
rium’s  purpose  to  protect  those  who  made  long-term  investments. 
Were  Congress  to  act  on  this  legislative  proposal,  it  would  know-
ingly reward speculative entry into a fishery that both the Council 
and Congress have tried to limit. 

Finally,  the  legislative  proposal  only  partially  and  perhaps  tem-
porarily  rationalizes  this  fishery.  It  does  not  create  a  durable  allo-
cation. Instead, it merely authorizes the formation of a cooperative. 
If  this  agreement  among  the  participants  in  this  historically  frac-
tious sector dissolved, the fishery would revert to a status quo race 
for fish, and Congress’ action would be for naught. 

Accordingly, if there is to be legislation, which FCA does not sup-
port,  Congress  should  implement  a  system,  such  as  an  ITQ  or  the 
rockfish  pilot  program  that  fully  allocates  the  fishery.  Further,  it 
should  use  allocation  criteria  that  are  consistent  with  the  MSA 
precedent  in  the  North  Pacific  and  a  desire  not  to  reward  specula-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

44 

tive entry. A qualification period using 1995 to 2005 would be more 
equitable and legally consistent. 

Finally, FCA would like to briefly address the vessel replacement 
issue.  It  was  on  Easter  morning  that  FCA’s  non-AFA  catcher/proc-
essor, the Alaska Ranger, was tragically lost with five crew. As ex-
plained  in  greater  detail  in  our  written  testimony,  legal  and  regu-
latory  barriers  of  the  sort  being  addressed  on  the  AFA  sector’s  be-
half in the House Coast Guard bill prevent the replacement of this 
and  many  other  vessels.  If  Congress  does  not  comprehensively  ad-
dress  these  barriers  for  all  catcher/processor  vessels,  vessels  will 
continue  to  age  and  become  increasingly  less  reliable.  The  likeli-
hood of future similar tragedies will increase. 

We would be glad to work with the subcommittee on comprehen-

sive vessel replacement reform. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Frulla follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVID E. FRULLA, PARTNER, KELLEY DRYE & WARREN, 

LLP, ON BEHALF OF THE FISHING COMPANY OF ALASKA 

My  name  is  David  E.  Frulla.  I  am  a  Partner  in  Kelley  Drye  &  Warren,  LLP,  in 
Washington,  D.C.  Since  2006,  we  have  served  as  counsel  to  The  Fishing  Company 
of  Alaska,  Inc.  (‘‘FCA’’)  with  respect  to  certain  matters  pending  before  the  U.S.  De-
partment  of  Commerce,  the  North  Pacific  Fishery  Management  Council,  and  the 
Congress. I would like to thank Chairwoman Cantwell on behalf of FCA for extend-
ing  this  opportunity  to  provide  testimony  on  rationalization  in  the  North  Pacific 
freezer longline fishery for Pacific cod. FCA was a pioneer in developing the Pacific 
cod  freezer  longline  fishery  in  the  1980s.  This  testimony  will  touch  first  upon  con-
cerns  that  FCA  has  with  the  private  cooperative  proposal  put  forth  by  some  mem-
bers  of  the  Freezer  Longline  Conservation  Cooperative  (‘‘FLCC’’).  Next,  I  will  set 
forth  in  general  terms  an  alternative  that  better  fits  the  legal  requirements  under 
the  Magnuson-Stevens  Fishery  Conservation  and  Management  Act  (‘‘MSA’’)  and  is 
consistent  with  recent  rationalization  programs  authorized  by  Congress  and  the 
North  Pacific  Fishery  Management  Council.  Finally,  this  testimony  will  touch  on 
issues related to vessel replacement and vessel safety. 
I.  FCA’s  Position  on  the  Legislative  Proposal  for  a  Pacific  Cod  Freezer 

Longline Cooperative 

Some  FLCC  members  are  seeking  Congressional  authorization  for  the  formation 
of a freezer longline cooperative to harvest Bering Sea/Aleutian Island (‘‘BSAI’’) Pa-
cific cod. The proposal would allow for formation of this cooperative upon agreement 
by eighty percent of the sector participants. Any vessels not choosing to participate 
in  the  cooperative  would  be  allocated  the  percentage  of  the  total  cod  quota  landed 
by  those  vessels,  on  average,  for  the  years  2003  to  2005.  However,  such  allocation 
is  not  exclusive  to  the  non-participating  vessels,  but  would  be  placed  in  a  common 
pool subject to a ‘‘race-for-fish.’’ The FLCC proposal does not purport to allocate Pa-
cific cod beyond this split between the cooperative and ‘‘open access’’ components of 
the  sector,  such  as  on  an  individual  vessel  basis,  and  does  not  allow  for  the  forma-
tion  of  other  cooperatives.  Accordingly,  it  is  an  incomplete  solution  to  the  safety 
issues about which this hearing is concerned. 

The  terms  of  the  legislative  proposal  (as  we  understand  it)  are,  of  course,  a  bit 
of a formality as more than eighty percent of the sector participants have negotiated 
an  agreement  that  could  be  implemented  upon  passage.  FCA  has  participated  in 
these  discussions,  but  has  objected  to  the  terms  offered,  particularly  the  awarding 
of  significant  amounts  of  the  cooperative  share  to  new  and  recent  entrants.  FCA 
also  objects  to  the  proposal’s  use  of  2003  to  2005  as  the  baseline  for  determining 
the  split  between  the  cooperative  and  ‘‘open  access’’  components  of  the  sector.  In 
sum,  while  rationalization  of  a  sector  may  have  a  salutary  impact  on  vessel  safety, 
the imperative to increase safety should not be used as an excuse to drive an unfair 
allocation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

A.  The  Truncated  Allocation  Period  is  Inconsistent  with  Law  and  Recent  Allocation 

Programs 

45 

First, the legislative proposal’s use of such a brief and recent qualification period, 
2003–05,  is  inconsistent  with  allocative  decisions  by  both  Congress  and  the  North 
Pacific  Fishery  Management  Council.  For  instance,  when  allocating  cod  among  sec-
tors in Amendment 85 to the BSAI groundfish plan, that Council considered a range 
of years from 1995 to 2003, ultimately choosing allocations falling within this range. 
Currently,  the  Council  is  considering  1995  to  2005  (best  5  or  7  years)  as  the  basis 
for allocating Gulf of Alaska cod. Likewise, when Congress established the Rockfish 
Pilot Program in 2004, it chose 1996 to 2002, best 5 years, as the qualifying period. 
Similar ranges were utilized in Amendment 80 to the BSAI groundfish plan and the 
Bering  Sea  crab  rationalization  plan.  In  fact,  FLCC  itself  used  a  5-year  period  to 
justify the amount of capacity purchased for the $35 million freezer-longline Capac-
ity  Reduction  Program  authorized  by  Congress  in  section  219  of  the  Consolidated 
Appropriations Act of 2005. 

More inclusive timeframes are consistent with the MSA, which requires a council 
to  take  into  consideration  ‘‘historical  fishing  practices  in,  and  dependence  on,  the 
fishery’’  when  developing  a  limited  access  system.  16  U.S.C.  § 1853(b)(6)(B).  Like-
wise,  the  new  standards  contained  in  the  MSA  Reauthorization  Act  governing  lim-
ited  access  privilege  programs  require  consideration  of  both  ‘‘current  and  historic 
harvests.’’  Id.  § 1853a(c)(5).  By  comparison,  the  qualifying  period  recommended  by 
FLCC is not only an outlier with respect to other Council plans and recent statutory 
allocations, it entirely omits consideration of historical participation. 

Congress  correctly  instituted  a  policy  of  honoring  historical  catches  to  avoid  re-
warding  speculative  entry  into  fully  utilized  fisheries,  like  that  for  Pacific  cod.  In-
deed,  there  have  been  five  new  entrants  into  this  sector  this  decade  (although  two 
of  these  new  vessels  were  just  bought  out  in  the  buyback  program),  even  as  cod 
TACs  have  been  steady  or  declining  relative  to  1990  levels.  This  recent  capitaliza-
tion,  which  FCA  understands  is  continuing,  runs  counter  to  efforts  by  the  Council 
and Congress to reduce capacity in this sector and others in the North Pacific. 
B. The FLCC Proposal Undermines Capacity Reduction Efforts 

The pre-existing Pacific cod freezer longliner capacity control policy is reflected in 
the North Pacific Council’s 1995 vessel moratorium, and its institution of the license 
limitation  program  (‘‘LLP’’),  which  became  effective  in  2000.  Further,  in  2002, 
Amendment 67 to the BSAI groundfish plan was adopted to stabilize the Pacific cod 
fisheries  by  creating  gear  endorsements  designed  to  define  the  universe  of  eligible 
vessels. 67 Fed. Reg. 18129 (Apr. 15, 2002). To qualify for the freezer longline sector, 
a  vessel  must  have  had  a  catcher-processor  endorsed  LLP  groundfish  license  and 
harvested at least 270 tons of Pacific cod in at least 1 year between 1996–1999, in-
clusive, on the vessel that gave rise to the LLP. 

Yet,  as  explained  above,  despite  the  moratorium  and  LLP  program,  a  total  of  5 
new  vessels  entered  the  fleet  as  full-time  participants  between  2000  and  2006,  in-
cluding  the  new-built  Bering  Leader.  Although  it  is  not  clear  how  these  vessels  be-
came  qualified,  it  is  likely  that  they  are  using  LLPs  that  arose  from  one  of  the  ten 
vessels  that  fished  only  one  year  during  the  qualification  period  (five  of  which  only 
fished in 1996). 

During  this  post-LLP  timeframe,  Congress  also  became  concerned  with  the 
amount  of  capacity  in  this  (and  other)  BSAI  groundfish  sectors,  and  so  authorized 
a publicly subsidized buyback program in 2005 (Section 219 of the Consolidated Ap-
propriations  Act  of  2005).  To  date,  the  freezer  longline  sector  is  the  only  sector  to 
have  proposed  and  consummated  a  buyback  under  the  capacity  reduction  program. 
This history is relevant to FCA’s main concerns with the FLCC proposal. For one, 
all  problems  relating  to  excess  capacity  in  this  sector,  which  cooperative  legislation 
is supposed to address, are entirely of the sector’s own making. Although the Coun-
cil at least attempted a good first few steps in moderating capacity, what happened 
in  fact  was  that  part-time  and  sporadically  used  LLPs  (which  only  had  to  land  270 
metric  tons  in  1  year  for  a  cod  endorsement)  were  placed  on  new,  full-time  vessels, 
most  now  catching  between  2,000  and  3,000  metric  tons  per  year.  Nor  has  the 
buyback  been  particularly  effective  in  reducing  capacity.  The  buyback,  as  privately 
administered by the proponents of this legislative cooperative, only purchased three 
vessels  and  an  unaffiliated  permit  for  $35  million;  however,  two  of  the  vessels  pur-
chased were new vessels that began fishing in 2000 and 2001. All this new capital-
ization  has  had  the  effect  of  eroding  FCA’s  recent  overall  share  of  the  Pacific  cod 
catch. 

The result has been far from the salutary effect Congress and the Council sought 
through  the  license  limitation  program  and  the  vessel  buyback.  Indeed,  the  desire 
to add capacity to the freezer longline sector continues. In fact, we understand that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

46 

one  of  the  participants  in  the  buyback  has  attempted  to  use  buyback  funds  to  pur-
chase an otherwise non-qualified vessel and a currently unused freezer longline-en-
dorsed LLP to put new capacity back into the fishery. If this attempt were success-
ful,  then  this  buyback  will  have  repeated  the  failures  of  the  original  New  England 
groundfish buyback program, which the Government Accountability Office found has 
led to an increase in capacity, rather than the intended decrease. 

This  history  is  relevant  to  the  qualification  period  being  advocated  by  FLCC  be-
cause  it  underscores  that  the  proposed  legislation  is  more  designed  to  garner  new 
entrants’  support  and  solidify  existing,  private  arrangements  among  the  members 
of FLCC, than it is to ensure equitable treatment of historical participants like FCA. 
Basing  allocations  on  fishing  patterns  in  2003–2005  locks  in  the  aberrations  that 
arose from the well-intentioned, but flawed LLP qualification program and rewards 
those  who  added  capacity  at  a  time  when  the  Council  and  Congress  were  trying  to 
stabilize  this  fishery  by  protecting  ‘‘long-time  participants.’’  67  Fed.  Reg.  at  18129. 
FLCC’s proposal is thus not only ill-advised as a matter of policy, but it is legally 
doubtful  as  well.  It  in  no  way  comports  with  existing  law,  which  is  geared  toward 
both  protecting  historical  participants  and  discouraging  speculative  entrants  in 
fully-utilized fisheries. 
C. The Proposal Fails to Fully Allocate the Pacific Cod Fishery 

Aside  from  the  skewed  allocation  proposal,  the  FLCC  legislative  proposal  is 
flawed  in  that  it  does  not  fully  allocate  Pacific  cod  among  all  sector  participants, 
as  do  all  recent  rationalization  programs.  Rather,  the  proposed  legislation  merely 
seeks  to  establish  an  allocation  as  between  the  cooperative  that  it  authorizes  and 
those  vessels  which  do  not  choose  to  join  the  cooperative.  This  means  that  if  the 
parties  in  this  typically  fractious  sector  were  to  dissolve  the  cooperative,  the  sector 
would revert to the status quo and the legislation would have accomplished nothing. 
Under  a  typical  rationalization  program  involving  cooperatives,  such  as  Amend-
ment  80  to  the  BSAI  groundfish  plan,  allocations  are  made  to  individual  vessels, 
which can then either bring their allocation into a cooperative or into an open access 
pool. As the FLCC proposal does not purport to allocate fishing privileges on an in-
dividual  basis,  if  the  cooperative  were  to  fail,  the  sector  would  revert  to  a  race-for- 
fish.  The  former,  more  common,  approach  of  fully  allocating  a  fishery  and  allowing 
formation of cooperatives is a more rational and durable approach. 
II. FCA’s Recommended Alternative 

Since  this  issue  was  initially  raised  before  Congress,  FCA  has  consistently  main-
tained  that  the  Council  is  the  appropriate  body  to  develop  fishery  management 
measures  such  as  the  one  FLCC  proposes.  It  has  become  apparent,  however,  that 
given  FLCC’s  persistence  and  the  Council’s  increasingly  heavy  workload,  it  would 
be constructive to offer an alternative that would meet the desire of the proponents 
of  rationalization  for  cooperative-style  management,  while  respecting  established 
legal standards for such a limited access privilege program. 

Therefore, FCA could agree to program structured either as an individual fishery 
quota  (‘‘IFQ’’),  with  authorization  to  form  a  cooperative,  or  a  program  structured 
along the lines of the Rockfish Pilot Program. Each program would allocate the sec-
tor’s  Pacific  cod  quota  to  individual  vessels  based  on  their  historical  catch.  The  lat-
ter  differs  from  an  IFQ  only  in  that  it  allows  any  two  or  more  vessels  to  form  a 
cooperative  or  to  join  their  allocation  with  others  in  a  common  pool  where  a  vessel 
is not guaranteed its individual allocation of fish. 

In  order  to  be  consistent  with  other  programs,  however,  the  qualification  years 
should  range  from  1995  to  2005.  This  would  both  respect  historical  participation, 
as  well  as  respect  the  Council’s  and  Congress’s  intent  in  limiting  access  and  insti-
tuting  the  vessel  buyback  program.  To  use  just  recent  history,  as  FLCC  proposes, 
sends a counter-productive message that building up capacity in a speculative man-
ner can be rewarded. FCA would be pleased to work with staff to develop the details 
of such a program. 
III. FCA’s Perspective On the Need for Vessel Replacement 

Finally,  given  the  focus  of  this  hearing  on  safety  and,  in  particular,  the  details 
of  the  American  Fisheries  Act  (‘‘AFA’’)  sector’s  vessel  rebuild  language  adopted  by 
the House in the Coast Guard Reauthorization Act, FCA would like to speak briefly 
about  the  need  for  more  generalized  relief.  As  you  may  be  aware,  its  groundfish 
trawl  catcher-processor,  the  Alaska  Ranger,  tragically  sank  in  the  Bering  Sea  on 
Easter morning this year. Under the regulations then governing the non-AFA trawl 
catcher-processor sector (also known colloquially as the ‘‘head-and-gut’’ fleet), no ves-
sel  not  originally  qualified  for  the  sector  could  ever  be  used  to  harvest  the  head- 
and-gut  sector’s  allocation  of  groundfish.  In  other  words,  the  fleet  was  consigned  to 
fish in increasingly aging and unsafe steel. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

47 

Fortunately,  that  element  of  the  regulations  was  sensibly  vacated  by  a  Federal 
district  court.  Presumably,  pending  implementation  of  the  court’s  order  by  the  Na-
tional  Marine  Fisheries  Service,  replacement  vessels  will  be  allowed  to  be  used. 
That,  however,  is  only  a  partial  solution.  The  Alaska  Ranger  was  203  feet  length 
overall,  and  many  vessels  in  this  fleet  exceed  165-feet.  Under  current  law,  no  new 
vessel over 165 feet can be given a fisheries endorsement unless: 

the owner of the vessel demonstrates to the Secretary that the regional fishery 
management  council  of  jurisdiction  established  under  section  302(a)(1)  of  the 
Magnuson-Stevens  Fishery  Conservation  and  Management  Act  (16  U.S.C. 
1852(a)(1)) has recommended after October 21, 1998, and the Secretary of Com-
merce  has  approved,  conservation  and  management  measures  in  accordance 
with  the  American  Fisheries  Act  (Public  Law  105–277,  div.  C,  title  II)  (16 
U.S.C. 1851 note) to allow the vessel to be used in fisheries under the council’s 
authority. 

46  U.S.C.  § 12113(d)(2)(B).  Astonishingly,  neither  the  National  Marine  Fisheries 
Service,  the  Department  of  Transportation,  nor  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  has  ever  im-
plemented  a  regulatory  process  an  owner  can  follow  in  order  to  make  such  a  dem-
onstration. 

In  essence,  it  appears  that  in  order  to  replace  the  Alaska  Ranger,  or  any  other 
vessel  greater  than  165-feet,  an  owner  would  have  to  petition  a  regional  fishery 
management  council  for  a  special  rulemaking  to  authorize  the  replacement.  Given 
the  councils’  already  stressed  workload  and  their  lack  of  any  practical  experience 
or guidance for undertaking such a rulemaking, this is an unreasonable proposition. 
Of course, this would not be an issue with AFA vessel replacement, at least as pro-
posed in the Coast Guard bill, because that is structured as a new special exemption 
to the limitation on fishery endorsements under section 12113(d)(2). 

Vessel replacement is not a matter confined to one sector, but is a general safety 
imperative. Without the ability to replace aging vessels, the likelihood of more trag-
edies like the Alaska Ranger continues to increase. Moreover, without the ability to 
replace vessels, it will be increasingly difficult to meet heightened safety standards, 
such as those called for in the House version of the Coast Guard bill. Finally, mod-
ernization  and  the  ability  to  upgrade  are  important  to  helping  vessels  become  both 
more  fuel  efficient  and  better  able  to  meet  the  increasingly  stringent  retention 
standards the Council has set for the head-and-gut sector by allowing for upgraded 
vessels that can create more product forms and more fully utilize their catch. 

All  companies  in  the  head-and-gut  sector  agree  on  the  need  for  vessel  replace-
ment,  although  there  are  differences  of  opinions  on  the  specific  details.  It  may  not 
be  prudent  to  wait  for  perfect  unanimity,  which,  in  any  event,  is  unlikely  to  ever 
emerge. As a first step, it would seem only right to allow replacement up to the size 
of the vessel being replaced, with proper assurances that vessel being replaced can-
not be used in other fisheries. 
IV. Conclusion 

FCA looks forward to continuing to work with this Subcommittee on these impor-
tant issues. We would also be pleased to provide any additional information. Thank 
you again for this opportunity to testify on FCA’s behalf. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you very much. 
Mr.  Frulla,  I  think  I  am  going  to  start  with  you.  So  the  Fishing 
Company  of  Alaska  supports  the  public  policy  benefits  of  co-ops  in 
general? 

Mr.  FRULLA.  The  Fishing  Company  of  Alaska  would  support  an 
IFQ  process  that  fully  allocates  the  fishery.  What  is  happening 
here is the legislative proposal would—— 

Senator CANTWELL. We are going to get into that—— 
Mr. FRULLA. OK. 
Senator CANTWELL.—unless we get called to a vote. 
Mr. FRULLA. In short, an IFQ that fully allocates the fishery FCA 

would support. 

Senator CANTWELL. And then as it relates to Magnuson-Stevens, 
the  formation  of  co-ops  you  think  are  consistent  with  Magnuson- 
Stevens. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

48 

Mr.  FRULLA.  In  general,  yes,  assuming  the  allocations  are  fair, 
and there is a whole set of new criteria for allocation that were up-
dated in the reauthorization act. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Mr.  Bundy,  can  the  North  Pacific  Fishery 

Management Council deal with this issue? 

Mr.  BUNDY.  Senator,  I  have  spent  too  much  time  in  the  engine 

room and my hearing is not 100 percent. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  I  am  sorry.  Could  the  North  Pacific  Fishery 

Management Council deal with this issue? 

Mr. BUNDY. Oh, could they? 
Senator CANTWELL. Yes, could they. 
Mr. BUNDY. Yes. They could if the Council put it on their agenda. 
And that is a big ‘‘if,’’ by the way, because there is a lot of competi-
tion to get on that agenda, and more proposals do not make it than 
do  make  it.  And  if  it  got  on  the  agenda,  then  it  would  be  some 
years in the future that it would get resolved. 

In the meantime, the work of 95 percent of the fleet that has put 
together a voluntary co-op that they would like to implement would 
fall  apart  because  time  would  go  by,  and  so  we  would  be  back  to 
ground zero. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Well,  why  should  Congress  deal  with  this  if 
this  is  something  the  Fishery  Management  Council  can  deal  with? 
Mr. BUNDY. Madam Chair, I guess we point primarily to the AFA 
model.  Here  we  have  a  fishery  that  is  fully  subscribed.  All  of  the 
participants in that fishery have basically been here since the year 
2000. They have been competing all under the same rule. We have 
approximately  95  percent  of  the  catch  that  wants  to  pursue  a  co- 
op; 5 percent does not. 

Now, the Council has done the important work. The Council has 
allocated  the  resource  to  this  group  of  fishermen,  and  the  Council 
has  just  recently  addressed  all  the  issues  that  would  be  addressed 
all  over  again  if  we  went  back  to  the  Council,  including  commu-
nities because the communities out of the allocation of cod got 10.7 
percent off the top. 

We  are  asking  not  that  Congress  allocate  the  resource  to  indi-
vidual  companies.  We  are  only  asking  Congress  to  provide  a  very 
simple pool by taking the existing allocation, dividing it up into two 
pools  that  reflect  current  harvest:  one  pool  for  those  who  want  to 
join a co-op; one pool for those who do not. But it would reflect cur-
rent harvest practices. 

Now,  if  Mr.  Frulla  wanted  to  pursue  an  IFQ  program,  I  encour-
age him to do that, and he might even get a lot of support. He can 
ask Congress for that or the Council for that. 

But  in  the  meantime,  we  need,  for  all  the  reasons  that  previous 
panel members testified to, to try to stop this race for fish. We are 
not  taking  any  powers  away  from  the  Council.  We  are  not  pre-
judging  anything.  If  he  wants  to  pursue  or  the  Fishing  Company 
of  Alaska  wants  to  pursue  what  he  calls  a  fully  allocated,  that  is 
fine. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Mr.  Frulla,  what  about  this  issue  of  95  per-
cent of the Freezer Longline Coalition working together? Have you 
been part of that discussion? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

49 

Mr.  FRULLA.  The  Fishing  Company  of  Alaska  has  been  part  of 
that  discussion  when  it  has  been  permitted  to  be  part  of  that  dis-
cussion. 

The  issue  has  come  down  to  two,  one  a  fundamental  issue  with 
Congress  legislating  fisheries.  The  second  is  this  allocation  issue. 
This  issue  of  this  common  pool  versus  the  co-op,  as  it  is  at  this 
point, is basically the 95 percent versus FCA’s vessels and the allo-
cation. And what the common pool would be getting is an allocation 
based on—and that is just the FCA vessels—the 1993 to 1995 catch 
levels. That is the time when everybody was piling into that fishery 
that  really  should  not  have  been  piling  into  that  fishery  if  the 
Council and Congress’s goals had been met. 

And so what the FCA is saying is no matter what you do, if you 
are going to do something, pull back and look at a more fair alloca-
tion  period  that  is  consistent  with  how  the  North  Pacific  Council 
has done it in other fisheries, including cod fisheries, and how Con-
gress has done it when it has gotten involved. 

Senator CANTWELL. Was there a discussion about additional fish 
to  meet  some  of  the  issues  that  the  Fishing  Company  of  Alaska  is 
bringing up? 

Mr. BUNDY. Madam Chair, I will just be very brief and try to be 
directly responsive to Mr. Frulla’s comment. In the negotiations for 
the co-op, everybody was included and participated. 

The outcome of the negotiation, partly because of Mr. Frulla’s cli-
ent’s recalcitrance, they got extra fish. They would get the number 
2  and  number  4  highest  allocations  of  all  the  36  vessels.  They 
would  get  7.1  percent  under  the  co-op.  They  are  currently  fishing 
at  about  5  percent  or  less.  Even  under  the  years  2003–2005,  they 
would get 6.6 percent of the fishery, which is more than they have 
been catching the last 2 years. 

It  is  just  really  difficult  to  swallow  the  allegation  that  somehow 
they  have  been  treated  unfairly,  and  we  all  did  consider  all  those 
years back to 1995. It is always the same thing when we approach 
these  types  of  issues.  You  have  the  ‘‘pioneers  lament’’  about  how 
they  established  the  fishery  and  so  forth.  And  by  the  way,  there 
were  companies  there  before  theirs.  And  then  you  have  the  ‘‘new-
comers lament.’’ And so you have to balance those things, and that 
is what the negotiations did. It took all that into account and gave 
them some extra fish partly because of a sunk vessel that they had, 
partly because they just held out and are still holding out. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Well,  I  never  thought  I  would  long  to  have 
more  discussions  about  vessel  replacement,  but  this  debate  back 
and  forth  is  challenging  as  well  and  makes  one  want  to  figure  out 
how to get to the bottom line here. 

So are you saying that there is a fair percentage, or are we say-
ing  that  a  time-frame  is  a  more  accurate  assessment  of  what  the 
measurement  should  be?  Mr.  Bundy  or  Mr.  Frulla,  whoever  wants 
to go first. 

Mr. FRULLA. Thank you, Madam Chair. First, in response to Mr. 

Bundy, the legislative proposal is not 7 percent. 

Second of all, what the FCA looks to is a longer period to assess 
the allocation so that you take a broader range of history in deter-
mining  percentages  of  the  fishery  back  before  all  this  effort  came 
piling in. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

Mr. FRULLA. I am sorry. I did not understand your question. 
Senator CANTWELL. You are saying other fisheries looked at a 10- 

year time period for historical data? 

Mr.  FRULLA.  Up  to  about  a  10-year  time  period.  That  is  all  set 
forth in the written testimony in terms of the periods. Some of the 
fisheries  that  have  been  allocated  in  the  North  Pacific  that  every-
body  has  been  talking  about  have  looked  at  qualification  periods 
that  go  back  to  1995.  Again,  we  have  that  laid  out  in  our  written 
testimony. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  But  that  is  what  I  am  trying  to  get  out,  is 
the measurement stick. And so are you saying 10 years, or you are 
saying—— 

Mr.  FRULLA.  We  are  saying  10  years  is  a  lot  fairer  than  3.  We 

are saying something in between could be possible too. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  And  you  think  other  fisheries  management 

Mr. FRULLA. I know it did. It is in the record for these other fish-

did 10-year—— 

eries. 

50 

Respectfully,  of  course,  FCA’s  share  declined.  There  are  more 

vessels out there racing for fish in these recent years. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  So  you  are  saying  that  a  longer  time  period 
is  just  a  more  historical  number.  And  so  is  there  a  fair  allocation 
that you think that represents? 

Mr.  FRULLA.  We  have  been  looking  at  a  time  period  that  is  be-
tween  1995  and  2005  that  takes  a  best  number  of  years,  which  is 
how other fisheries have been allocated. 

Senator CANTWELL. You are saying other fisheries took a 10-year 

time period. 

Senator CANTWELL. Mr. Bundy? 
Mr.  BUNDY.  Senator,  again,  we  are  following  the  AFA  precedent 
which was 3 years. I mean, it is true that these programs have all 
kinds  of  sets  of  years,  the  shortest  2  and  the  longest  7,  although 
I  am  not  aware  of  any  with  10.  Under  Mr.  Frulla’s  proposal,  you 
would  have  to  go  from  1995  to  2007  because  the  law  requires  us 
to  consider  recent  participation.  So  that  is  13  years.  That  is  way, 
way off anything that I am aware of. 

We  did  consider  the  early  years  as  a  group,  and  when  you  con-

sider all this, it ultimately does come down to a percentage. 

With  regard  to  piling  on  and  speculators  that  they  are  com-
plaining about, again, in the year 2000, the Council established the 
rules  for  who  was  in  and  who  was  out.  The  speculation  argument 
was  relevant  then  in  2000,  not  now.  We  have  all  been  in  since 
2000.  We  have  all  had  the  same  number  of  licenses  that  people 
have  dealt  with.  The  Fishing  Company  of  Alaska  has  competed  in 
a  way  so  that  they  have  continued  to  catch  less  fish  vis-a`-vis  the 
rest  of  the  fleet.  Some  have  done  better;  some  have  done  worse. 
The negotiation balanced all that out. 

Senator CANTWELL. Could the two of you comment on the House 

language on vessel replacement and your thoughts? 

Ms.  PARKER.  Madam  Chair,  there  are  three  components  here. 
Any  replaced  vessel  is  prohibited  from  participating  in  any  fishery 
outside the North Pacific and the West Coast hake fishery. Any re-
built  or  replaced  vessel  that  increases  its  length  would  be  prohib-
ited from fishing in the Gulf of Alaska. And any retired AFA vessel 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

51 

must  surrender  its  fishery  endorsement  and  so  cannot  participate 
in other U.S. fisheries. 

Senator CANTWELL. Mr. Hyde? 
Mr.  HYDE.  American  Seafoods  supports  all  of  the  proposals  to 
allow vessels to be replaced. I think that as long as you have a race 
for fish, there is a real issue of what that does when you allow new 
vessels  to  continue  entering  a  fishery,  but  once  you  have  rational-
ized fisheries, then I think it is time to remove all of those restric-
tions. 

As  I  commented  in  my  testimony,  though,  with  respect  to  the 
catcher/processor  sector  of  the  AFA  fleet,  it  is  not  a  safety  issue. 
Nearly  all  of  the  vessels  are  classed  and  all  the  vessels  are  load- 
lined. It is purely an efficiency measure with respect to that sector. 
The other problem is that that Coast Guard language really does 
not  affect  any  of  the  vessels  that  seem  to  be  the  focus  of  a  lot  of 
the  discussion  today,  the  H&G  trawl  fleet  and  the  H&G  longline 
fleet. If this legislation is going to do what it really probably ought 
to do, it needs to be much broader than it is right now. 

The  last  issue  is  that  that  language,  while  it  focuses  on  vessel 
replacement,  it  actually  has  another  very  important  component 
which is what we call an inshore permit stacking or quota stacking 
proposal. Again, this proposal makes a lot of sense. You have more 
catcher  vessels  inshore  than  you  need.  This  would  allow  vessel 
owners to take their quota off one vessel and put it on another ves-
sel, giving you the opportunity to make sure you have the most ef-
ficient  vessels  on  the  ground.  It  all  makes  great  sense  and  we 
ought to do it, but we ought to do it as a package. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Mr.  Bundy  or  Mr.  Frulla,  do  you  have  any 

comments about the House language in the Coast Guard bill? 

Mr.  FRULLA.  If  I  may,  Madam  Chair,  the  Fishing  Company  of 
Alaska strongly supports what Mr. Hyde is saying, extension of the 
vessel  replacement  language  to  Amendment  80,  head  and  gut 
groundfish  trawl  fleet,  as  well  as  the  freezer  longliner  fleet.  It 
strongly supports that. 

Senator CANTWELL. Mr. Bundy? 
Mr.  BUNDY.  Senator,  we  are  supportive  of  that.  I  am  going  to 
point  out  that  we  do  not  have  any  specifics  from  that  fleet.  It  has 
been  2  years,  I  think,  since  we  asked  that  fleet  if  they  wanted  to 
be included, please provide some language, and we have just never 
seen it. And so I hesitate to just say I support whatever they want, 
but conceptually we support them. 

Senator CANTWELL. Well, thank you. 
We  have  a  vote  in  progress,  well  under  progress  now.  So  I  am 
going  to  submit  some  additional  questions  to  several  of  the  panel-
ists here, and if you could get us a timely response in that. 

Again, I appreciate everyone’s attention to today’s hearing. These 
are  important  economic  and  safety  issues  for  the  Northwest,  for 
Alaska,  for  Washington,  and  for  Oregon.  So  we  appreciate  the  fact 
that  people  have  traveled  and  followed  these  safety  and  fishing 
issues so closely. 

So we appreciate you getting back to us and the rest of the infor-

mation that we are requesting. 
So this hearing is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 4:17 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

JAMES SANCHIRICO 

Question 1. A 2005 United Nations Food and Agriculture Organization report esti-
mates  that  the  market  value  of  the  world’s  fisheries  in  1990  was  $70  billion,  but 
that the operating cost of those fisheries was $92 billion. An unprofitable fishing in-
dustry does not create an environment where safety or sustainability of the resource 
is  a  top  priority.  How  does  the  choice  of  one  fishery  management  regime  over  an-
other contribute to this problem? 

Answer. The institutional framework within which fishermen operate can and has 
generated  perverse  incentives  and  perverse  outcomes  that  are  attributable  to  insti-
tutions  rather  than  inherent  human  character.  That  is,  fisheries  are  overexploited 
not  because  of  greed  or  corruption  or  other  character  flaws  of  users  and  regulators 
but rather because of management regimes that have failed to address insecure ac-
cess rights. 

A back of the envelope calculation to emphasize the potential economic gains that 
are  currently  being  ‘‘left  in  the  water’’  by  not  addressing  the  rule  of  capture  incen-
tives is as follows: 

1.  Start  by  taking  the  1990  estimate  of  world  revenues  of  $70  billion  per  year 
2.  Take  the  data  from  individual  fishing  quota  fisheries  from  around  the  world 
with profit rates ranging from 20 percent to 60 percent 
3. Multiplying $70 billion by this range of profit rates yields sustainable profits 
ranging from $14 billion to $42 billion per year. 

Therefore, by not rationalizing our fisheries, we are squandering the original loss 
of  $22  billion  plus  the  potential  profits  ranging  from  $14  to  $42  billion.  In  other 
words,  we  potentially  could  turn  the  $92  billion  spent  on  operating  costs  into  $94 
billion in profit via rationalization. 

Question  1a.  Is  there  an  alternate  fishery  management  plan  that  would  make 

fishing more profitable? 

cess stories? 

Answer.  Any  management  institution  that  that  treats  the  fundamental  cause  of 
economically  and  ecologically  depressed  fisheries—the  insecure  rights  to  the  re-
source (or ‘‘rule of capture’’ incentives)—will create the necessary conditions for the 
fishery to become profitable. 

Question  1b.  What  fisheries  that  have  implemented  rights-based  fishing  are  suc-

Answer.  While  I  do  not  have  the  exact  number  of  fisheries,  I  would  argue  that 
all  of  the  major  commercial  fisheries  throughout  the  world  that  have  implemented 
rights-based fishing systems can be considered successes in terms of improving eco-
nomic efficiency. With regard to ecological criteria, there are two potential measures 
of  success.  Rights-based  fisheries  have  for  the  most  part  been  designed  under  the 
auspices  of  single-species  management.  In  that  regard,  the  fisheries  in  which  the 
total  allowable  catches  have  been  set  using  the  best  available  natural  and  social 
science are a success in that their stocks are stable with respect to fishing mortality 
factors. Another potential metric is the ever-elusive health of the marine ecosystem 
in  which  rights-based  fishery  management  systems  are  just  one  of  the  factors  con-
tributing  to  the  health  of  the  system.  In  this  case,  it  is  difficult  to  discern  cause 
and  effect  in  such  complex  coupled  natural-human  systems.  We  can  say,  however, 
that rights-based systems are consistent with lower ecological impacts, more so than 
are  race  to  fish  conditions.  For  example,  slowing  the  pace  of  fishing  and  focusing 
on  maximizing  the  quality  of  the  yield  will  result  in  improvements  in  targeting  ca-
pabilities  that  will  translate  into  habitat  damage  and  lower  bycatch  and  discard 
rates. 

Finally,  rights-based  systems  foster  a  stewardship  ethic  that  manifests  itself  into 
a  long-term  view  of  the  resource  productivity.  Expectations  of  future  conservation- 
minded  management  are  capitalized  immediately  in  the  individual  fishing  quota 

(53) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

54 

prices,  and  it  then  becomes  in  the  interests  of  rights  holders  to  preserve  those  cap-
italized values by promoting actions that ensure future biological and economic sus-
tainability. In the same manner that shareholders have an interest in ensuring that 
managers maintain the asset value of firms, so do shareholders of rights-based fish-
eries have an interest in ensuring that their quota values are protected by wise and 
forward-looking policies. 

Question  2.  Do  ‘‘race  for  fish’’  management  regimes  promote  economic  stability 
within  the  fishing  industry?  What  impact  does  such  a  regime  have  on  employment 
within  the  fishing  industry?  How  does  the  economic  situation  change  when  rights- 
based  fishing  systems,  such  as  individual  fishing  quotas,  individual  transferable 
quotas,  cooperatively  managed  fisheries,  and  community  development  quotas,  are 
implemented? 

Answer. Of course, defining economic stability for an industry that is heavily reg-
ulated can be tricky. That said, I would argue that economic stability characterized 
by  little  or  no  economic  return  is  not  a  desirable  ends.  Yes,  the  transition  to  a 
rights-based system can introduce short-term changes to an industry that according 
to some might be destabilizing, but these changes promote the type of economic sta-
bility  for  harvesters,  processors,  and  fishing-dependent  communities  that  is  desir-
able from society’s point of view. 

To  reiterate  what  I  said  in  my  testimony,  the  creation  of  wealth  from  addressing 
insecure access rights will lead to improved stewardship, sustainability, and further 
innovation to increase value. 

Question 3. What are the environmental impacts of fishery cooperative formation? 
Answer.  Cooperatives  and  individual  fishing  quota  systems  will  slow  down  the 
pace of fishing. We have observed, for example, the season length went from 75 days 
to  149  days  after  the  creation  of  the  cooperatives  in  the  North  Pacific  Pollock  fish-
ery,  and  a  similar  result  occurred  in  the  Pacific  Whiting  Cooperative.  As  I  men-
tioned above, slowing the pace of fishing and focusing on maximizing the quality of 
the  yield  will  result  in  improvements  in  targeting  capabilities  that  will  translate 
into habitat damage and lower bycatch and discard rates. 

Question 4. Many fish species are subject to natural booms and busts in stock size 
as  ocean  conditions  vary  from  year  to  year.  How  does  this  variation  in  stock  size 
and, therefore, total harvest impact the profitability of a given fishing sector? Would 
the implementation of a rights-based fishing system mitigate the economic impacts? 
Answer.  Regardless  of  the  management  structure  in  place,  the  economic  returns 
from fishing are a function of both economic and ecological characteristics, including 
prices,  labor  costs,  fuel  costs,  growth  rates  of  species,  trophic  interactions,  habitat 
conditions, and so on. The greater the variability in these factors from year to year, 
the greater the fluctuations in the economic returns. 

Yes,  a  fishing  industry  operating  under  management  systems  that  result  in  little 
or no economic return on average, such as ‘‘race for fish’’ systems, are more economi-
cally  vulnerable  to  short-term  fluctuations  than  one  operating  under  a  rights-based 
system.  Reasons  for  the  additional  vulnerability  include:  (1)  investments  solely  fo-
cused  on  improving  catching  efficiency  as  a  means  to  better  compete  for  a  limited 
catch; and (2) with little or no economic return in ‘‘race to fish’’ fisheries, the ability 
of  the  harvesters  to  handle  unexpected  variations  in  fishing  costs  or  stock  size,  for 
example, is diminished (for example., there may be a lack of capital to use as collat-
eral to offset downturns). 

See  also  my  written  testimony  and  the  citations  therein  for  a  discussion  of  the 
changes under rights-based management systems that have been observed through-
out the world. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

LESLIE HUGHES 

Question 1. Does a race for fish pose a significant safety risk? 
Answer. Yes. Open access fisheries inadvertently promote more risk taking, in the 
form of greater crew fatigue from working longer hours, fishing in hazardous weath-
er in order to maximize catch and economic gain, and vessel overloading. 

Question  2.  Does  current  law,  such  as  the  Commercial  Fishing  Industry  Vessel 

Safety Act of 1988, address any of the safety concerns posed by a race for fish? 

Answer.  Only  in  that  crews  are  better  prepared  and  equipped  to  respond  to  an 

emergency situation which is more likely to occur in an open access fishery. 

Question  2a.  How  would  fishery  management  practices  have  to  change  in  order 

to improve fishing safety? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

55 

Answer. National Standard 10 of the Magnuson Fisheries Conservation and Man-
agement Act of 1976 was amended by the Sustainable Fisheries Act of 1996 and rec-
ommended  that  NMFS  ‘‘implement  management  measures  that  reduce  the  race  for 
fish and the resulting incentives for fishermen to take additional risks with respect 
to  vessel  safety.’’  To  improve  fishing  safety,  more  fisheries  should  adopt  ‘‘rational-
ized’’ management plans. 

The  fishery  management  plans  in  effect  in  the  North  Pacific  that  are  ‘‘rational-
ized’’ are safer. Rationalized fishery management programs off Alaska now exist for 
halibut,  sablefish,  Bering  Sea/Aleutian  Pollock,  Bering  Sea/Aleutian  king,  Tanner 
and  snow  crab  and  for  the  Amendment  80  ground  fish  trawl  fleet.  These  fisheries 
are  managed  by  either  cooperatives  or  by  individual  fishing  quotas  (IFQs).  These 
management  programs  are  similar  in  many  ways  and  they  share  common  advan-
tages to vessel operations and fishing vessel safety. Harvest quotas are allocated to 
cooperative members or to individual vessel owners for their exclusive usage during 
an extended season, which results in the following benefits: In practice, this means 
that  vessels  can  plan  for  their  season,  and  they  can  conduct  their  fishing,  of  their 
quota, during reasonable weather at a reasonable pace to be safe and maximize eco-
nomic returns. 

Question 2b. Is there evidence from other fisheries to support this? 
Answer. Yes. One example is the notoriously dangerous Bering Sea/Aleutian king, 
Tanner and snow crab fisheries. In the decade of the 1990s, prior to rationalization, 
these  crab  fisheries  sustained  an  average  of  eight  fatalities  per  year.  In  the  past 
3 years under new Individualized Fishing Quotas fisheries management, there have 
been zero fatalities and no Coast Guard Search and Rescue missions on vessels par-
ticipating in rationalized crab fisheries. 

Question  2c.  Do  the  fishermen  in  these  fisheries  feel  that  safety  has  been  im-

Answer. Absolutely. 
Question  3.  What  grade  would  you  give  to  the  overall  state  of  commercial  fishing 

proved? 

safety in the United States? 

Answer. I do not believe it is possible to generalize a ‘‘grade’’ for the entire coun-
try.  Fishing  vessel  safety  is  best  considered  by  gear  types,  regional  areas  of  oper-
ation, seasons, crew training and vessel condition. 

Question 4. During the hearing, you testified that more preventative safety meas-
ures  are  needed  in  order  to  improve  fishing  safety.  In  your  opinion,  why  have  we 
failed to implement more stringent laws and regulations? 

Answer.  The  Fishing  Vessel  Safety  Act  of  1988  that  resulted  in  46  CFR  Part  28 
regulations  for  the  commercial  fishing  industry  applied  generally  to  a  very  diverse 
fleet  nationally.  The  Coast  Guard’s  enforcement  of  full  compliance  with  those  regu-
lations  since  they  were  published  in  1991  has  ranged  from  being  very  successful 
(Districts 13 and 17) to inconsistent from region to region, and, consequently, it has 
been  difficult  to  determine  just  how  effective  they  have  been  at  improving  fishing 
vessel safety. More stringent laws and regulations, in my opinion, need to be based 
on  actual,  identified  risks  through  casualty  data.  It  is  extremely  difficult  to  track 
casualty  rates  over  time  and  measure  success  without  reliable  and  complete  cas-
ualty  information,  which  is  critical  for  determining  where  additional  enforcement 
action is needed. 

Question  4a.  In  your  experience  with  the  fishing  community,  do  you  believe  that 

the fishing community would support more stringent safety regulations? 

Answer.  Yes,  as  long  as  they  addressed  an  identified  risk  and  were  perceived  to 
improve safety. The Seattle-based fishing community, which accounts for 85 percent 
of the catch in Alaska, is very proactive about safety, and would most likely be the 
region  of  the  country  that  would  be  least  resistant  to  additional  safety  regulations. 
Our  North  Pacific  region  also  has  strong  Coast  Guard  oversight  from  the  two  Dis-
tricts  (13  and  17)  that  our  vessels  home  port  and  fish  in.  Coast  Guard  personnel 
in  those  Districts  have  implemented  several  initiatives  that  addressed  identified 
high-risk  fisheries  and  directly  resulted  in  improving  the  safety  record  of  those 
fleets. Specifically, to reconcile regulatory definitions and material requirements for 
a  group  of  processing  vessels  in  the  H&G  fleet,  an  Alternate  Compliance  Safety 
Agreement was developed. This program has resulted in substantial vessel improve-
ments and increased training for the crews. In spite of significant monetary impacts, 
the  program  received  strong  industry  support  and  active  participation  with  the  af-
fected segments of the industry. 

There  will  always  be  segments  of  the  fishing  industry  that  would  find  additional 

regulations an undue economic hardship that could threaten their livelihood. 

Question 4b. In what areas do you believe regulation is most needed? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

56 

Answer.  The  existing  regulations  focus  on  requirements  for  carriage  of  survival 
equipment designed to improve survival rates in the event of an incident, along with 
some  minimal  training  requirements.  This  was  an  extremely  important  first  step, 
but  has  not  generated  a  program  of  accident  prevention.  Prevention  is  the  area 
where future regulations need to concentrate, particularly vessel losses. 

Some other areas where preventative measures should focus would include safety 
training  and  certification  based  on  safety  training.  NPFVOA  also  supports  making 
Voluntary Dockside Exams mandatory for all fishing vessels. Our organization fully 
supports improving the Coast Guard’s enforcement of existing regulations. Stability 
standards for vessels less than 79 feet have not been published by the Coast Guard 
and  are  long  overdue.  The  Coast  Guard  has  published  an  Advanced  Notice  of  Pro-
posed  Rulemaking  (Docket  No.  USCG–2003–16158)  that,  if  adopted,  would  improve 
stability  standards.  It  is  presently  in  a  comment  period  that  was  recently  extended 
until December 15, 2008. 

Question  5.  From  your  interactions  with  the  fishing  community,  what  is  the  fish-
ing  industry’s  position  on  the  proposed  fishing  vessel  safety  language  in  the  House 
Coast  Guard  bill  that  would  require  safety  inspections  twice  every  5  years,  require 
safety training, and implement vessel construction standards? 

Answer. Although I cannot speak for the entire fishing community, I believe that 
a  large  segment  would  support  vessel  safety  examinations  and  additional  safety 
training.  Requiring  all  new  fishing  vessels  to  be  classed  or  inspected  by  the  Coast 
Guard  would  improve  safety  overall,  but  requiring  a  load  line  for  new  construction 
or  a  similar  review  would  provide  nearly  the  same  level  of  safety  at  a  significantly 
lower cost. 

Entering an existing vessel into ABS or similar class would be difficult or impos-
sible  for  much  of  the  fleet,  because  the  classification  societies  have  restrictions  on 
the types and ages of vessels they will accept into class. If the Alternate Compliance 
Safety Agreement (ACSA) program were expanded to cover more vessels nationally, 
the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  would  need  a  substantial  number  of  additional  billets  to  be 
fully funded for the significant additional work that would be added to the local in-
spection offices. 

Question 5a. Do you believe that the measures included in the House Coast Guard 

bill will improve fishing vessel safety? 

Answer. I believe most of the recommendations in H.R. 2830 would improve safe-
ty,  particularly  the  additional  safety  training  and  vessel  safety  examinations.  The 
proposed  language  for  some  of  the  new  construction  requirements  is  very  com-
plicated  and  may  have  unintended  impacts  if  passed  without  a  thorough  regional 
analysis. 

Question  6.  Attendance  in  the  North  Pacific  Fishing  Vessel  Owners’  Association 
(NPFVOA) Vessel Safety Program’s safety courses has exceeded 34,000 from fishing 
industry as well as mariners from other industries. Why do you think your program 
has been so successful in engaging the North Pacific fishing community? 

Answer.  The  fact  that  the  NPFVOA  Vessel  Safety  Program  was  developed  in  co-
operation  with  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  is  a  key  reason,  but  equally  as  important  is 
the  fact  that  recognized  fishing  industry  leaders  supported  development  of  the  pro-
gram  specifically  based  on  identified  regional  needs.  The  program  focus  has  always 
been  directed  specifically  at  safety  problems  and  risks  that  these  fishermen  face  in 
the  North  Pacific.  The  program  has  continued  to  be  highly  valued  as  a  safety  pro-
gram  ‘‘by  fishermen,  for  fishermen’’.  The  safety  courses  offered  by  NPFVOA  exceed 
those  required  by  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  and,  because  they  address  the  safety  con-
cerns  faced  by  fishermen,  70  percent  of  attendance  in  our  courses  has  been  vol-
untary.  Over  the  past  23  years  since  the  program  was  implemented  in  1985, 
NPFVOA’s  membership  has  grown  to  more  than  200  vessels,  representing  a  broad 
range  of  gear  types,  and  approximately  150  support  businesses  and  individuals. 
Having  a  vessel  membership  is  extremely  important  because  it  further  builds  com-
munity involvement and helps to create a ‘‘safety culture’’. 

Question 6a. What has been the largest challenge to implementing your program’s 

goals? 

Answer. NPFVOA’s biggest challenges have been how to best address a multitude 
of  safety  issues  for  such  a  diverse  and  dynamic  fleet,  and  having  adequate  funding 
to accomplish all of our goals. Initially the program was funded by Saltonstall-Ken-
nedy  Funds,  but  it  has  been  private  since  the  program  was  developed  more  than 
20 years ago. 

Question  7.  Do  you  support  allowing  vessel  replacement  in  the  Pollock  catcher 

processor fleet and the head and gut fleet? 

Answer.  Yes.  The  American  Fisheries  Act  (AFA)  has  by  most  measures  been  an 
extremely  good  piece  of  legislation,  as  in  part  it  has  established  a  well  reasoned 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

57 

‘‘rationalized  fisheries  management  program’’  for  our  Nation’s  largest  fishery—Ber-
ing  Sea  Pollock.  The  shortcoming  of  this  act  is  that  it  precludes  vessel  owners  the 
ability to replace AFA qualified vessels, both Pollock catcher processors and catcher 
vessels,  that  could  become  worn  out  and  increasingly  unsafe  over  time.  Under  cur-
rent law, to be replaced, a vessel must be a total constructive loss. This is an unrea-
sonable predicament that badly needs to have the language amended so that vessel 
owners can replace aging vessels that become unsafe with new and modern vessels. 
Most  of  the  Bering  Sea  Pollock  trawlers  and  H&G  fleet  were  built  in  the  1970s— 
1980s with hull life expectancy of 25–30 years. Corrective actions are now extremely 
timely. 

Question 8. How urgent is the need for vessel replacement legislation for the AFA 

and non-AFA fleets? Is safety an immediate concern for these fleets? 

Answer.  The  AFA  and  non-AFA  fleets  are  definitely  aging,  with  many  vessels 
being  at  least  30  years  old  and  some  World  War  II-vintage  vessels  still  in  service. 
The  fleets  differ  substantially  and  not  all  are  of  the  same  age  and  material  condi-
tion. There is no good reason to not have the ability to replace these vessels so those 
that  need  to  be  replaced  can  be  replaced  in  a  reasonable  manner.  To  preclude  this 
timely replacement ability is completely counterproductive. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

COMMANDER CHRISTOPHER WOODLEY 

Question 1. A number of reports from the Coast Guard and the National Research 
Council identify issues with fishing vessel integrity and human behavior as the pri-
mary causes of fishing accidents and fatalities. Do you believe that these two issues 
are the primary causes of fishing casualties or is the problem larger in scope? Where 
should we be directing our attention and efforts while trying to improve fishing safe-
ty?  Who  bears  the  primary  responsibility  for  improving  fishing  safety?  Is  this  an 
area where many share responsibility, but few actually take initiative? Does a race 
for fish pose a significant safety risk? 

Answer.  The  National  Research  Council’s  report  Fishing  Vessel  Safety—Blueprint 
for a National Program, 1991, determined fishing vessel safety should be considered 
a ‘‘total concept.’’ The report delineates three major factors which influence commer-
cial  fishing  safety:  vessel,  fishermen,  and  external  forces  (NRC  1991).  The  Coast 
Guard  concurs  with  the  report  and  believes  these  factors  should  be  the  focus  of  at-
tention and efforts while trying to improve fishing safety. 
Vessel Factors 

Mandatory  standards  for  construction,  outfitting,  and  maintenance  are  necessary 
to  reduce  vessel  losses.  These  standards  must  be  enforced  through  mandatory  ex-
aminations  by  experienced  marine  surveyors  or  Coast  Guard  personnel.  The  Coast 
Guard currently lacks authority to impose such standards. 
Fishermen Factors 

Professional  competency  (e.g.,  training  and  skills)  and  behavior  (e.g.,  risk  taking 
attitude  and  a  sense  of  responsibility  for  safety)  define  fisherman  factors.  As  re-
quired  by  the  Commercial  Fishing  Industry  Vessel  Safety  Act  of  1988  (P.L.  100– 
424), the Coast Guard recommended establishing a commercial fishing licensing pro-
gram  to  improve  the  competency  of  those  operating  vessels  within  the  industry. 
Since  passage  of  the  Act,  vessel  safety  equipment  and  the  ability  of  crews  to  prop-
erly  use  that  equipment  has  improved.  The  Coast  Guard  has  no  legal  authority  for 
licensing, the education, training, and competency demonstration. 

A number of safety improvement alternatives could address risk tolerance within 
the  commercial  fishing  industry  (see  Table  8–1  of  the  NRC  report,  Safety  Improve-
ment Alternatives). They include: 

• Mandatory  training  and  demonstration  of  competency  in  safety  equipment  and 
emergency  procedures  such  as  firefighting,  man  overboard  recovery,  and  dam-
age control. 

• Training and competency demonstration in vessel operations. 
• Adoption  of  safe  operating  practices,  such  as  limiting  work  hours,  providing 
mandatory  rest  periods,  navigational  watch  procedures,  and  wearing  personal 
flotation devices on deck. 

External Factors 

Management,  economics,  weather  and  sea  conditions  are  external  factors  that  af-
fect  fishing  vessel  safety.  Management  systems  reduce  participation  and  encourage 
the exit of older and less safe vessels from the fleet improving safety records. Under 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

58 

the  reauthorized  Magnuson-Stevens  Fisheries  Management  and  Conservation  Act, 
the National Marine Fisheries Service (NMFS) and the fisheries management coun-
cils  are  obliged  to  address  safety  under  section  301  (national  standard  10)  and  in 
section  303(a)(9)(C),  which  includes  safety  assessments  in  fishery  impact  state-
ments. 
Future Efforts to Promote Fishing Safety 

The  Coast  Guard  believes  that  the  focus  of  future  commercial  fishing  industry 
safety  improvements  must  be  focused  on  preventing  casualties.  Existing  authority 
is focused on equipment to be used in surviving a casualty. While safety equipment 
carriage is part of any safety regime, ensuring vessels are suitable for the intended 
service  and  that  their  crews  are  adequately  trained  and  experienced  is  of  vital  im-
portance. This approach addresses both vessel integrity issues and risk management 
practices.  All  top  fishing  nations,  except  the  U.S.,  have  adopted  standards  to  ad-
dress these issues. For instance, in Canada, commercial fishing vessels must under-
go mandatory examinations and operators must be licensed. 
Responsibility for Improving Safety 

Primary  responsibility  for  improving  safety  within  the  commercial  fishing  indus-
try  rests  with  the  industry  itself  including  owners,  operators,  and  vessel  personnel. 
Unfortunately, the history of safety within the industry has shown without Federal 
intervention, most vessel operators do not take the initiative to improve. 

The  Coast  Guard  is  a  nationally  and  internationally  recognized  expert  in  mari-
time  safety  (standards  development,  enforcement,  and  search  and  rescue)  and  des-
ignated  by  the  Commercial  Fishing  Industry  Vessel  Safety  Act  of  1988  as  the  na-
tional lead for fishing vessel safety. While the Coast Guard is the lead agency, many 
other  agencies  share  responsibilities.  Federal  and  state  fisheries  managers  have  a 
significant influence on safety but their primary responsibilities focus on sustainable 
resource management, distribution of natural resources, and economics of the indus-
try.  Other  enforcement  agencies  (OSHA)  and  research  agencies  (NIOSH)  also  have 
responsibility for contributing to safety improvements. 
Risk associated with ‘‘Race for Fish’’ Fisheries 

There  is  general  agreement  that  fisheries  managed  as  open  access  or  regulated 
open  access,  which  create  a  ‘‘race  for  fish’’  and  derby  style  operations,  encounter 
more  safety  problems  than  fisheries  under  alternative  management  schemes.  The 
limited opportunity created by such restrictions tends to tip the balance toward eco-
nomic  viability  at  the  expense  of  safety.  The  ‘‘race  for  fish’’  style  fisheries  lead  to 
excessive  work  hours,  risk  taking  such  as  overloading,  operating  in  undesirable 
weather  conditions  and  other  safety  problems.  Research  has  shown  that  there  are 
significantly  safer  methods  of  managing  fisheries  than  the  derby  style  and  many 
fisheries management councils have recognized this and taken actions to implement 
limited  access  privilege  programs  to  reduce  the  race  for  fish.  Additionally,  other 
management  practices  used  to  ensure  sustainable  fisheries  may  also  resolve  safety 
issues (e.g., closed areas and seasons and gear restrictions). 

Question  2.  Does  current  law,  such  as  the  Commercial  Fishing  Industry  Vessel 
Safety Act of 1988, address any of the safety concerns posed by a race for fish? How 
would  fishery  management  practices  have  to  change  to  improve  fishing  safety?  Is 
there  evidence  from  other  fisheries  to  support  this?  Do  the  fishermen  in  these  fish-
eries feel that safety has been improved? 

Answer. No. The Commercial Fishing Industry Vessel Safety Act of 1988 address-

es carriage of safety equipment but not fisheries management practices. 

Recent  changes  to  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Fisheries  Conservation  and  Manage-
ment  Reauthorization  Act  require  additional  consideration  of  safety  in  the  develop-
ment  of  fisheries  management  plans.  Consequently,  the  Coast  Guard  is  working 
with  National  Marine  Fisheries  Service  (NMFS)  to  improve  how  fisheries  manage-
ment plans address safety. 

As  a  general  rule,  fisheries  that  have  adopted  effective  constraints  on  participa-
tion  and  effort,  such  as  limited  access  privilege  programs,  show  safety  improve-
ments.  Examples  include  the  halibut  and  sablefish  Individual  Fishing  Quota  (IFQ) 
program,  the  Bering  Sea  pollock  cooperatives,  and  the  Alaska  crab  rationalization 
programs.  Under  the  reauthorized  Magnuson-Stevens  Act,  section  303A  addresses 
such limited access privilege programs and provides requirements for implementing 
future programs. One of those requirements is that the limited access privilege pro-
gram shall promote fishing safety. NMFS anticipates increasing the number of such 
programs in the next several years in virtually all the regions of the U.S. Exclusive 
Economic Zone. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

Fishermen  in  the  above  mentioned  management  systems  have  seen  an  improve-

ment in safety. 

59 

Question  3.  Is  safety  a  concern  for  the  Pacific  cod  freezer  longline  fleet?  What 
would  be  the  safety  implications  of  allowing  the  Pacific  cod  freezer  longline  fishery 
to  form  a  co-op?  To  what  extent  is  safety  a  reason  for  Congress  to  move  forward 
with the proposed co-op legislation? 

Answer. The Coast Guard has safety concerns for the Pacific Cod freezer longliner 

fleet for several reasons: 

1.  A  significant  number  of  personnel  involved  in  vessel  operations,  most  of 
whom have not had formal safety training. 
2. The area of operation is harsh and remote from established rescue assets and 
the most productive fishing is during winter months. 
3. The age of the fleet is relatively old. Older vessels are a higher risk for vessel 
loss and more difficult and costly to maintain. 
4.  Many  older  vessels  in  this  fleet  were  ‘‘grandfathered’’  and  not  required  to 
meet  the  latest  standards  for  commercial  fishing  industry  vessels  for  equip-
ment, design, or damage stability. 
5.  There  have  been  a  number  of  significant  vessel  losses  in  this  or  associated 
fisheries where each resulted in a large number of fatalities. 

The  Coast  Guard  is  not  aware  of  any  adverse  safety  implications  resulting  from 
formation of fishing cooperatives. In fact, fishing cooperatives can promote improve-
ments  in  safety  if  structured  in  ways  that  encourage  participants  to  consolidate  ef-
forts  and  remove  less  efficient  and  less  safe  vessels.  In  this  context,  section  303A 
of  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Fisheries  Conservation  and  Management  Reauthorization 
Act includes safety as one objective of limited access privilege programs. 

Safety  of  life  should  be  a  major  consideration  in  developing  all  fisheries  manage-

ment plans including cooperatives. 

Question  4.  Is  there  an  immediate  need  for  legislation  to  allow  vessel  replace-
ment? What is the safety record of the AFA pollock and head & gut fleets? Is safety 
an  immediate  concern  for  this  fleet?  From  your  professional  experience,  can  you 
please share your thoughts on vessel replacement in this fleet? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  supports  replacement  vessels  because  higher  safety 
standards  would  be  required.  Safety  is  enhanced  even  more  with  new  construction 
rather than a major modification of an existing vessel. 
Safety Record of the AFA Pollock and Head and Gut Fleets 

The  Bering  Sea  Aleutian  Island  (BSAI)  Pollock  fishery  is  the  largest  fishery  by 
volume in the U.S. During the 1990s the fleet became more competitive and season 
lengths  decreased  creating  a  derby  style  fishery.  The  America  Fisheries  Act  (AFA) 
changed this fishery to a quota-based system which resulted in a 45 percent decline 
in the number of factory trawlers and a 15 percent decline in catcher vessels in the 
fishery.  The  change  from  the  open-access  system  to  a  quota-based  system  was  not 
implemented until 1999. 

The Pollock fishery had relatively low rates of fatal injuries and search and rescue 
cases  prior  to  the  AFA,  so  safety  has  to  be  measured  by  non-fatal  injuries  as  well. 
Injury  rates  were  evaluated  by  the  National  Institute  for  Occupational  Safety  and 
Health (NIOSH) based on 100 vessel-weeks in the fishery. 

The Pollock factory trawlers showed a 76 percent decrease in injury rate from the 
four-year time period before the AFA implementation to the six-year period after im-
plementation.  The  Head  and  Gut  trawl  catcher  processor  vessels,  not  managed  by 
the  quota  system,  had  a  non-fatal  injury  rate  of  0.5  per  100  vessel-weeks  for  the 
same time periods. This was a fairly steady rate for vessels that operated similarly 
to the factory trawlers, before and after AFA. 

Other factors could have influenced the reduction in injury rates besides the AFA 
and  the  elimination  of  racing  to  fish,  including  vessels  dropping  out  of  the  fishery, 
corporate safety improvements, increased compliance with safety and equipment re-
quirements  on  the  vessels,  and  new  North  Pacific  Fishing  Vessel  Owners  Associa-
tion (NPFVOA) safety training programs. 
Fleet Safety Concerns 

There  is  immediate  safety  concern  for  the  AFA  Pollock  and  Head  and  Gut  Fleet 

for the following reasons: 

1. There are a significant number of personnel that operate and work on board 
each of these vessels, many of whom have not had formal safety training. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

60 

2. The areas in which these vessels operate experience harsh conditions and are 
remote from established rescue assets. 
3.  The  relatively  old  average  age  of  the  vessels  poses  a  higher  risk  for  vessel 
loss. Older vessels are more difficult and costly to maintain. 
4.  Older  vessels,  such  as  in  this  fleet,  were  ‘‘grandfathered’’  and  not  required 
to  meet  the  latest  standards  for  commercial  fishing  industry  vessels  for  equip-
ment, design, or damage stability. 

Vessel Replacement 

There  are  significant  safety  benefits  from  vessel  replacement  including  higher 
standards for design, outfitting, construction, maintenance, watertight integrity and 
stability,  and  vessel  survivability  after  a  casualty  where  damage  is  incurred.  Addi-
tionally, new vessels can be more effectively and efficiently maintained. 

Question 5. Commercial fishing vessels are not subject to inspection and are only 
required to carry basic safety equipment. Do we need more stringent laws and regu-
lations?  In  your  opinion,  why  have  we  failed  to  implement  more  stringent  regula-
tions?  In  your  experience  with  the  fishing  community,  do  you  believe  that  the  fish-
ing  community  would  support  more  stringent  safety  regulations?  In  what  safety 
areas do you believe regulation and Congressional action is most needed? 

Answer.  Yes.  More  stringent  laws  and  regulations  are  needed  to  improve  safety 
within  the  commercial  fishing  industry,  and  the  Coast  Guard  addressed  this  issue 
in  the  Advance  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking,  published  March  31,  2008.  When 
the rule is final, the Coast Guard will have fully implemented the safety regulations 
supported by the existing authority. 

The  progression  of  safety  within  the  commercial  fishing  industry  from  voluntary 
standards  to  the  existing  requirements  for  safety  equipment  has  convinced  most 
within  the  industry  that  regulations  are  beneficial.  The  Commercial  Fishing  Indus-
try  Vessel  Safety  Advisory  Committee,  made  up  of  fishermen  and  other  industry 
stakeholders,  have  continually  supported  additional  safety  requirements  with  the 
caveat that economic impact must be carefully balanced with expected benefits. 

Safety  improvements  from  existing  authority  and  educational  outreach  programs 
have resulted in a plateau in casualties over the last 7 to 8 years. The Coast Guard 
supports  the  intermediate  steps  to  address  prevention  and  operator  competency  re-
flected  in  H.R.  2830.  Such  measures  address  vessel  integrity  issues  through  addi-
tional design, construction, and maintenance combined with periodic mandatory ex-
aminations  of  the  vessel  and  requirements  for  operator  training  and  demonstration 
of  competency.  Such  an  approach  is  consistent  with  recommendations  of  the  Na-
tional  Research  Council  in  Fishing  Vessel  Safety—A  Blueprint  for  a  National  Pro-
gram,  1991.  Additional  issues  of  concern  include  drug  and  alcohol  use  within  the 
industry  and  lack  of  appropriate  standards  to  address  fatigue  caused  by  excessive 
work hours. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

JOHN BUNDY 

Question  1.  From  your  experience,  if  the  freezer  longline  co-op  proposal  was  sub-
mitted to the North Pacific Council, what process would it go through and how long 
would it take? 

Answer.  First,  the  matter  would  need  to  be  put  ‘‘in  the  pipe-line’’  during  ‘‘staff 
tasking’’ which normally occurs at the end of each meeting. That action takes a ma-
jority vote by Council members and is not automatic because there is much competi-
tion  for  the  Council’s  attention.  Second,  also  during  staff  tasking,  a  majority  of 
Council members must agree to actually devote staff time to the matter and to place 
the issue on the agenda. Assuming those steps are taken, based on past Council ac-
tions  in  the  context  of  rationalizing  fisheries,  the  process  until  implementation 
would  take  years,  possibly  up  to  five  or  more.  Attachment  #1  hereto  provides  the 
timeline taken in similar past Council actions. 

agenda? 

Question 1a. What are some of the major competing priorities facing the Council’s 

Answer. The Council is indeed very busy and has a heavy work load at each and 
every  meeting.  Over  the  recently  completed  5-meeting  cycle,  the  Council  failed  to 
complete  its  agenda  in  the  majority  of  cases.  Attachment  #2  hereto  displays  the 
items  tentatively  on  the  agenda  for  the  next  three  meetings.  Prioritizing  these 
issues  is  a  complicated  and  on-going  process.  Generally,  I  think  the  Council  view 
would be that everything currently on the agenda has priority over something new. 
Some of the ‘‘major competing priorities’’ would include Bering Sea crab rationaliza-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

61 

tion program review, Bering Sea salmon bycatch in the pollock fishery, Arctic Fish-
ery  Management  Plan,  halibut  charter  (a  troublesome  issue  that  the  Council  has 
been dealing with now for approximately 14 years), annual quota-setting for 18 spe-
cie categories in the Bering Sea/Aleutian Islands (BSAI) and 20 in the Gulf of Alas-
ka,  restrictions  of  commercial  fishing  due  to  declined  Stellar  Sea  Lion  populations, 
and habitat protection. 

Question 1b. What is the Council’s position on this co-op issue? Would the Council 

object if Congress wanted to move forward outside of the Council process? 

Answer.  I  cannot  speak  for  the  Council  or  any  of  its  individual  members.  How-
ever,  I  can  say  that  I  do  not  know  of  any  opposition  from  any  Council  member  to 
the  Freezer  Longline  Coalition  efforts.  One  Council  member,  the  representative  for 
the  State  of  Washington,  is  on  record  stating:  ‘‘The  Department  of  Fish  &  Wildlife 
is  strongly  in  support  of  cooperative  fishing  efforts  . . .  [and]  supported  the  recent 
actions  of  the  . . .  Council  in  restructuring  the  . . .  Cod  fishery  . . .  and  expected 
that  the  Freezer  Longline  sector  would  be  able  to  form  a  voluntary  cooperative  as 
a  result  of  the  Council’s  action.’’  I  believe  this  is  indicative  of  the  attitude  of  most 
if not all Council members and I am confident the Council would not ‘‘object’’. 

Question  2.  If  the  argument  for  doing  this  through  Congressional  action  is  that 
Congress  would  act  faster  than  doing  it  through  the  Council,  what  does  that  say 
about the Council system? 

Answer.  It  is  not  my  intent  to  be  critical  of  the  Council  or  to  propose  that  the 
system is broken and needs to be fixed. On the contrary, in my 9 years on the Coun-
cil  I  witnessed  many  important  achievements,  including  a  regulatory  regime  that 
cut  bird  bycatch  by  69  percent,  closure  of  277,100  square  nm  to  bottom  trawling, 
and  special  protection  for  discreet  areas  of  sponge  and  coral  habitat  and  all 
seamounts. The Council’s conservative science-based approach to quota setting came 
to be recognized as ‘‘the Alaska Model’’ and was incorporated in the latest reauthor-
ization  of  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Act  and  applied  to  all  Councils.  But,  the  Council 
is also extremely busy and not able to address every legitimate issue. And it is also 
true  that  the  Council  and  Congress  often  work  together  or  in  tandem  particularly 
on  rationalization  issues.  The  American  Fisheries  Act,  which  provided  the  basis  for 
rationalization of the world’s largest whitefish fishery, was enacted by Congress and 
implemented by the Council. Both the Bering Sea crab rationalization program and 
Gulf  rockfish  pilot  program  were  done  by  the  Council  at  the  direction  of  Congress. 
Question  2a.  As  a  9-year  veteran  of  the  North  Pacific  Council,  in  your  opinion, 
what  would  it  take  for  the  Council  to  act  faster  on  these  and  other  issues  before 
us? 

Answer.  The  Council  itself  is  in  the  process  of  addressing  this  issue.  Given  the 
public  process  involved  and  the  importance  of  the  issues  to  the  participants  in-
volved, and the requirements of the National Environmental Policy Act, I think the 
Council  will  continue  at  about  the  same  pace  it  has.  Of  course,  there  are  ways  in 
which the Council can better discipline itself and its members to be more time effi-
cient,  but  I  don’t  see  that  any  big  time  savings  are  possible.  I  do  think  it  is  up  to 
the  Council  to  make  any  changes  necessary  to  at  least  stay  within  its  agenda  be-
cause members of the public often travel great distances to participate. 

Question 3. Is safety really a concern for the Pacific cod freezer longline fleet? 
Answer.  Indeed,  it  is.  There  is  almost  universal  agreement,  as  testified  to  by 
many  of  the  witnesses  at  our  hearing,  that  vessels  engaging  in  a  race  for  fish  will 
find themselves in unsafe operating conditions inherently caused, or encouraged by, 
the  ‘‘catching  as  much  as  you  can—as  fast  as  you  can’’  mentality  of  a  derby  style 
fishery. We would like to eliminate this from our fishery entirely. In addition, a coop 
will  provide  the  stability  that  will  encourage  upgrading  or  replacing  vessels  in  our 
fleet,  some  of  which  have  hulls  dating  from  WWII.  We  believe  that  we  have  a  safe 
fleet,  and  that  we  are  meeting  all  safety  requirements  imposed  on  us,  but  vessels 
are machinery and they ultimately wear out. Safety standards evolve over time and, 
when  a  replacement  occurs,  a  new  vessel  is  required  to  meet  all  modern  safety  re-
quirements. 

Question 3a. To what extent is safety a reason for Congress to move forward with 

the proposed co-op legislation? 

Answer.  Based  on  the  testimony  of  Leslie  Hughes,  Executive  Director,  North  Pa-
cific  Vessel  Owners’  Association,  and  Commander  Christopher  Woodley,  United 
States  Coast  Guard,  safety  alone  is  ample  incentive  for  Congress  to  move  forward 
on this issue in a timely manner. 

Question 4. As you know, the Magnuson-Stevens Act is the gold-standard for fish-
eries management. If the North Pacific Fisheries Management Council were to con-
sider the co-op proposal, one of the first questions the Council would ask is whether 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

62 

a  co-op  is  consistent  with  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Act’s  ten  national  standards.  Do 
you believe that the formation of a co-op in this fishery is consistent with the Mag-
nuson-Stevens  Act’s  ten  national  standards  for  fishery  management,  in  particular 
Standard 9 on bycatch and Standard 10 on safety? 

Answer.  For  Congress  to  provide  the  tools  for  formation  of  a  voluntary  harvest 
cooperative  in  the  freezer  longline  cod  fishery  very  clearly  falls  within  at  least  8  of 
the 10 National Standards and is not inconsistent with any of them. To demonstrate 
this point, it is convenient to cite letters in the record from two independent sources: 
Environmental  Defense  Fund  (EDF)  and  State  of  Washington  Department  of  Fish 
and Wildlife (DFW). 

No. 1: Optimum yield and prevent overfishing. ‘‘[I]ncreased product quality and 
supply  to  consumers.’’  DFW.  ‘‘[Coops]  like  these  have  succeeded  in  . . .  ending 
overfishing.’’ EDF. 
No.  2:  Best  scientific  information  available.  ‘‘[F]isheries  with  catch  share  sys-
tems  are  seven  times  more  likely  than  conventional  systems  to  be  rated  ‘well 
managed’ by the Marine Stewardship Council.’’ EDF. See, also Testimony of Dr. 
James Sanchirico. 
No.  4:  Allocations  fair  and  equitable;  promote  conservation.  ‘‘The  formation  of 
coops allow*stronger support for sustainable fishery management.’’ DFW. 
No.  5:  Efficiency  in  using  fishery  resources.  ‘‘When  participants  have  a  secure 
portion  of  the  catch,  they  gain  the  flexibility  to  make  business  decisions  that 
improve  safety,  enhance  the  value  of  their  asset,  and  promote  healthy  fishing 
stocks.’’ EDF. 
No.  7:  Minimize  costs.  ‘‘The  [EDF]  report  shows  that  . . .  catch  share  fisheries 
deployed 20 percent less gear to catch the same amount of fish.’’ EDF. 
No. 8: Fishing communities. 10.7 percent of the total Bering Sea Aleutian Island 
Pacific cod quota is set aside for the 65 Alaska Native CDQ coastal communities 
representing 25,000 residents. CDQ groups are owners in 13 of the vessels that 
would make up the voluntary harvest coop in the freezer longline sector. 
No.  9:  Minimize  bycatch.  ‘‘The  formation  of  coops  [will]  . . .  reduce  impacts  to 
the  ecosystem.’’  DFW.  ‘‘The  [EDF]  report  shows  that,  with  catch  share  pro-
grams, bycatch . . . was reduced by more than 40 percent.’’ EDF. 
No. 10: Safety at sea. ‘‘The formation of coops [will] . . . improve safety at sea.’’ 
DFW. ‘‘The [EDF] report also finds that safety among fishermen more than dou-
bled.’’  EDF.  ‘‘Researchers  found  that  quota-based  and  cooperative  fishery  man-
agement regimes [in the North Pacific] have a strong potential to improve safe-
ty  over  open  access  fisheries.  . . .  In  the  king  and  Tanner  crab  fishery  . . . 
there  have  been  no  fatalities,  no  vessel  losses,  and  no  search  and  rescue  cases 
conducted  by  the  Coast  Guard  since  implementation  of  the  crab  rationalization 
program. . . . Based upon [our research] formation of the Freezer Longline Co-
operative could potentially lead to slower fishing and processing pace, increased 
fishing  days,  flexibility  to  allow  operators  to  avoid  severe  weather,  reduced  fa-
tigue  among  crew  members,  a  more  experienced  professional  crew,  and  finally 
reduced  pressure  to  fish  when  the  vessel  and  crew  are  not  ready.’’  Testimony 
of Commander Woodley, United States Coast Guard. 

Question  4a.  Do  you  believe  a  co-op  would  be  inconsistent  with  any  of  those  na-

tional standards? 

son-Stevens Act? 

Answer. No. See above. 
Question 4b. Do you believe that the co-op proposal is consistent with the Magnu-

Answer. Yes. See above. 
Question 5. The Freezer Longline Coalition has been negotiating a fishing cooper-
ative  agreement  for  over  2  years,  and  is  now  asking  Congress  for  help  in  passing 
legislation  on  the  matter.  Could  you  please  describe  the  process  the  Freezer 
Longline Coalition has gone through over the past 2 years, and what kind of support 
there is for establishing a co-op? 
Answer. Negotiation Process. 
The  Freezer  Longline  Coalition  members  have  indeed  been  working  closely  since 
early  2006  to  form  a  fisheries  cooperative.  Earlier  efforts  to  begin  gathering  data 
with the intent of forming a fisheries cooperative go back to early 2004. Many mem-
bers have worked closely with the Council going back to pre–1995 when the Council 
passed  the  first  step  in  moving  to  cooperative  fisheries  in  the  North  Pacific  by  im-
plementing a moratorium on new vessels entering the fishery. 

Several  Council  actions  took  place  during  the  period  1995–2008  and  are  detailed 
in  our  documents  package,  chapter  fourteen.  All  of  these  steps  were  part  of  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

63 

ground  work  for  the  formation  of  a  voluntary  cooperative.  To  date  all  of  the  other 
major  fisheries  controlled  by  the  Council  have  formed  fisheries  cooperatives.  Be-
cause  of  one  company’s  intransigence  ours  remains  the  only  major  fishery  still  in-
volved in the ‘‘race for fish.’’ 

After numerous meetings in which FCA participated, and days of in person nego-
tiations  in  which  FCA  participated,  and  now  years  of  follow-up,  that  one  company 
remains the lone holdout. Although there are other companies in the group similarly 
situated  in  terms  of  fishing  history  and  ‘‘pioneer’’  status,  and  even  though  FCA  re-
ceived  the  same  fair  and  equitable  treatment  that  every  other  company  was  af-
forded, FCA chooses not to participate in the voluntary harvest cooperative. Indeed, 
FCA  has  received  preferential  treatment  because  of  its  intransigence.  Simply  by 
signing  the  agreement,  FCA’s  two  vessels  would  have  more  fish  than  thirty  of  the 
thirty six other vessels. 

At  each  and  every  turn  in  the  negotiations  FCA  has  thrown  out  more  objections 
and taken a new stance of some aspect of our agreement. FCA’s IFQ proposal, first 
raised  at  the  recent  hearing,  is  diametrically  opposed  to  the  position  taken  at  the 
‘‘stakeholders’  meeting’’  with  Congressional  staff  in  December  of  2007  where  their 
representatives  stated  FCA  is  morally  apposed  to  voluntary  cooperatives  of  any 
kind.  Kenny  Down,  executive  director  of  the  Freezer  Longline  Coalition  continues 
to  engage  FCA’s  CEO  in  discussions  and  reports  they  are  as  far  away  as  ever.  Our 
group  has  concluded  that  for  reasons  we  don’t  fully  understand  FCA  cannot  or  will 
not sign our membership agreement even though it would benefit as much, and like-
ly more, than most of the other members. 

Support. 
The  record  includes  many  letters  of  support  for  our  position  from  a  very  broad 
range  if  interests,  including  the  Governor  of  the  State  of  Washington,  the  Environ-
mental  Defense  Fund,  numerous  industry  groups,  financial  institutions,  and  all  six 
Alaska Community Development Quota (CDQ) groups. All-in-all, a total of 15 letters 
of support in addition to the strong support in the form of testimony at this hearing 
from  independent  witnesses  Dr.  James  Sanchirico,  Leslie  Hughes,  and  Commander 
Woodley. Compare to this the dearth of support for the FCA position. 

Question 6. What would be the implications of doing an IFQ system for the Pacific 

Cod freezer longline fishery as Fishing Company of Alaska suggests? 

Answer. The fundamental difference between an IFQ system and a voluntary har-
vest  coop  system  is  that  a  governmental  entity  must  create  and  administer  the 
former,  including  initial  allocations  and  transfers,  whereas  private  cooperation  and 
agreement  creates  and  administers  the  latter,  including  initial  allocations  and 
transfers  on  an  on-going  basis.  An  IFQ  system  involves  allocation  to  individuals  by 
the  government,  whether  by  the  Council  or  Congress.  Thus,  the  aspect  of  a  ‘‘give- 
away’’ of public resource to private parties is much stronger compared to a private, 
cooperative  arrangement  without  the  force  of  government  and  with  the  Council  re-
taining full discretion and authority over the management regime. Since a voluntary 
cooperative  takes  care  of  its  own  allocations  and  transfers  among  members,  it  is 
substantially  less  expensive  for  the  U.S.  taxpayer  compared  to  an  IFQ  system  that 
needs to be administered on a vessel-by-vessel basis by a governmental agency. Be-
cause  an  IFQ  system  involves  allocations  on  an  individual  basis,  they  tend  to  be 
very  contentious  and  time-consuming  for  a  Council  to  create  and  NMFS  to  imple-
ment.  For  example,  the  best  known  IFQ  system  in  the  North  Pacific,  halibut  and 
sablefish, took 10 years of Council process and an additional 2+ years before it was 
implemented.  By  comparison,  once  the  tools  were  in  place,  the  catcher/processor 
(CP) sectors in the Pacific whiting fishery and pollock fishery formed voluntary har-
vest  cooperatives  in  a  matter  of  weeks.  While  our  group  is  not  opposed  to  the  IFQ 
system  of  fisheries  management,  we  view  it  as  inferior  to  a  voluntary  harvest  coop 
system. Finally, for FCA to propose it at this point appears to us as another excuse 
for doing nothing. 

Question  6a.  What  would  be  some  of  the  pros  and  cons  of  pursuing  an  IFQ  sys-

tem? 

Answer. Please see above. 
Question 7. If a co-op were formed in the Pacific cod freezer longline fishery, who 

do you believe would be the winners and losers? 

Answer. Owners of 34 of the 36 vessels in our group agree that all would be win-
ners even though not a single party would get his or her optimum ‘‘share’’ of fishing 
history. The reason for this attitude is that all agree the benefits of a voluntary har-
vest  coop  out-weigh  this  detriment.  The  Fishing  Company  of  Alaska  would  receive 
a  particularly  generous  advantage  because  whether  it  joins  the  coop  or  chooses  not 
to,  it  will  receive  a  greater  share  than  it  fishes  currently  or  would  be  reasonably 
expected  to  catch  in  the  future  in  an  open  access  system.  Other  winners  include 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

64 

crew  (better,  safer  jobs),  consumers  (increased  recovery  and  quality),  the  environ-
ment (less bycatch, greater commitment to sustainability), and Alaska Native coast-
al communities (greater royalties and returns from ownership). 

Question  7a.  What  would  be  the  implications  on  the  value  of  the  fishing  compa-

nies involved? 

Answer. As explained above, there will be a safety gain, an ecosystem gain, a con-
sumer gain, and there should be a financial gain in the value of the companies. The 
basic reason for the financial gain, as explained in the Environmental Defense Fund 
letter, is that economic resources previously invested to improve success in a waste-
ful race for fish will be diverted to protecting the resources and improving the value 
of each fish harvested. Some specific ways to create value will include improved re-
tention and utilization (recovery), timing harvest activity to market conditions, low-
ering bycatch, reducing human risks and injury, creating new products and improv-
ing quality. 

Question 7b. What is the financial benefit, both immediate and long-term, to these 

companies? 

Answer. Whether a vessel is owned by individuals in a family, partnership or cor-
poration,  I  believe  the  EDF  letter  summary  is  correct  and  has  been  borne  out  by 
all the rationalized fisheries in the North Pacific. ‘‘When participants have a secure 
portion  of  the  catch,  they  gain  flexibility  to  make  business  decisions  that  improve 
safety,  enhance  the  value  of  their  asset,  and  promote  healthy  fishing  stocks.’’  As  a 
result, fishing seasons will be extended, which ‘‘will stabilize fishing and processing 
jobs’’,  bycatch  will  be  reduced,  safety  will  increase,  environmental  damage  will  de-
crease, ‘‘and economic performance increases substantially.’’ 

Question  7c.  Would  the  formation  of  a  co-op  help  the  fishing  companies  involved 

in obtaining financing and loans to recapitalize their vessels? 

Answer.  Yes,  we  hope  so.  As  indicated  by  support  from  financial  institutions, 
catch  shares,  whether  created  by  government  in  the  form  of  IFQ  or  by  private  ar-
rangement  in  the  form  of  a  voluntary  cooperative  agreement,  have  become  recog-
nized  as  value  for  collateralization  of  loans.  This  has  allowed  vessel  upgrades  that 
improve  safety  and  new  equipment  that  achieves  better  utilization  of  fishery  re-
sources. It will ultimately lead to vessel replacement which will bring the fleet into 
full compliance with modern safety and fuel efficiency standards. 

Question  8.  If  the  Pacific  cod  freezer  longline  fishery  were  to  form  a  co-op,  what 

would be the implications in terms of jobs? 

Answer.  Based  on  my  experience  with  other  catcher/process  (CP)  voluntary  har-
vest  coops  (Pacific  Whiting  Conservation  Cooperative  and  Pollock  Conservation  Co-
operative), I believe the implications for jobs in the freezer longline sector managed 
under a similar coop system are very positive. 

Question 8a. Would there be fewer jobs in the fishery? 
Answer.  Employment  patterns  in  dynamic  industries  are  constantly  shifting,  but 
the  important  point  to  be  made  is  that  good  workers  on  freezer  longliners  are  in 
short supply and in demand. As we increase sustainability through better recovery, 
quality, safety and new product forms, jobs on our vessels will be more steady, ‘‘pro-
fessional’’  and  lucrative.  This  has  been  the  experience  with  the  CP  fleets  in  Pacific 
whiting  and  Alaska  pollock  fisheries  and  I  believe  will  be  the  result  in  the  freezer 
longline  CP  fleet.  The  dramatic  consolidation  and  job  loss  experienced  in  the  first 
years  after  implementation  of  Bering  Sea  crab  rationalization  may  seem  contrary 
to  this  prediction,  but  that  situation  was  very  different  and,  frankly,  due  to  faulty 
fisheries  management  by  the  Council  and  State  of  Alaska.  Most  of  the  Bering  Sea 
crab  fisheries  had  been  allowed  to  become  extremely  over-capitalized  to  the  point 
where there were approximately 230 active vessels when only about 80 were needed 
to  harvest  the  available  resources.  As  a  result,  there  was  tremendous  waste  that 
needed to be wrung out of the system and much of that waste was exhibited in dan-
gerous  and  very  short  fishing  seasons  and  spectacles  made  popular  by  the  ‘‘Dead-
liest  Catch’’  television  series.  When  rationalization  finally  came,  the  consolidation 
was dramatic. The freezer longline fleet is not anywhere near the extreme situation 
that prevailed in the crab fleet pre-rationalization. Instead, it is very much like the 
CP  whiting  and  pollock  fleets  where,  post-coop,  there  has  been  no  noticeable  loss 
in  the  number  of  jobs  and  where  the  jobs  have  in  fact  become  more  stable,  profes-
sional and lucrative. 

Question 8b. What would the quality and predictability of those jobs look like? 
Answer. At this time, a freezer longline vessel in the open access cod fishery will 
fish an estimated 3 months in calendar year 2008. The ‘‘A’’ season was the shortest 
on  record,  as  it  was  in  2007  and  the  year  before  that.  The  current  situation  is  not 
good  for  anyone  trying  to  earn  enough  to  support  a  family.  With  a  co-op  system, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

65 

the  employment  opportunities  will  be  more  stable  as  fishing  trips  are  lengthened 
by slowing the pace and producing more volume and value from the same resource. 
Without  a  co-op,  under  current  circumstances,  the  race  will  continue,  the  jobs  will 
become less desirable and it will be even more difficult for these vessels to find good 
crew. 

Regarding  employment  issues,  the  recent  report  which  we  have  made  part  of  the 
record, published by Environmental Defense Fund in collaboration with noted econo-
mists,  is  particularly  relevant.  In  general,  it  found  that  in  every  case  studied  eco-
nomics improved after cooperative programs were initiated. 

Question  9.  Do  you  support  allowing  vessel  replacement  in  the  pollock  catcher 

processor fleet and the head & gut fleet? 

Answer. As I testified, I strongly support the vessel rebuild and replacement legis-
lation  for  the  AFA  pollock  fleet  as  has  been  passed  twice  by  the  House.  I  have  not 
seen any proposed legislation or legislative language that would expand coverage to 
the  H&G  fleet,  but  I  support  it  conceptually  for  vessels  that  will  be  in  a  harvest 
cooperative. 

Question  10.  How  urgent  is  the  need  for  vessel  replacement  legislation  for  the 
AFA  and  non-AFA  fleets?  Is  safety  an  immediate  concern  for  these  fleets?  What  is 
the safety record of these fleets? 

Answer. I believe on balance the AFA pollock fleet is the safest fleet of all vessels 
in  the  North  Pacific  commercial  fisheries.  All  the  catcher  processors  and 
motherships are loadlined and almost all are classed. They are well maintained and 
operated  by  trained  professional  personnel.  The  fleet’s  safety  record  is  excellent.  In 
that  sense,  safety  is  not  the  fundamental  argument  for  this  amendment.  Having 
said  that,  these  vessels  have  a  ‘‘useful  life’’.  All  pollock  catcher  processors  and 
motherships are 18 years or older. Many of them are rebuilt on hulls that are more 
than  30  years  old.  And  when  they  are  replaced,  the  new  vessels  will  be  required 
to comply with evolved safety and fuel efficiency standards. 

This  proposed  legislation  has  been  passed  twice  by  the  House  as  part  of  Coast 
Guard authorization bills. There is no known opposition to its provisions. As I testi-
fied,  it  will  allow  the  owners  of  these  vessels  to  adopt  efficient  energy  technologies, 
preserve family-wage value added processing jobs in the U.S. and allow the fleet to 
maintain its competitiveness in world markets by optimizing fishing operations. 

Question  11.  How  would  vessel  replacement  impact  different  companies  in  dif-
ferent  ways  in  the  AFA  catcher  processor  fleet?  Financially  and  competitively,  how 
would  vessel  replacement  benefit  these  fishing  companies?  Is  it  through  higher  or 
more  efficient  fish  catches,  or  through  additional  fish  processing  that  adds  value  to 
the  product?  Would  vessel  replacement  benefit  some  companies  more  than  others? 
How? How much would American Seafoods benefit compared to its competitors? 

Answer.  In  the  long  view,  the  AFA  vessel  replacement  amendment  is  relatively 
neutral  regarding  impact  on  the  various  owners  of  catcher  vessels,  catcher  proc-
essors and motherships because, at some point, each vessel has a useful life and will 
need  to  be  rebuilt  or  changed  out.  The  amendment  removes  the  unwarranted  re-
striction in current law on vessel replacement only in the event of ‘‘total loss or con-
structive total loss’’ and provides flexibility to the vessel owner to replace the vessel 
in a manner that optimizes fishing and fish processing practices. 

Question 12. Do you believe it is necessary from a public policy perspective to ad-
dress the harvest cap at the same time as vessel replacement? How would it impact 
the competitive dynamics of the fleet? Are there any public policy benefits to raising 
the harvest cap? Are there any potential disadvantages? 

Answer.  Neither  Glacier  Fish  Company  nor  I  have  taken  a  position  with  regard 
to  this  issue,  i.e.,  raising  the  harvest  cap.  It  is  my  opinion  there  is  no  legitimate 
public policy rationale to link the issue with vessel rebuild. 

ATTACHMENT #1 

Past Council Actions. 

Bering  Sea  and  Aleutian  Island/Gulf  of  Alaska  Halibut  and  Sablefish  IFQ 

system 

Was  in  Council  process  for  ten  years  and  faced  legal  challenges  for  another  10 

years after that. 
Bering Sea Crab 

Was  in  Council  process  for  eight  years.  Is  currently  under  review  in  council  proc-

ess again. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

66 

Gulf of Alaska Rockfish 

Was  in  Council  process  for  four  years.  Currently  in  pilot  program  that  will  need 

additional council work. 
Bering Sea Groundfish, Trawl H&G fleet 

Was in Council process for six years and currently faces legal challenges by Fish-

ing Company of Alaska. 
Pacific Coast Groundfish 

Is  in  Pacific  region  Council  process  now  and  has  been  for  the  last  six  years.  Still 

in process at present date. 
Gulf of Alaska Groundfish 

Is  in  process  at  North  Pacific  region  Council.  Has  been  in  process  for  six  years. 
Little  to  no  progress  to  date.  Moving  toward  sector  splits,  is  currently  on  council 
agenda for sector splits but now for rationalization. 

ATTACHMENT #2 

Council Three Meeting Outlook 

September 29, 2008 December 8, 2008 February 2, 2009 
Anchorage, AK Sheraton Hotel Anchorage, AK Hilton Hotel Seattle, WA 
Council/BOF Joint Protocol Committee Report (T) 
SSL draft status quo BiOp: Report on Schedule 
Comprehensive  Data  Collection:  Committee  Report  Comprehensive  Data  Collec-

tion: Action as necessary 

recency: Initial Review 

BSAI  Fixed  Gear  Parallel  Fisheries:  Discussion  Paper  GOA  fixed  gear  LLP 

GOA P cod sector split: Initial Review 
GOA  sideboards  for  BSAI  crab  vessels:  Final  Action  Am  80  Cooperative  Forma-

tion: Initial Review Am 80 Cooperative Formation: Final Action 

GOA  sideboards  re  Am  80  PSC:  Initial  Review  GOA  sideboards  re  Am  80  PSC: 

Final Action 

Discussion Paper 

GOA  sideboards  re  GOA  rockfish:  Final  Action  GOA  Rockfish  Program  Changes: 

GOA  sideboards  for  AFA  CVs:  Discussion  paper  GOA  sideboards  for  AFA  CVs: 

Initial Review (T) GOA sideboards for AFA CVs: Final Action (T) 

AI  Cod  Processor  Sideboards:  Discussion  Paper  (T)  AI  Processor  Sideboards:  Ini-

tial Review (T) AI Processor Sideboards: Final Action (T) 

AI POP/Mackerel Processing Sideboards: Discussion Paper (T) 
BSAI Crab Regional Delivery Emergency Relief: Discussion Paper 
BSAI Crab Committee/Crew Proposals: Report/Action as necessary 
BSAI Crab 3-year Review: Receive report 
BSAI Crab 90/10 Amendment: Prelim. Review BSAI Crab 90/10 Amendment: Ini-

tial Review BSAI Crab 90/10 Amendment: Final Action 

BSAI Crab St. George Protection Measures: Final Action 
BSAI  Crab  EDR:  Metadata  &  PNCIAC  Report  Observer  Program  Restructuring: 

Discussion Paper 

Halibut Sablefish 12-mo vessel ownership: Initial Rev/Final Action (T) 
Charter Halibut Catch Sharing Plan: Final Action 
Halibut 3A GHL: ADF&G Report and Final Action if necessary (T) 
CDQ  Program:  Update  on  Oversight  Regulations  CDQ  Program:  Action  as  nec-

essary 

Initial Review (T) 

BSAI  Chum  Salmon  Bycatch:  Discussion  Paper  (T)  BSAI  Chum  Salmon  Bycatch: 

BSAI Chinook Salmon Bycatch: Review ICA Report 
Ecosystem Committee Report: Action as necessary 
Arctic FMP: Initial Review Arctic FMP: Final Action 
BS Bottom Trawl Sweeps: Discussion Paper BS Bottom Trawl Sweeps: Initial Re-

view BS Bottom Trawl Sweeps: Final Action 

P.cod area split (BS/AI): Update and Action as necessary 
BSAI  Crab  SAFE  Report:  Review  and  Approve  GOA  Tanner  &  Chinook  Bycatch: 

Discussion Paper 

ommendations 

BSAI Skates Complex: Initial Review (T) BSAI Skates Complex: Final Action 
5 Year Research Priorities: Review and Approve HAPC Review Criteria: SSC Rec-

Groundfish Specifications: Initial Action Groundfish Specifications: Final Action 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

67 

AK Native/Community Outreach: Report & Action as nec (T) 
AI—Aleutian  Islands  TAC—Total  Allowable  Catch  Future  Meeting  Dates  and  Lo-

GOA—Gulf  of  Alaska  BSAI—Bering  Sea  and  Aleutian  Islands  September  29–, 

SSL—Steller  Sea  Lion  IFQ—Individual  Fishing  Quota  December  8–,  2008  in  An-

BOF—Board of Fisheries GHL—Guideline Harvest Level February 2–, 2009 in Se-

2008 in Anchorage 

cations 

chorage 

attle 

FEP—Fishery Ecosystem Plan EIS—Environmental Impact Statement March 30– 

CDQ—Community  Development  Quota  LLP—License  Limitation  Program  June 

, 2009 in Anchorage 

1–, 2009 in Dutch Harbor 

VMS—Vessel  Monitoring  System  SAFE—Stock  Assessment  and  Fishery  Evalua-

tion October 1–, 2009 in Anchorage (AP, SSC start on THURSDAY) 

NOI—Notice of Intent PSC—Prohibited Species Catch (Council on Saturday) 
(T) Tentatively scheduled HAPC—Habitat Areas of Particular Concern 

North Pacific Fishery Management Council 

Eric A. Olson, Chairman 605 W. 4th Avenue, Suite 306 
Chris Oliver, Executive Director Anchorage, AK 99501–2252 
Telephone (907) 271–2809 Fax (907) 271–2817 
Visit our website: http://www.fakr.noaa.gov/npfmc 
May 30, 2008 
Draft Agenda 
188th Plenary Session 
North Pacific Fishery Management Council 
June 4–10, 2008 
Best Western Kodiak Inn 
Kodiak, AK 
Draft Agenda 
188th Plenary Session 
North Pacific Fishery Management Council 
June 4–10, 2008 
Estimated Time 
A. Call Meeting to Order 
(a) Approval of Agenda 
(b) Approval of Minutes 
B. Reports 
B–1 Executive Director’s Report (3 hrs) 
B–2 NMFS Management Report (including permit fee discussion paper, 
NEPA proposed rule and ACL proposed rule). 
B–3 ADF&G Report 
B–4 USCG Report 
B–5 USFWS Report 
B–6 NMFS Enforcement Report 
B–7 Protected Species Report (including update on the BiOp schedule) 
C. Major Issues/final Action Items 
C–1 Subsistence Halibut (1 hr) 
Initial Review/Final Action on subsistence halibut rural definition. 
C–2 Salmon Bycatch (8 hrs) 
Initial review of BSAI Salmon Bycatch EIS. 
C–3 BSAI Crab Issues (8 hrs) 
(a) Initial Review/Final Action on fees for crab loan program. 
(b) Receive Crab Committee Report (relative to the Western AI GKC underutiliza-
tion,  community  ROFR,  crew  participation,  and  emergency  relief);  action  as  nec-
essary.  [Note:  Council  and  AP  discussion/action  will  be  limited  to  the  four  issues 
listed above]. 

C–4 GOA Groundfish Issues (8 hrs) 
(a) Initial review of fixed gear recency. 
(b) Initial review of Pacific cod sector split. 
C–5 VMS exemption for Dinglebar (2 hrs) 
Final action on VMS exemption for dinglebar gear. 
C–6 Research Priorities (1 hr) 
Review and adopt 5 year research priorities. 
C–7 4E Seabirds (2 hrs) 
Final action on 4E seabird avoidance measures. 
NOTE: Council may take action as necessary on all matters listed on the Agenda 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

68 

D. Other Issues 

D–1 Ecosystem Based Management (2 hrs) 
(a) Receive report from Ecosystem Committee. 
(b) Preliminary review of Arctic FMP. (Council only) 
D–2 GOA Sideboards (8 hrs) 
(a) Initial review of GOA sideboards for BSAI crab vessels. 
(b) Initial review of GOA sideboards regarding GOA rockfish fishery. 
(c) Initial review of GOA sideboards for AFA CVs. 
D–3 Miscellaneous Groundfish Management (6 hrs) 
(a) Committee report on other species management. 
(b) Discussion paper on GOA crab and salmon bycatch. (Council only) 
(c) Receive report on gear modification research. 
(d) Review Discussion paper on Am 80 sector cooperative criteria. 
(e) Report on halibut excluder EFP. 
D–4 GOA Rockfish Pilot Program (3 hrs) 
(a) Receive report which reviews the Rockfish Pilot Program. 
(b) Receive report on CGOA Rockfish EFP, phase 1. 
D–5 BSAI Crab OFL (SSC only) (0 hr) 
(a) Receive Plan Team report on BSAI crab OFLs. 
(b) Review Preliminary Crab SAFE report. 
D–6 Staff Tasking (4 hrs) 
(a) Review Committees and tasking. 
(b) Review PSEIS priorities workplan. 
(c) Receive report on native/community/stakeholder participation. 
D–7 Other Business 
Total Hours: (56 hrs) 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

MICHAEL HYDE 

Question  1.  Do  you  support  allowing  vessel  replacement  in  the  pollock  catcher 

processor fleet and the head & gut fleet? 

Answer.  These  two  fleets  face  very  different  issues.  We  support  allowing  vessel 
replacement  in  the  pollock  catcher  processor  fleet  as  long  as  it  is  part  of  a  package 
that includes an increase in the pollock harvest cap. We support allowing vessel re-
placement  in  the  head  and  gut  fleet  as  long  as  the  language  includes  sideboard  re-
strictions that limit the impact of replacement vessels on other fisheries (similar to 
the sideboard provisions of the American Fisheries Act). 

Question  2.  For  the  record,  why  is  legislation  and  Congressional  action  (rather 
than  Council  action)  needed  to  allow  the  pollock  catcher  processor  fleet  to  replace 
their vessels? 

Answer.  The  American  Fisheries  Act  includes  a  number  of  statutory  limitations 
that can not be modified by Council action. The pollock harvest cap and the replace-
ment vessel restrictions are included in this category and require Congressional ac-
tion to change. 

Question 2a. Under what circumstances can the AFA fishery companies currently 

replace old, dangerous, or inefficient vessels? 

Answer.  First  of  all,  this  is  mostly  a  hypothetical  question  because  there  simply 
are  no  ‘‘old’’  or  ‘‘dangerous’’  vessels  in  the  AFA  fleet.  With  respect  to  ‘‘inefficient’’ 
vessels,  all  of  the  current  fleet  is  relatively  efficient  in  the  big  picture  but  some, 
such as the American Seafoods fleet, are far more efficient than others. The current 
law  does  not  allow  for  the  ‘‘replacement’’  of  existing  vessels  except  in  the  event  of 
an  actual  or  constructive  total  loss  but  it  does  allow  for  the  ‘‘rebuilding’’  of  existing 
vessels.  This  means  that  the  only  practical  limitations  on  increasing  the  efficiency 
of  existing  vessels  is  that  the  vessel  would  need  to  be  taken  out  of  service  while 
it  is  being  ‘‘rebuilt’’  and,  because  of  the  North  Pacific  Council’s  License  Limitation 
Program, the length of the rebuilt vessel could not be increased. 

Question 3. How urgent is the need for vessel replacement legislation? 
Answer.  From  a  safety  perspective,  there  is  no  urgency  whatsoever  for  vessel  re-
placement  legislation  with  respect  to  the  AFA  fleet.  With  respect  to  the  head  and 
gut  trawl  fleet  and  the  head  and  gut  longline  fleet,  vessel  replacement  is  a  valid 
issue  from  a  safety  perspective  and  some  vessels  should  probably  be  retired  soon. 
However,  because  there  is  considerable  surplus  capacity  in  the  head  and  gut  fleet, 
once  those  fisheries  are  rationalized,  the  least  efficient/most  unsafe  vessels  can  be 
retired  immediately  without  an  immediate  need  for  a  replacement  vessel.  In  the 
AFA  fleet,  vessel  replacement  is  purely  a  matter  of  operating  efficiencies.  New  ves-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

69 

sels  will  use  far  less  fuel  and  will  be  equipped  to  make  a  greater  variety  of  higher 
value products but they will not be safer than the existing vessels. 

Question 3a. Is safety an immediate concern for this fleet? 
Answer.  With  respect  to  the  vessel  replacement  issue,  safety  is  absolutely  NOT 
a concern for the AFA fleet. Even the most ardent supporters of this legislation have 
acknowledged  that  this  legislation  is  designed  to  allow  companies  to  acquire  more 
efficient  vessels  and  is  not  a  safety  measure.  Every  AFA  catcher  processor  is 
loadlined  and  already  meets  the  highest  safety  standards  in  the  world.  There  is 
nothing  that  would  be  done  to  improve  safety  in  a  replacement  vessel  that  cannot 
or has not been done to the existing fleet. 

Question 3b. What is the safety record of this fleet? 
Answer. The safety record of the AFA catcher processor fleet is excellent. The only 
major  vessel  casualty  that  has  ever  occurred  in  the  fleet  was  the  2007  fire  aboard 
the Pacific Glacier. Although there was significant damage to the vessel, there were 
no  serious  injuries  or  loss  of  life  in  that  incident  and  the  cause  was  unrelated  to 
the age of the vessel. 

Question  4.  Does  American  Seafoods  agree  that  vessel  replacement  is  a  safety 

issue? 

Answer.  American  Seafoods  agrees  that  vessel  replacement  is  a  safety  issue  with 
respect to certain vessels in the head and gut trawl and longline fleets. Almost none 
of  the  vessels  in  those  fleets  are  classed  or  loadlined  and  because  of  their  physical 
age and characteristics they most likely could not be brought up to modern day safe-
ty  standards.  Unfortunately,  the  vessel  replacement  language  that  is  in  the  House 
bill  does  not  afford  any  relief  for  the  fleet  that  actually  needs  it  from  a  safety  per-
spective.  The  current  language  applies  only  to  AFA  pollock  vessels  where  vessel 
safety  is  NOT  an  issue.  We  believe  that  the  House  bill  language  should  be  broad-
ened to include the head and gut fleets. Otherwise, the bill is only a vessel efficiency 
measure for AFA vessels, not a safety measure for all vessels. 

Question 5. In your view, what kind of size, length and capacity requirements are 

reasonable for vessel replacement? 

Answer. We believe that measures to restrict the economic or operating efficiency 
of fishing vessels should not be enacted unless they provide clear benefits that out-
weigh their cost and the benefits can not be achieved through less restrictive meas-
ures.  Until  there  is  some  demonstrated  benefit,  we  do  not  support  limitations  on 
length, tonnage and horsepower. Any concerns about the impact that larger vessels 
might  have  on  other  fisheries  can  be  addressed  through  restrictions  on  the  use  of 
the vessel. For example, under the AFA, the catcher processor fleet is already tight-
ly restricted on entering into any other fisheries and is limited to its historical share 
of the fisheries in which it was participating at the time of enactment. 

Question  6.  I  understand  that  American  Seafoods  would  like  to  see  the  harvest 
cap increased along with vessel replacement, but is opposing vessel replacement on 
its  own.  Why  does  American  Seafoods  believe  the  harvest  cap  is  necessary  to  ad-
dress at the same time as vessel replacement? How are the two connected? 

Answer.  All  three  of  the  proposed  AFA  amendments  (vessel  replacement,  inshore 
permit  stacking  and  harvest  cap  increase)  address  operating  and  economic  effi-
ciencies. None of them is a safety measure. As is common in fish legislation, indus-
try  participants  promote  legislation  that  benefits  them  and  oppose  legislation  that 
benefits  competitors.  The  benefits  of  each  of  the  three  proposed  AFA  amendments 
vary  among  industry  participants.  The  vessel  replacement  language  would  be  of 
greatest  benefit  to  those  companies  with  the  least  efficient  vessels.  Because  Amer-
ican  Seafoods  has  by  far  the  most  efficient  vessels  today,  American  stands  to  gain 
little or no benefit from the replacement vessel language. The inshore permit stack-
ing provision would give the owners of AFA inshore catcher vessels the right to take 
the AFA catch history from one vessel and to permanently assign it to a second ves-
sel.  This  is  a  huge  benefit  to  the  inshore  catcher  vessel  owners  because  it  allows 
them  to  permanently  retire  their  least  efficient  vessels—but  it  provides  no  benefit 
to the seven catcher vessels in the catcher processor sector or to any of the catcher 
vessels in the mothership sector. The harvest cap increase is likely to benefit compa-
nies such as American Seafoods and Trident Seafoods that are currently harvesting 
at or near the cap and will benefit companies that would like to lease or sell harvest 
rights to American or Trident, but will be of little benefit to companies that are well 
below the cap and who do not intend to sell or lease quota. 

When the AFA was originally adopted, it was a negotiated package that balanced 
the  interests  of  all  the  participants.  Any  amendments  to  the  AFA  must  preserve 
that balance. We believe that an AFA package that includes all three provisions pro-
tects that balance. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

70 

Question  7.  From  a  public  policy  perspective,  what  are  the  reasons  to  raise  the 
harvest cap and allow your company to catch a larger percentage of the total catch? 
Answer.  From  a  public  policy  perspective,  restrictions  on  economic  and  operating 
efficiency  should  only  be  adopted  if  they  serve  a  compelling  objective  and  there  are 
no  less  intrusive  means  to  accomplish  that  objective.  With  respect  to  the  harvest 
cap, we do not believe that either of these criteria is satisfied. At the time the AFA 
was adopted, there was a legitimate interest in ‘‘Americanizing’’ the fisheries in U.S. 
waters.  Because  American  Seafoods  was  100  percent  foreign  owned,  there  was  a 
compelling  interest  in  preventing  further  growth  of  a  foreign  owned  company.  Now 
American  Seafoods  is  100  percent  American  owned  and  has  the  greatest  diversity 
of American owners of any participant in the Alaska fisheries. As mentioned in our 
written  testimony,  American  Seafoods  is  now  majority  owned  by  two  Alaskan  CDQ 
groups whose owners are 21 communities along the Bering Sea coast and their more 
than  9,000  residents.  These  communities  are  among  the  poorest  in  the  United 
States with little or no cash economy and extremely high poverty rates. An increase 
in  the  harvest  cap  has  the  potential  to  distribute  the  benefits  of  a  public  resource 
to far more individuals than occurs under the status quo. 

With respect to the National Standards in the Magnuson-Stevens Act, an increase 
in  the  harvest  cap  will  promote  compliance  with  national  standards  5  and  7  which 
require: 

(5)  Conservation  and  management  measures  shall,  where  practicable,  consider 
efficiency in the utilization of fishery resources 
(7) Conservation and management measures shall, where practicable, minimize 
costs and avoid unnecessary duplication. 

The  harvest  cap  at  its  current  level  forces  operators  to  harvest  fish  on  the  less 
efficient  platforms  and  prevents  operators  from  tailoring  their  operations  to  reflect 
the  best  use  of  vessels  at  varying  quota  levels.  It  precludes  the  additional  use  of 
those vessels that can obtain the highest value and produce the most finished prod-
uct from the harvested fish, thereby promoting waste and inefficiency. 

An  increase  in  the  harvest  cap  would  be  expected  to  lead  to  better  utilization  of 
our  fishery  resources.  As  noted  in  Ms.  Parker’s  testimony,  several  of  the  existing 
AFA catcher processors are not equipped with fish meal plants or boilers for making 
fish  oil  from  the  waste  products.  Any  fish  processed  aboard  such  boats  represents 
a  waste  of  potential  fish  products  and  a  loss  in  revenue  to  the  owners  and  crew. 
Both the replacement vessel language and the increase in the harvest cap would in-
crease the capacity and efficiency of the fleet. 

Question 7a. Would there be any environmental consequences? 
Answer. We believe that an increase in the harvest cap will result in positive en-
vironmental consequences. If the harvest cap is raised and more of the annual quota 
is harvested aboard American Seafoods’ vessels, fish waste discharges will decrease. 
In  addition,  because  of  the  larger  freezer  hold  capacity  on  the  American  Seafoods 
vessels,  fuel  usage  will  decrease  because  fewer  trips  between  port  and  the  fishing 
grounds will be required. 

Question  8.  How  would  raising  the  harvest  cap  impact  American  Seafoods’  busi-

ness? 

Answer. Because the Bering Sea pollock quota is already divided and assigned to 
individual  operators  under  the  provisions  of  the  AFA,  American  Seafoods  will  not 
receive  any  additional  harvest  rights  upon  passage  of  the  increase  in  the  harvest 
cap. Only upon reaching an agreement with another AFA catcher processor to lease 
or  purchase  its  quota  will  American  Seafoods  benefit  from  the  increase.  Because 
American Seafoods’ vessels are far more efficient than certain of its competitors, we 
are hopeful that we will be able to arrange short or long term leases. If that occurs, 
we expect it will have a positive impact on several aspects of our business. If Amer-
ican Seafoods is able to purchase or lease additional harvest rights in years of lower 
quota, it will stabilize our marketing relationships and our crew employment. If the 
leases are at favorable rates, we expect that both American Seafoods and the quota 
holders will have higher earnings. If there are additional sources of quota for lease, 
the increase in the harvest cap may lessen American Seafoods’ dependence on CDQ 
quota.  Finally,  as  stated  above,  an  increase  in  the  harvest  cap  would  potentially 
spread  the  benefit  of  harvesting  a  public  resource  to  the  more  than  9,000  owners 
of American Seafoods. 

Question 8a. How would it impact others in the industry? 
Answer.  We  believe  that  the  only  impacts  of  an  increase  in  the  harvest  cap  on 
others in the industry will be either positive or neutral. As mentioned above, an in-
crease  in  the  harvest  cap  by  itself  has  no  impact  on  any  other  companies.  It  only 
gives  American  Seafoods  an  opportunity  to  lease  or  purchase  quota  above  the  cur-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

ways? 

71 

rent 17.5 percent cap. Either of these transactions requires a willing seller or lessor 
on  the  other  side  of  the  transaction.  Obviously,  in  such  a  transaction,  both  sides 
have  concluded  they  are  benefiting  from  the  agreement.  Another  potential  benefit 
is  that  in  the  event  of  a  mechanical  failure  that  forces  a  vessel  out  of  the  fishery 
mid-season,  American  Seafoods  vessels  would  be  able  to  harvest  and  process  the 
quota assigned to the disabled vessel. The only companies that could argue they are 
harmed  by  an  increase  in  the  cap  are  those  that  hope  to  purchase  or  lease  quota 
below  full  value  in  a  market  that  currently  excludes  the  most  efficient  purchasers 
and lessees. Legislation should not be designed to protect inefficient competitors. 

Question 9. How would vessel replacement impact different companies in different 

Answer. As with an increase in the harvest cap, the vessel replacement legislation 
would  have  no  immediate  impact.  The  benefits  of  the  legislation  would  only  be  en-
joyed by those companies that choose to build a replacement vessel. 

Question 9a. Financially and competitively, how would vessel replacement benefit 
these  fishing  companies?  Is  it  through  higher  or  more  efficient  fish  catches,  or 
through additional fish processing that adds value to the product? 

Answer. Replacement vessels are likely to be far more efficient than existing ves-
sels  in  several  respects.  Hull  design,  propulsion  equipment  and  factory  equipment 
have  all  been  designed  to  use  much  less  energy  and  to  have  higher  capacities.  A 
replacement  vessel  could  be  expected  to  have  a  much  larger  fish  hold  which  would 
allow  it  to  make  fewer  trips  between  port  and  the  fishing  grounds.  This  saves  on 
fuel, labor expense and maintenance. The main engines will be diesel electric which 
will  generate  far  greater  horsepower  on  much  less  fuel.  The  processing  factory 
would  be  sufficiently  large  to  accommodate  the  latest  processing  technology  and 
would  use  fuel-efficient  electric  motors  instead  of  diesel.  The  factory  would  be  far 
more  automated  than  current  factories  which  would  result  in  significant  savings  in 
labor  costs.  A  new  vessel  would  be  expected  to  have  a  higher  horsepower  main  en-
gine  which  would  give  the  flexibility  to  fish  at  greater  depths  and  in  more  areas. 
Although the amount of fish allocated to each company would not change, a replace-
ment vessel could be expected to more successfully target schools of pollock with the 
highest  processing  value.  In  short,  a  replacement  vessel  would  gain  huge  operating 
efficiencies  over  the  majority  of  the  exiting  fleet  through  a  combination  of:  (1)  de-
creased  fuel,  labor  and  maintenance  costs  and  (2)  increased  revenues  from  produc-
tion of higher value finished products and the full utilization of all fish wastes. 

Question 9b. Would vessel replacement benefit some companies more than others? 

How? 

tors? 

Answer. It will be extremely expensive to build a replacement vessel so only those 
companies  with  the  least  efficient  vessels  are  expected  to  build  such  vessels  in  the 
near  future.  To  illustrate  the  concept,  consider  the  fuel  efficiency  of  modern  cars. 
Assume  that  the  most  efficient  new  car  can  achieve  50  miles  per  gallon.  If  there 
is  no  trade-in  value  on  a  used  car,  who  is  most  likely  to  buy  the  new  car:  The  car 
owner who is currently getting 10 mpg or the car owner who is getting 40 mpg. Ob-
viously,  the  owner  of  the  least  efficient  car  should  be  the  first  to  buy.  It  is  predict-
able  that  this  is  what  will  happen  in  the  AFA  CP  fleet.  American  Seafoods  owns 
the  vessels  that  are  already  getting  40  mpg.  It  is  very  unlikely  that  the  increased 
efficiency  of  a  new  vessel  will  justify  the  cost.  However,  for  the  owner  of  the  least 
efficient vessels, a replacement vessel makes immediate economic sense. 

Question 9c. How much would American Seafoods benefit compared to its competi-

Answer.  American  Seafoods  is  unlikely  to  enjoy  any  benefit  from  the  vessel  re-
placement  language  and  in  fact,  is  likely  to  suffer  significant  adverse  impacts.  As 
mentioned in Ms. Parker’s testimony, because of the relative efficiency of its vessels, 
American  Seafoods  has  been  able  to  increase  its  share  of  the  CDQ  allocation  from 
5 percent pre-AFA to over 50 percent today. This CDQ quota is critical to the finan-
cial  success  of  American  Seafoods  and  access  to  this  quota  is  highly  dependent  on 
the  Company’s  ability  to  pay  higher  royalties.  Because  any  replacement  vessel  will 
be  more  efficient  that  any  existing  vessels,  it  is  predictable  that  the  owners  of  re-
placement vessels will be able to out compete American Seafoods for CDQ quota and 
American  Seafoods  will  be  financially  damaged.  While  an  increase  in  the  harvest 
cap  will  not  remove  this  risk,  it  will  enlarge  the  potential  pool  of  available  quota 
beyond  just  CDQ  quota  and  will  increase  the  opportunity  for  American  Seafoods  to 
remain competitive. 

We believe that a fair and equitable package of fishery amendments must achieve 

the following: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

72 

1.  Broaden  the  proposed  AFA  replacement  vessel  language  to  also  apply  to  the 
head  and  gut  trawl  and  longline  fleets.  Include  with  the  broader  language  ap-
propriate sideboards to prevent adverse impact from the replacement vessels on 
other fishery participants. 
2.  Broaden  the  proposed  AFA  inshore  permit  stacking  provision  to  also  apply 
to  catcher  vessels  in  the  AFA  mothership  and  catcher  processor  sectors.  This 
is  a  much  needed  efficiency  measure  that  should  apply  to  all  AFA  catcher  ves-
sels, not to just a selected subset. 
3.  Increase  the  AFA  harvest  cap  to  match  the  AFA  processing  cap.  Based  on 
the North Pacific Fishery Management Council conclusion that 30 percent is an 
appropriate processing cap, the same standards should be applied to AFA catch-
er processors and the harvesting cap should also be set at 30 percent. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

DONNA PARKER 

Question  1.  Do  you  support  allowing  vessel  replacement  in  the  pollock  catcher 

processor fleet and the head & gut fleet? 

Answer.  Arctic  Storm  Management  Group  is  strongly  supportive  of  the  proposal 
to  allow  owners  of  AFA  catcher/processors,  catcher-only  vessels  and  motherships  to 
replace  such  vessels  at  their  discretion  and  without  limitations  on  length,  tonnage 
or  horsepower.  The  AFA  vessel  replacement  provision  is  viable  because  all  AFA- 
qualified vessels engaged in the Alaska pollock fishery participate in fish harvesting 
cooperatives.  These  cooperatives  have  a  ten-year  track  record  for  ending  the  ‘‘race 
for fish,’’ which has successfully resolved concerns of overcapacity in the fishery and 
provided  quantifiable  conservation  benefits.  Allowing  flexibility  in  replacing  or  re-
building AFA-qualified vessels will enable the fleet to further maximize yields from 
the harvested resource and increase the value of the Nation’s largest fishery, while 
also helping the fleet to reduce costs, including reducing its use of diesel fuel. 

Conceptually, Arctic Storm supports providing similar flexibility to the H&G fleet 
for  the  same  reasons  articulated  above  for  the  AFA  fleet  of  vessels.  However,  there 
are  at  least  two  policy  issues  to  be  considered,  and  because  the  H&G  fleet  has  not 
circulated  its  proposal  publicly,  it  is  difficult  to  say  whether  those  issues  are  being 
addressed.  The  first  issue  pertains  to  fish  harvesting  cooperatives.  While  AFA  ves-
sels have a ten-year track record of full participation in fish cooperatives, 2008 was 
the  first  year  that  participants  in  the  H&G  fleet  were  in  a  regulatory  regime  that 
facilitated  the  formation  of  co-ops.  Given  this  brief  experience  and  the  lack  of  100 
percent  co-op  participation  by  H&G  vessels,  the  policy  issue  to  be  addressed  is 
whether removing restrictions on vessel size for that fleet will incentivize a race for 
fish and undermine cooperative fishing. 

A  second  consideration  is  the  potential  impact  on  other  fisheries,  regionally  and/ 
or  nationally,  of  removing  vessel  size  restrictions  on  the  H&G  fleet.  Both  the  AFA 
and  the  proposed  AFA  vessel  replacement  amendment  include  significant  restric-
tions  on  AFA-qualified  vessels  operating  outside  the  Bering  Sea/Aleutian  Islands 
pollock fishery. There are no similar restrictions in the law for the H&G fleet. What 
are  the  ramifications  of  permitting  this  fleet  of  approximately  two  dozen  vessels 
from  being  replaced  with  much  larger  vessels  eligible  to  fish  and  process  anywhere 
in the U.S.? Has the H&G fleet considered this issue? We do not know. 

Question  2.  For  the  record,  why  is  legislation  and  Congressional  action  (rather 
than  Council  action)  needed  to  allow  the  pollock  catcher  processor  fleet  to  replace 
their  vessels?  Under  what  circumstances  can  the  AFA  fishery  companies  currently 
replace  old,  dangerous,  or  inefficient  vessels?  Could  you  please  explain  why  vessel 
replacement  was  not  allowed  under  the  American  Fisheries  Act  when  that  bill  was 
negotiated and passed? 

Answer. Congressional action, rather than Council action, is required because the 
American Fisheries Act cannot be superseded with action by a regional fishery man-
agement  council.  While  the  AFA  did  provide  some  discretion  to  the  North  Pacific 
Fishery  Management  Council  in  the  development  of  implementing  regulations,  it 
provided no discretion on the issue of vessel replacement. Additionally, the proposed 
vessel replacement revisions include provisions to protect other fisheries outside the 
jurisdiction of the North Pacific Fishery Management Council. 

Under  current  law,  a  vessel  greater  than  165  feet  in  registered  length,  or  more 
than  750  gross  registered  tons,  or  that  has  an  engine  capable  of  producing  a  total 
of more than 3,000 shaft horsepower is not eligible for a fishery endorsement unless 
a certificate of documentation was issued for the vessel and endorsed with a fishery 
endorsement that was effective before September 25, 1997. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

73 

The  AFA  does  provide  for  replacement  vessels  for  AFA-qualified  vessels—all  of 
the catcher/processors and motherships and some of the catcher-only vessels exceed 
the  thresholds  cited  above—under  very  limited  circumstance.  Section  208(g)  of  the 
AFA allows for the replacement of an AFA-qualified vessel only in the ‘‘event of the 
actual  total  loss  or  constructive  total  loss  . . .’’  For  AFA-qualified  vessels  over  165 
feet  in  length,  or  more  than  750  gross  registered  tons,  or  with  engines  capable  of 
producing more than 3,000 shaft horsepower, the replacement vessel must be of the 
same  or  lesser  registered  length,  tonnage  and  horsepower.  Replacement  vessels  for 
the  original  vessels  below  those  thresholds  can  increase  length,  tonnage  and  horse-
power by 10 percent. 

Because  the  restrictions  outlined  above  are  statutory  limitations,  fleet-wide  relief 

for AFA vessels can only be provided through a change in the law. 

The Committee poses a good question as to why such limits were adopted in 1998. 
With  respect  to  the  vessel  replacement  restrictions  in  Section  208(g),  one  possible 
explanation  is  that  Congress  was  unsure  whether  the  fish  harvesting  cooperatives 
contemplated in the AFA would work effectively, and in 1998, a core concern in pol-
lock fishery management was overcapitalization. As noted above, fish harvesting co-
operatives  have  been  exceedingly  successful,  and  a  return  to  a  ‘‘race  for  fish’’  and 
attendance  excess  harvesting  and  processing  capacity  is  not  a  valid  concern.  As  for 
the overall fishing vessel size limits in law, there is no apparent public policy ration-
ale.  Limited  Access  Privilege  Programs  and  fish  harvesting  cooperatives  are  much 
more effective conservation and management tools than arbitrary vessel size limits. 
Question  3.  How  urgent  is  the  need  for  this  legislation?  Is  safety  an  immediate 

concern for this fleet? What is the safety record of this fleet? 

Answer.  The  AFA  vessel  replacement  provision  has  been  fully  vetted.  The  lan-
guage has twice passed the House as a provision in Coast Guard authorization bills. 
There is no known opposition to the measure. Adoption of the provision would help 
vessel owners in the largest U.S. fishery to more effectively combat rising diesel fuel 
prices, preserve family-wage, value-added processing jobs in the U.S., and allow the 
fleet  to  maintain  international  market  competitiveness  by  optimizing  fishing  oper-
ations,  including  employing  state-of-the-art  technology.  These  are  compelling  argu-
ments  for  Congress  to  enact  the  AFA  vessel  replacement  provision  as  soon  as  pos-
sible. 

While  safety  is  always  a  high  priority  for  the  AFA  fleet,  as  well  as  other  fishing 
fleets,  it  is  not  the  issue  driving  this  amendment.  While  it  is  true  that  few  AFA- 
qualified  vessels  entered  the  fishery  since  1990,  vessels  are  well-maintained.  The 
overall safety record of the fleet is excellent. 

Question 4. From a public policy perspective, what are the reasons (if any) to raise 
the harvest cap and allow a company to catch a larger percentage of the total catch 
than  what  is  currently  allowed  under  the  American  Fisheries  Act?  Would  there  be 
any environmental consequences? 

Answer. There are no legitimate reasons to raise the harvest cap and allow a com-
pany  to  catch  a  larger  percentage  of  the  total  catch  than  what  is  currently  allowed 
under  the  American  Fisheries  Act.  A  single  company,  American  Seafoods,  seeks  to 
expand its harvesting rights beyond the established cap. To most other participants 
in  the  fishery,  such  an  increase  would  not  represent  good  public  policy  for  several 
reasons. 

Harvesting  caps  continue  to  be  important  management  tools.  The  17.5  percent 
AFA  harvesting  cap  imposed  on  the  Nation’s  largest  fishery  is  generous  when  com-
pared  to  the  1  percent  and  2  percent  harvesting  caps  in  the  Bering  Sea  crab  fish-
eries  and  the  North  Pacific  halibut  and  sablefish  IFQ  programs.  A  comparison  to 
the  AFA  harvesting  cap  with  the  processing  cap  of  30  percent  is  flawed.  There  are 
approximately  130  AFA  vessels  qualified  to  harvest  Bering  Sea  pollock  and  only  a 
half  dozen  shore-based  processors.  While  a  30  percent  processor  cap  may  be  appro-
priate  for  a  much  smaller  class  of  processors,  it  is  entirely  inappropriate  for  the 
much  larger  class  of  eligible  harvesting  vessels.  Increasing  the  harvesting  cap  will 
promote increased consolidation in general, including processor-owned catcher vessel 
fleets,  by  undermining  the  ability  of  smaller,  independent  entities  to  successfully 
compete  for  the  purchase  of  vessels  and  harvesting  rights  with  larger  corporations. 
Such  domination  by  processors  could  impact  the  ability  of  independent  catcher  ves-
sels  to  negotiate  ex-vessel  prices.  Such  a  scenario  could  destabilize  the  balance 
struck in the development of the AFA. 

The AFA ended a highly contentious allocation battle between sectors and brought 
balance, stability and prosperity to the pollock fishery. AFA represented a carefully 
crafted  compromise  that  has  led  the  pollock  fishery  to  be  acknowledged  as  one  of 
the  best  managed  fisheries  in  the  world.  A  key  component  to  that  compromise  was 
a $90 million payment to American Seafoods to permanently remove nine of the 16 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

74 

vessels from the fishery reducing its historical harvest share to 17.5 percent. Amer-
ican  taxpayers  paid  American  Seafoods  $20  million  and  the  remaining  $70  million 
is  a  federally  guaranteed  loan  still  being  repaid  by  catcher  vessels  participating  in 
the inshore fishery. This action accomplished two goals; it reallocated an additional 
10 percent of the pollock fishery to the inshore sector and it reduced the dominance 
of  a  single  company,  American  Seafoods,  in  the  Nation’s  largest  fishery.  It  also  al-
lowed  American  to  divest  itself  of  its  most  inefficient  vessels,  leaving  it  with  the 
most state-of-the-art fleet in the fishery. 

It should also be noted that in harvesting 17.5 percent and owning 19.36 percent 
of the pollock fishery, American controls about 50 percent of the offshore sectors’ al-
location.  Additionally,  American  is  unconstrained  from  harvesting  an  additional  10 
percent  of  the  Bering  Sea  catch  limit  by  leasing  Community  Development  Quota. 
American  Seafoods  currently  controls  one-half  the  CDQ  pollock  quota,  or  an  addi-
tional 5 percent of Bering Sea quota above the harvest cap. Because harvest of CDQ 
fish  is  not  constrained  by  the  AFA  harvest  cap,  American  Seafoods  could  increase 
its harvest share another 5 percent of the Bering Sea pollock quota without having 
to increase the current excessive harvest share cap. American currently owns 19.36 
percent  of  the  Bering  Sea  pollock  quota  through  ASC  LLC  and  its  wholly  owned 
subsidiary,  HLTA  LLC.  And  nothing  prohibits  American  from  increasing  its  proc-
essing capacity, including the purchase of shore plants, to 30 percent. 

In  sum,  American  Seafoods  currently  owns  19.36  percent  of  the  harvesting  and 
processing  rights  of  the  Nation’s  largest  fishery.  Additionally  it  harvests  and  proc-
esses  about  half  of  the  CDQ  allocation,  or  another  5  percent  of  the  pollock  fishery. 
It  is  unconstrained  from  increasing  its  CDQ  harvesting  share,  its  processing  share 
or  it  ownership  share.  There  still  remains  significant  growth  opportunity  for  Amer-
ican Seafoods without increasing the excessive harvesting cap. 

For our company and others, this issue is simply one of putting too much control 
in the hands of too few. At some point, a much larger company puts smaller compa-
nies  at  a  significant  disadvantage  and  destabilizes  the  fishery.  For  the  Bering  Sea 
pollock fishery, that point has been established at 17.5 percent of the harvesting ca-
pacity. The majority of Bering Sea participants have not been persuaded that a com-
pelling  reason  exists  to  change  that  excessive  share  limit.  We  continue  to  believe 
that a cap set at 17.5 percent is a critical part of the AFA package and its continu-
ance at this level, good public policy. 

Question  5.  How  would  raising  the  harvest  cap  impact  your  company’s  business? 

Do you oppose American Seafoods’ efforts to raise the harvest cap? 

Answer.  Arctic  Storm,  as  do  most  other  participants  in  the  pollock  fishery,  con-
tinue  to  oppose  American  Seafoods’  efforts  to  raise  the  harvest  cap  for  the  reasons 
described above. Raising the cap could impact our company in several ways. Among 
those are the following: 

1.  A  much  larger  company  has  a  disproportionate  impact  on  the  marketplace 
in which we all compete. 
2.  A  much  larger  company  has  a  disproportionate  advantage  in  increasing  its 
share of fish by either winning CDQ allocations or purchasing other companies. 
Such dominance, if unconstrained, could marginalize smaller companies causing 
further consolidation by a few large players. Consolidation by American has al-
ready occurred. Since AFA was passed American has purchased three additional 
AFA vessels increasing its ownership of the harvesting and processing rights to 
19.36  percent  of  the  Bering  Sea  pollock  quota.  It  has  also  increased  its  CDQ 
share from 5 percent to 50 percent. 

Question 6. How would vessel replacement impact different companies in different 
ways?  Financially  and  competitively,  how  would  vessel  replacement  benefit  these 
fishing  companies?  Is  it  through  higher  or  more  efficient  fish  catches,  or  through 
additional fish processing that adds value to the product? Would vessel replacement 
benefit  some  companies  more  than  others?  How?  How  much  would  American  Sea-
foods benefit compared to its competitors? 

Answer.  Most  AFA  vessels  were  built  in  the  1980s  including  some  that  were  re-
built  from  much  older  vessels.  Confining  their  operations  to  business  plans  and 
technology  available  thirty  years  ago  does  not  make  sense  in  a  global  economy.  In 
any modern business, in order to remain competitive you have to operate efficiently. 
Under  the  current  restrictions  of  the  AFA,  vessel  owners  are  often  constrained  by 
space  limitations  that  force  them  to  operate  less  efficiently.  For  instance,  smaller 
boats are constrained in their ability to operate both surimi and fillet lines to meet 
the  needs  of  the  market  and  the  appetites  of  the  U.S.  consumer.  Space  limitations 
also constrain the ability to install fish meal plants that allow full utilization of the 
fishery byproducts, fish oil plants that convert fish waste into a substitute for diesel 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

75 

fuel,  and  increased  cargo  hold  capacity  which  reduces  the  amount  of  trips  required 
to unload the vessel. 

For instance, one of our catcher-processors, the Arctic Fjord packs 920 tons of fin-
ished product while the larger, Arctic Storm, packs 1540 tons. That difference in ca-
pacity  forces  the  Fjord  to  make  five  additional  trips  a  year  to  and  from  the  fishing 
grounds  to  unload  product  using  approximately  220,000  gallons  of  fuel.  At  current 
costs  of  $4.20/gallon,  these  trips  increase  operating  costs  substantially.  It  also  con-
tributes  to  unnecessarily  extending  our  carbon  footprint  at  a  time  when  reduction 
of carbon usage has been identified as a high priority. Related to that issue is need-
ed  space  to  construct  a  fish  oil  conversion  plant.  Use  of  fish  oil  to  fuel  a  catcher- 
processor  is  expected  to  offset  diesel  fuel  consumption  by  1,200  to  2,500  gallons  a 
day. Like several other AFA catcher-processors, the Arctic Fjord is not large enough 
to  accommodate  construction  of  a  fish  meal  plant  without  rebuilding  the  hull.  Fish 
meal plants turn fish waste into fish food for aquaculture operations in Asia. It also 
increases our recovery rates by approximately 2.5 to 5 percent of round weight. 

For  a  catcher  vessel,  increasing  vessel  size  allows  for  greater  hold  capacity  and 
so  reduces  the  number  of  trips  needed  to  harvest  its  catch  quota.  The  proposed 
amendment also contains a provision that allows for retirement of less efficient and 
aging vessels. Currently, AFA requires that the owner of a catcher vessel delivering 
to  a  shoreside  cooperative  maintain  that  vessel  and  permit  in  order  to  receive  its 
annual  allocation  of  pollock.  The  AFA  vessel  amendment  allows  AFA-qualified 
catcher  vessels  to  be  retired  and  for  the  owners  of  such  vessels  to  assign  the  quota 
to another vessel or vessels. To avoid negative impacts to other fisheries, any retired 
AFA-qualified vessel must surrender its fishery endorsement and so cannot partici-
pate in other U.S. fisheries. 

Because  current  regulations  prevent  us  from  replacing  our  existing  vessels,  we 
must  replace  parts  of  the  vessels  piece  by  piece  as  they  wear  out.  We  are  forced  to 
figure out how to make these hulls last forever without the opportunity to take ad-
vantage  of  more  efficient  technology  available  to  our  industry.  While  the  AFA  fleet 
is operated and maintained to ensure maximum safety conditions, it seems counter 
to the promotion of the safety of human life at sea, as called for in National Stand-
ard 10 of the Magnuson-Stevens Act, to prohibit AFA-eligible vessels from being re-
placed  or  efficiently  rebuilt  using  state-of-the-art  technology  and  architectural  de-
signs that can simultaneously accomplish premium safety and efficiency. 

The  arbitrary  limits  on  length,  tonnage  and  engine  horsepower  of  replacement 
vessels  stipulated  in  the  AFA  are  unnecessary.  To  help  foster  safety,  product  qual-
ity,  innovation  and  efficiency—all  of  which  contribute  to  Alaska  pollock  producers 
remaining  competitive  in  the  international  whitefish  market—it  is  critically  impor-
tant  to  remove  limitations  in  current  law  on  replacement  of  AFA-qualified  vessels. 
As  described  above,  vessels  will  be  affected  in  similar  and  different  ways  but, 
nonetheless,  will  require  significant  investments  to  rebuild  or  replace  vessels.  As 
part  of  AFA,  American  Seafoods’  most  inefficient  vessels  were  bought-out  by  Amer-
ican taxpayers and other participants in the fishery. For that reason, American’s re-
maining  fleet  under  AFA  has  been  and  remains  the  most  state-of-the-art  fleet.  If 
the  vessel  replacement  legislation  is  passed  it  will,  in  part,  retain  that  advantage 
because  it  will  not  have  to  make  vessel  replacement  investments  as  soon  as  other 
participants.  And,  because  the  pollock  fishery  is  rationalized,  no  participant  will 
gain advantage over another in a race for fish initiated by the construction of more 
efficient vessels. 

Question 7. Do you believe it is necessary to address the harvest cap at the same 
time  as  vessel  replacement?  How  would  it  impact  the  competitive  dynamics  of  the 
fleet? Are there any public policy benefits to raising the harvest cap? Are there any 
potential disadvantages? 

Answer. There is no reason to address the harvest cap issue at the same time as 
the vessel replacement issue. The harvest cap and the vessel replacement provisions 
are two separate and unrelated issues. 

The  argument  linking  the  two  provisions  is  that  American  Seafoods  Corporation 
will  lose  a  competitive  advantage  because  it  currently  owns  the  most  state-of-the- 
art  vessels.  American  Seafoods  argues  that  if  this  competitive  advantage  is  taken 
away by allowing other vessels to modernize, it should be given relief by raising the 
AFA excessive harvesting cap and allowing American Seafoods to regain advantage 
through  company  expansion.  This  rationale  seems  based  on  the  assumption  that 
American  Seafoods  has  been  granted  a  permanent  competitive  advantage  and  that 
other  vessels  must  be  constrained  in  their  ability  to  compete  in  the  marketplace. 
Even  if  such  a  rationale  could  be  supported,  the  AFA  vessel  replacement  amend-
ment is relatively neutral regarding the impacts among companies that own and op-
erate AFA-qualified catcher-only, catcher/processor or mothership vessels. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

76 

At some point, every vessel in the fishery will reach the end of its useful life. The 
amendment  proposed  by  AFA  participants  removes  the  unwarranted  restriction  in 
current  law  on  vessel  replacement  only  in  the  event  of  ‘‘total  loss  or  constructive 
total loss’’ and provides flexibility to the vessel owner to replace the vessel in a man-
ner  that  optimizes  fishing  and  fish  processing  practices.  Taking  the  long  view  that 
every AFA-qualified vessel will need to be substantially rebuilt or replaced at some 
point,  the  vessel  replacement  provision  should  provide  the  same  flexibility  and  op-
portunities among companies in the catcher/processor sector and not confer benefits 
on one company or one sector. 

Looking just at the catcher/processor sector, here is why allowing the replacement 
of vessels at the owner’s discretion and without arbitrary size restrictions should not 
significantly  impact  competitiveness  among  the  five  companies  operating  catcher/ 
processors.  One  would  expect  that  companies  with  older  and/or  smaller  vessels 
would  be  the  first  to  take  advantage  of  the  vessel  replacement  amendment,  if  en-
acted. There are several obvious benefits to replacing older vessels with newer ones, 
including  reduced  maintenance  costs  and  introduction  of  more  fuel  efficient  propul-
sion  systems.  Replacing  smaller  vessels  with  larger  ones  will  allow  for  new  or  sub-
stantially  rebuilt  vessels  to  accommodate  both  surimi  and  fillet  production,  add 
fishmeal  plants,  enhance  fish  oil  production  to  reduce  diesel  fuel  use,  and  increase 
hold capacity to reduce the number of trips for offloading. Surimi and whitefish fil-
lets  are  commodity  products,  however,  so  vessel  replacement  is  not  expected  to  re-
sult  in  supply  changes  that  will  move  world  market  prices.  Instead,  any  company 
making  the  investment  to  increase  vessel  size  to  be  able  to  make  either  of  the  two 
main primary processed forms of pollock or more ancillary products should increase 
profitability, but not at the expense of another company with similar or even greater 
capabilities. 

For the reasons outlined above, the AFA replacement provisions are supported by 
all  participants  in  the  affected  Bering  Sea  pollock  fishery.  The  proposed  language 
has  been  well  vetted  and  includes  detailed  language  which  protects  participants  in 
other  fisheries  by  limiting  the  access  of  new  vessels  in  other  fisheries.  Increasing 
the AFA excessive harvesting cap, on the other hand, provides advantage to a single 
company and is opposed by most participants in the Bering Sea pollock fishery who 
perceive any link as artificial. 

American Seafoods argues that in allowing modernization of its AFA competitors, 
it will be put at a competitive disadvantage by allowing others to compete on a level 
playing field for CDQ quota, leasing rights and expanded ownership. In this regard, 
American may be right; vessel replacement may level that playing field. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

DAVID E. FRULLA 

Question 1. The Freezer Longline Coalition has been negotiating a fishing cooper-
ative  agreement  for  over  2  years,  and  is  now  asking  Congress  for  help  in  passing 
legislation on the matter. Could you please describe, from your perspective, the proc-
ess  the  Freezer  Longline  Coalition  has  gone  through  over  the  past  2  years,  and 
Fishing Company of Alaska’s participation in this process? 

Answer. I know only that discussions have been ongoing for quite awhile, and The 
Fishing  Company  of  Alaska  has  participated  in  these  discussions.  FCA  has  raised 
objections  in  these  discussions,  including  certain  of  those  that  my  written  and  oral 
testimony  explained.  FCA  believes  it  has  participated  in  good  faith  in  these  discus-
sions  with  others  in  the  sector.  Ultimately,  FCA  has  a  different  view  of  the  merits 
of the situation. 

Question  2.  What  are  the  public  policy  implications  of  the  creation  of  a  co-op  in 
the  Pacific  cod  freezer  longline  industry?  If  there  are  public  policy  benefits,  then 
why does the company believe policy-makers such as myself should not allow or pro-
mote  the  formation  of  a  co-op?  Does  the  company  disagree  with  claims  that  there 
are safety and environmental benefits to the formation of a co-op? 

Answer.  I  am  not  an  expert  in  the  public  policy  benefits  of  cooperatives,  or  their 
potential  safety  and  environmental  benefits,  and  was  not  asked  to  testify  in  such 
an  expert  capacity.  I  have  represented  a  number  of  fishery  organizations  and  busi-
nesses  over  the  years,  each  with  different  views  of  this  issue.  In  general,  however, 
the  position  that  FCA  has  advocated  is  that  Congress  established  and  reauthorized 
the  Magnuson-Stevens  Act  to  create  an  open  and  public  framework  for  deciding 
these issues with full input by expert resource managers, scientists, economists, en-
vironmentalists,  the  broader  public,  and  impacted  fishermen.  This  process  was  re-
fined by Congress in 2006, specifically to deal with this type of proposal. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

77 

By  contrast,  in  this  specific  instance,  the  details  of  the  cooperative  were  worked 
out in private discussions and would lock FCA into an allocation set by its competi-
tors  using  a  flawed  methodology  that  completely  derogates  historical  participation. 
This is not good public policy. 

Question 3. If a co-op were formed in the Pacific cod freezer longline fishery, who 
do  you  believe  would  be  the  winners  and  losers?  What  would  be  the  implications 
on  the  value  of  the  fishing  companies  involved?  What  is  the  financial  benefit,  both 
immediate  and  long-term,  to  the  companies  involved?  Would  the  formation  of  a  co- 
op  help  the  fishing  companies  involved  in  obtaining  financing  and  loans  to  recapi-
talize their vessels? Do you believe that the Fishing Company of Alaska would ben-
efit in any way under a cooperative system? 

Answer.  Others  on  your  panel  have  made  a  study  of  these  issues.  In  my  written 
and oral testimony, I explained the legislative proposal would make permanent the 
impact  of  recent  entry  into  this  fishery  sector  and  that  such  a  result  is  contrary  to 
North Pacific Fishery Management Council and NMFS regulatory actions and goals. 
As  to  the  final  question,  while  there  are  cooperative  programs  under  which  FCA 

could benefit, the flawed approach crafted by the FLC is not one of them. 

Question  4.  If  the  Pacific  cod  freezer  longline  fishery  were  to  form  a  co-op,  what 
would be the implications in terms of jobs? Would there be fewer jobs in the fishery? 
What would the quality and predictability of those jobs look like? 

Answer.  In  general,  consolidation  would  likely  lead  to  fewer  jobs.  The  purpose  of 
rationalizing  a  fishery  is  to  reduce  capacity  and  inputs  to  production,  including 
labor.  I  understand  that  such  losses  of  jobs  and  opportunities  appear  to  be  behind 
the  on-going  reaction  by  some  fishermen  and  communities  in  Alaska  against  crab 
rationalization and other such programs. 

Question  5.  In  your  written  testimony,  you  stated  that  ‘‘the  FLCC  proposal  does 
not  purport  to  allocate  Pacific  cod  beyond  this  split  between  the  cooperative  and 
‘open  access’  components  of  the  sector,  such  as  on  an  individual  vessel  basis,  and 
does  not  allow  for  the  formation  of  other  cooperatives.  Accordingly,  it  is  an  incom-
plete solution to the safety issues about which this hearing is concerned.’’ This state-
ment seems to imply that the FLCC proposal would be an ‘‘incomplete solution’’ be-
cause  a  race  for  fish  would  still  exist  in  the  ‘‘open  access’’  component  of  the  sector. 
Yet,  the  Fishing  Company  of  Alaska  is  the  only  company  that  has  not  signed  the 
cooperative  agreement.  If  Congress  takes  up  the  FLCC  proposal  and  that  proposal 
becomes law, would Fishing Company of Alaska still refuse to enter the cooperative 
and remain fishing in the ‘‘open access’’ portion of the fishery? This being the case, 
wouldn’t Fishing Company of Alaska merely be ‘‘racing’’ itself if the FLCC proposal 
became law? Do you have any evidence or reason to believe that anyone other than 
Fishing  Company  of  Alaska  would  not  take  part  in  the  fishing  cooperative  under 
the FLCC proposal? Since Fishing Company of Alaska’s boats would essentially not 
be  competing  with  anyone  else,  wouldn’t  the  ‘‘race’’  be  effectively  ended  and  rep-
resent a complete solution to the race-for-fish safety issues? 

Answer.  Respectfully,  the  questions  misapprehend  the  point  I  was  making:  the 
legislative proposal, as we understand it, differs from how such rationalization pro-
grams are typically structured. Such programs usually make allocations on an indi-
vidual vessel basis, according to a common qualification period. Under a cooperative 
approach,  such  as  Amendment  80  to  the  Bering  Sea/Aleutian  Island  groundfish 
plan,  vessels  may  either  bring  that  allocation  into  a  cooperative  or  join  it  with  oth-
ers in a common pool. FLC’s proposal lacks the initial allocation. Accordingly, if the 
cooperative were to fail, or if certain of its members were to drop out of the coopera-
tive  in  this  historically  fractious  sector,  the  fishery  would  revert  to  a  race  for  fish 
in the common pool. 

Obviously, because, to our knowledge, the legislative proposal on which this hear-
ing was held has not been drafted into legislation, my testimony must be somewhat 
hypothetical on this point. However, as far as FCA can tell, no one appears to have 
asked  important  questions  about  this  proposal,  such  as:  will  (or  could)  the  legisla-
tion  require  all  vessels  originally  in  the  cooperative  to  remain  within  the  coopera-
tive,  or  would  it  be  possible  for  a  vessel  with  a  low  allocation  of  fish  to  leave  the 
cooperative  and  fish  in  the  open  access  sector,  as  is  occurring  in  the  Amendment 
80 fishery? What are the public policy issues involved in irrevocably binding a vessel 
or owner to a cooperative, if that is what is intended? Would the legislation provide 
that  all  vessels  owned  by  a  single  entity  either  remain  in  the  cooperative  or  fish 
in the common pool (that is, an ‘‘all in’’ provision)? Will the legislation specify vessel 
use  caps,  excessive  share  limits,  and  sideboards?  What,  if  any,  monitoring  and  en-
forcement  requirements  will  be  established?  Many  of  these  questions  are  not  rel-
evant, however, if the Congress opts to develop a far more flexible individual quota 
system,  as  FCA  has  recommended,  based  on  fair  and  equitable  allocation  criteria. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

78 

Question  6.  From  what  I  understand,  the  FLCC  membership  agreement  offered 
an  allocation  level  to  Fishing  Company  of  Alaska  that  would  give  the  company’s 
boats  the  fourth-highest  and  sixth-highest  allocations  and  would  give  the  company 
overall  7.1  percent.  Does  Fishing  Company  of  Alaska  believe  that  membership 
agreement  allocation  was  not  a  fair  one?  Wasn’t  this  offer  of  7.1  percent  an  offer 
of  additional  fish  from  other  members  of  the  sector  to  help  appease  Fishing  Com-
pany  of  Alaska’s  problems  with  the  allocation  share  and  as  an  incentive  to  join  the 
co-op?  Doesn’t  this  demonstrate  that  the  rest  of  the  sector  made  a  good-faith  effort 
to address FCA’s concerns and try to find a compromise? Why was this offer rejected 
by Fishing Company of Alaska? What allocation level for Fishing Company of Alas-
ka’s  two  vessels  would  have  been  a  fair  allocation?  Specifically,  what  percentage, 
why,  and  based  on  what  rationale?  How  does  the  membership  agreement  offer  of 
7.1  percent  compare  with  what  Fishing  Company  of  Alaska’s  vessels  are  catching 
now, on a percentage basis? 

Answer.  As  I  explained  in  my  testimony,  the  7.1  percent  share  appears  to  have 
been  an  ad  hoc  adjustment  to  an  allocation  based  on  a  qualifying  period  that  FCA 
does  not  accept  as  fair,  equitable,  or  consistent  with  the  law  or  recent  allocations. 
FCA  has  not  asked  for  anything  more  or  less  than  what  it  considers  appropriate 
based  on  its  history  as  a  pioneering  participant  of  this  sector.  My  testimony  points 
out a range of baseline periods that could have been more appropriate. This is FCA’s 
principled,  consistently-expressed  position,  notwithstanding  FLC’s  derogatory  char-
acterizations and insinuations. 

Question 7. Based on your testimony, Fishing Company of Alaska believes the co- 
op  percentage  allocations  should  have  been  based  on  a  much  longer  time-period,  or 
‘‘qualifying time,’’ than the final agreement was based upon. Why does the company 
believe that the time-span that was used is unfair? What time-span would the com-
pany  believe  is  a  fair  one  and  why?  What  kind  of  allocation  do  you  believe  such  a 
time-span would result in for Fishing Company of Alaska? 

Answer.  As  I  stated  in  my  written  and  oral  testimony,  and  has  been  conveyed  to 
Committee  staff  through  written  and  oral  communications  over  the  past  nearly  2 
years, the use of a 3-year time span, as proposed by FLC, is inconsistent with legal 
standards  and  recent  precedent.  This  precedent  includes  not  only  the  range  of  ra-
tionalization  programs  mentioned,  but  also  the  (then)  FLCC’s  use  of  a  five-year 
time-frame  to  used  to  calculate  (and  bolster)  the  amount  of  capacity  ostensibly 
bought  with  the  federally-funded  vessel  buyback  program  for  the  freezer-longline 
sector. 

However, since the Subcommittee has inquired, FCA believes the very most equi-
table  qualification  period  would  include  all  history  going  back  to  the  time-frame 
used  for  the  vessel  moratorium  program;  that  is,  January  1,  1988.  This  would  pro-
vide full representation of the historical participants, while also considering recency, 
as  the  MSA  provides.  Such  a  period  would  not  over-weight  the  new  capacity  that 
entered  the  fishery  in  a  significant  way  after  the  LLP  program.  Nor  would  such  a 
longer  time  period  conflict  so  patently  with  other  North  Pacific  Council  and  NMFS 
attempts  to  limit  capacity  in  this  sector  (see  my  response  to  question  11,  as  well), 
while balancing historical participation and investment with recent use. 

Any individual vessel allocation under such a time-frame would depend on a vari-
ety  of  considerations,  such  as  whether  all  years  were  included  or  whether  the  low 
years  were  dropped,  what  dataset  was  used,  and  other  factors  that  are  customarily 
considered in these rationalization processes. 

Question  8.  It  is  my  understanding  that  under  FLCC’s  proposal,  using  the  years 
2003–2005  for  those  in  the  ‘‘open  access’’  fishery  would  probably  give  Fishing  Com-
pany  of  Alaska  approximately  6.6  percent  of  the  catch.  How  does  that  figure  com-
pare  with  what  the  Company  is  catching  now?  If  Fishing  Company  of  Alaska  be-
lieves that 6.6 percent is unfair from using the years 2003–2005 as you state in your 
testimony,  then  why  doesn’t  the  company  accept  the  FLCC  membership  agreement 
allocation offer of 7.1 percent? 

Answer.  Please  see  my  responses  to  questions  5  and  6,  as  well  as  16  U.S.C. 

§ 1881a(b). 

Question  9.  You  state  in  your  written  testimony  that  the  allocation  period  con-
tained in FLCC’s proposal is ‘‘inconsistent with law and recent allocation programs.’’ 
Wasn’t  a  three-year  period  (1995–1997)  used  in  the  American  Fisheries  Act?  You 
reference  the  Amendment  85  Gulf  of  Alaska  cod  allocations,  but  weren’t  those  both 
sector  allocations  and  not  cooperatives  or  vessel  allocations?  Why  should  Congress 
use  sector  allocations  as  a  guide  for  the  allocation  of  a  cooperative-based  system? 
Isn’t this comparing apples to oranges? 

Answer. The AFA is not a recent rationalization program. In fact, it is poor model 
on  which  to  base  any  such  new  program.  While  the  AFA  worked  out  well  for  those 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

79 

included,  it  created  a  great  deal  of  acrimony  in  the  fishing  industry  and  years  of 
work  for  the  Council.  Just  like  the  legislative  proposal  currently  before  the  Com-
mittee,  the  AFA  omitted  many  of  important  management  and  implementation  de-
tails. In fact, the congressionally authorized rationalization programs, including the 
AFA, the ‘‘Three Pie’’ crab rationalization measure, and the Rockfish Pilot Program, 
appear  to  be  more  controversial  than  council  developed  programs.  Perhaps  this  is 
because they closed debate and informed deliberation of issues of public importance 
that the fishery management council system is intended to provide. 

Programs developed subsequently to the AFA, that is, the ‘‘recent’’ rationalization 
programs which I detailed in my written testimony, have benefited from the experi-
ence gained from the problems relating to the AFA and its implementation. 

As  to  Amendment  85,  this  measure  did  make  allocations  among  sectors  rather 
than  individual  vessels.  But  the  legal  framework  for  making  allocations  is,  or  at 
least  was  when  Amendment  85  was  passed,  identical  to  that  involving  individual 
vessel allocations. To be more precise, the MSA establishes the legal framework for 
making  allocations  either  to  sectors  or  vessels.  However,  that  legal  framework  has 
changed  since  Amendment  85  was  adopted,  with  the  Reauthorization  Act  creating 
a  specific  new  criteria  applying  to  limited  access  privilege  programs  (‘‘LAPPs’’). 
FLC’s  proposal  would  likely  be  governed  by  these  LAPP  provisions,  16  U.S.C. 
§ 1853a,  whereas  a  sector  allocation  like  Amendment  85  would  likely  be  governed 
by  the  general  criteria  under  16  U.S.C.  § 1853(b)(6).  Both  sections  1853a  and 
1853(b)(6),  however,  require  the  consideration  of  historical  participation  that  is  ut-
terly lacking in the FLC proposal, as well as development through the kind of open 
and public process that’s lacking in FLC’s ad hoc allocation scheme. 

Question 10. Your written testimony references the Rockfish Pilot Program, which 
used a seven-year allocation period. That program, however, was designed to specifi-
cally weigh heavily toward historical catch and much less toward current and recent 
catch levels. Wasn’t the historical catch emphasized for this program because of the 
specific nature of the fishery, and for reasons not really applicable to the Pacific cod 
freezer longline sector? How is the Rockfish Pilot Program applicable when it’s only 
a  temporary  program  for  a  very  different  fishery  that  has  both  catcher  vessels  and 
catcher-processor  vessels  that  use  multiple  types  of  fishing  gear?  According  to  the 
North  Pacific  Fishery  Management  Council’s  May  19,  2008  review  of  the  Rockfish 
Pilot  Program,  the  program’s  first  year  had  mixed  success.  Why  should  the  North 
Pacific cod freezer longline fishery emulate a program with such mixed success? 

Answer.  I  do  not  know  enough  about  the  motivations  behind  the  adoption  of  the 
Rockfish  Pilot  Program  to  answer  these  questions  without  speculating.  However, 
none  of  the  supposed  distinguishing  characteristics  mentioned  above  appear  to  be 
relevant to the policy reasons for selecting the qualification period that was, in fact, 
chosen for the program. Also, from my brief review of the referenced report, it does 
not appear that any of issues or complications arising from the program are the re-
sult of the range of years used to determine allocations. 

Question 11. In your written statement, you discuss more recent entrants into the 
fishery  and  state  that  ‘‘it  is  not  clear  how  these  vessels  became  qualified.’’  Are  you 
saying  that  some  of  these  vessels  were  not  qualified  to  enter  the  fishery?  Do  you 
have any information or knowledge that any of these vessels entered the fishery ille-
gally? How are ‘‘recent entrants’’ relevant to this debate when the fishery now oper-
ates under a limited license program? If all of the entrants into the now-closed fish-
ery  entered  the  fishery  legally  and  qualified  based  on  the  rules,  why  should  Con-
gress penalize more recent entrants in an allocation? 

Answer. The National Marine Fisheries Service administers the license limitation 
permit  program,  and  it,  along  with  the  Coast  Guard,  enforces  fisheries  regulations 
and laws. I would assume that if any vessels were fishing illegally, these authorities 
would take appropriate action. The point I raised was more generally related to the 
fact that the sector contains new vessels, and that the LLPs used in the fishery are 
difficult  to  trace  back  to  the  beginning  of  the  permit  moratorium  and  the  period  in 
which vessels were qualified for the LLP program and the Pacific cod endorsements. 
This  observation  was  raised  in  relation  to  the  more  salient  point  that  there  were 
ten  permits  that  appear  to  have  qualified  for  the  freezer  longline  sector  based  on 
only 1 year’s worth of landings. I understand these permits are currently placed on 
very  efficient  vessels  that  participate  annually  in  the  fishery  on  a  full-time  basis. 
This  outcome  completely  undermines  the  efforts  by  NMFS  and  the  North  Pacific 
Council  to  reduce  excessive  capacity  in  this  sector,  via  the  moratorium,  LLP  pro-
gram, and sector endorsements. 

The question FCA has legitimately and consistently asked, then, is whether Con-
gress should reward businesses that made large, post-LLP investments by awarding 
shares  based  solely  on  recency.  FCA  maintains  that  Congress  would  be  sending  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

80 

poor signal by instituting a program that ignores and devalues historical investment 
and  participation.  In  short,  it  would  send  a  message  to  vessels  in  other  fisheries 
that  they  can  be  rewarded  by  beefing  up  capitalization  in  a  fishery,  racing  to  build 
recent  fishing  history,  and  seeking  an  end-run  around  the  MSA  processes  and 
standards  by  seeking  legislation  to  enshrine  the  new  regime.  Meanwhile,  partici-
pants  like  FCA  that  were  involved  in  pioneering  the  fishery  and  providing  a  model 
that  others  followed,  would  be,  in  fact,  the  party  that  would  penalized  by  having 
that history completely devalued. 

Question 12. In your arguments against overcapitalization and past initiatives for 
the vessel buyback and qualification levels for the LLP, you state that ‘‘all this new 
capitalization has had the effect of eroding FCA’s recent overall share of the Pacific 
cod  catch.’’  This  seems  to  be  more  of  an  argument  outlining  Fishing  Company  of 
Alaska’s dissatisfaction with past decisions on the LLP and buyback program, rath-
er  than  an  argument  against  how  to  proceed  with  managing  the  fishery  as  it  cur-
rently  exists.  Why  should  Congress  give  weight  to  Fishing  Company  of  Alaska’s 
complaints  about  these  past  decisions  in  its  policymaking  to  shape  the  fishery’s  fu-
ture?  If  Fishing  Company  of  Alaska  was  dissatisfied  with  the  buyback  program, 
then  why  didn’t  the  company  vote  in  the  buyback  or  comment  in  the  public  com-
ment period before the program was funded? 

Answer.  The  response  to  question  11  is  likewise  relevant  here.  The  issue  is  not 
related to the policy decisions that were made, but whether it represents good public 
policy to reward recent increases in capacity. While the capacity reduction programs 
may not have had the intended effect, that is not a reason to freeze this advantage 
in place through legislation. 

As  to  the  question  related  to  the  buyback,  I  know  that  FCA  made  its  concerns 
known  to  others  in  the  sector.  It  is  extremely  unlikely  that  additional  public  dis-
agreement would have changed the substantive result of the process. 

Question  13.  In  your  written  testimony  you  stated  that  FLCC’s  proposal  ‘‘in  no 
way comports with existing law’’ and ‘‘is legally doubtful,’’ but you have also argued 
that the North Pacific Fishery Management Council should take up the issue rather 
than Congress. Do you believe that if the Council took up FLCC’s proposal, it would 
be  doing  so  contrary  to  current  law?  Would  Fishing  Company  of  Alaska  take  legal 
action to challenge such an action by the Council? Isn’t this an argument that legis-
lation  from  Congress  would  be  the  most  clear-cut  way  to  implement  a  cooperative? 
Answer.  If  the  Council  undertook  the  task  of  devising  a  cooperative  program  for 
the  freezer  longline  sector,  it  would  likely  follow  in  the  footsteps  of  prior  such  pro-
grams, like Amendment 80 for the head-and-gut sector. If past is prologue (particu-
larly in light of the new requirements contained in the Magnuson-Stevens Reauthor-
ization  Act),  the  Council  would  allocate  fish  on  an  individual  vessel  basis  using  a 
qualification  period  consistent  with  the  new  limited  access  privilege  program  re-
quirements  established  by  the  Act  as  amended  in  authorizing  the  formation  of  co-
operatives. Such an action would likely address sideboards, excessive use and exces-
sive  share  issues,  as  well  as  monitoring  and  enforcement.  What  has  been  proposed 
does  not  nearly  come  close  to  addressing  all  the  details  that  need  to  be  addressed; 
nor  does  FCA  believe  the  proposal  in  substance  complies  with  the  amended  MSA’s 
substantive  requirements  for  LAPPs.  Accordingly,  Congress  legislating  FLC’s  pro-
posal  would  only  be  a  ‘‘clear-cut  way’’  to  avoid  the  new  Reauthorization  Act  stand-
ards  for  co-operatives  and  to  avoid  subjecting  the  FLC’s  proposed  allocations  to  de-
bate,  deliberation,  and  scrutiny  in  light  of  precedent  at  the  North  Pacific  Council. 
However,  if  the  AFA  provides  any  experience,  legislation  such  as  the  FLC  seeks 
would  still  require  the  Council  to  develop  the  ancillary  but  important  implementa-
tion details for the program. 

Question  14.  The  FLCC  membership  agreement  signed  by  all  participants  except 
Fishing  Company  of  Alaska  has  a  threshold  of  75  percent  required  to  dissolve  the 
agreement. Yet, you stated that ‘‘if the parties in this typically fractious sector were 
to dissolve the cooperative, the sector would revert to the status quo and the legisla-
tion would have accomplished nothing.’’ Wouldn’t it take a significant supermajority 
of  parties  wanting  to  dissolve  the  cooperative  agreement  for  cooperative  legislation 
to  ‘‘have  accomplished  nothing?’’  Do  you  have  any  specific  reasons  to  believe  that 
the FLCC cooperative agreement will fail and be dissolved? 

Answer. This question raises an issue similar to that addressed above in response 
to  question  5.  In  sum,  because  the  proposal  does  not  purport  to  fully  allocate  the 
fishery, if the cooperative were to dissolve or its membership base were to erode for 
any  number  of  reasons,  the  result  would  be  a  return  to  a  race  for  fish  in  the  com-
mon  pool.  Neither  we  nor  anyone  else  can  predict  the  future,  but  this  does  not 
change the underlying point. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

81 

Question 15. You stated a belief that the FLCC proposal is flawed because it does 
not fully allocate Pacific cod among all sector participants. Isn’t the point of forming 
a  fishery  cooperative  to  allow  the  sector  to  allocate  fish  through  collective  agree-
ment, rather than forcing the government to get involved and decide who gets what? 
Does  this  statement  mean  that  Fishing  Company  of  Alaska  is  fundamentally  op-
posed  to  cooperatives  no  matter  what  the  conditions,  and  would  only  accept  indi-
vidual fishing quotas? If so, why is FCA fundamentally opposed to cooperatives? 

Answer. The MSA lays out specific criteria for fishery allocations, including estab-
lishment  of  criteria  to  govern  intra-cooperative  allocations—vessel  use  limitations, 
for example—to achieve important public policy objectives such as protecting fishing 
communities  and  participants.  At  the  end  of  the  day,  the  government  has  a  role  in 
this process because this issue involves a public resource. 

FCA is not inalterably opposed to cooperatives. It has formed a cooperative under 

the Rockfish Pilot Program. 

Question 16. In your written testimony you stated that Fishing Company of Alas-
ka could potentially support an individual fishing quota ‘‘with authorization to form 
a  cooperative,’’  and  point  to  the  BSAI  groundfish  fishery  as  an  example  of  such  a 
system.  Doesn’t  the  FLCC  proposal  mirror  the  BSAI  groundfish  plan  by  allowing  a 
co-op  (or  in  the  case  of  that  fishery,  allowing  up  to  3  co-ops)  but  also  allowing  a 
race for fish for those who do not wish to participate in a cooperative? Has Fishing 
Company  of  Alaska  engaged  in  legal  challenges  against  Amendment  80  and  the 
BSAI groundfish plan? Isn’t Fishing Company of Alaska still ‘‘racing’’ for fish in the 
BSAI groundfish plan because it has refused to enter into that sector’s cooperative? 
Answer.  The  FLC’s  proposal  is  fundamentally  different  from  the  Amendment  80 
program alluded to in the question. Under Amendment 80, each vessel has an indi-
vidual  allocation  that  can  be  moved  into  or  out  of  a  cooperative  structure,  and  the 
current  rules  provide  for  the  formation  of  up  to  three  cooperatives  on  an  annual 
basis.  However,  all  vessels  and  entities  currently  qualified  for  and  participating  in 
the sector, save for FCA and one other vessel, have formed a single cooperative. 

Under Amendment 80s implementing regulations as currently drafted, because all 
entities,  save  two,  have  formed  a  cooperative,  FCA  is  precluded  by  the  rules  from 
forming a second cooperative. It takes nine permits and three legal entities to form 
a  cooperative—FCA  has  five  qualified  vessels  and  a  qualified  permit,  belonging  to 
the  Alaska  Ranger,  so  there  are  only  a  total  of  seven  permits  and  two  entities  re-
maining, a number insufficient to form a second cooperative. 

These  limitations  on  cooperative  formation  form  the  central  claim  in  FCA’s  chal-
lenge  to  Amendment  80.  One  has  only  30  days  to  file  a  judicial  challenge  to  any 
regulations  promulgated  under  the  MSA  or  forever  forfeit  the  right  to  do  so.  16 
U.S.C.  § 1855(f)(1).  However,  although  FCA  filed  suit  to  preserve  that  right,  it  has 
stayed  the  litigation—currently  through  December  2008—and  is  working  with  the 
North  Pacific  Council  and  NMFS  to  try  to  resolve  the  issues  through  regulatory 
channels. Currently, a rulemaking process is underway that has the potential to set-
tle  most  if  not  all  issues  in  dispute.  FCA  is  hopeful  that  this  process  will  result  in 
a satisfactory resolution of all issues. 

Question  17.  Is  Fishing  Company  of  Alaska  currently  challenging  any  other  fish-
ing  cooperatives  or  fishery  rationalizations?  If  so,  please  describe  the  company’s 
legal  challenges  and  how  they  relate  to  your  assertions  on  the  formation  of  a  co- 
op in the freezer longline subsector. 

Answer. Other than the stayed litigation described above, no. There is no relation-

ship between the Amendment 80 issues and the freezer longline issues. 

Question  18.  What  is  Fishing  Company  of  Alaska’s  reason  for  proposing  an  IFQ 
system but refusing to enter into a cooperative? Does the company believe it would 
be  allocated  more  fish  under  an  IFQ  system  than  under  the  proposed  cooperative 
agreement?  Is  part  of  the  company’s  reason  because  it  only  wants  to  release  catch 
information to the government and not to other private parties? What does Fishing 
Company of Alaska see as the differences that make an IFQ system acceptable and 
a cooperative unacceptable? 

Answer. To be clear, FCA’s preference is not for a legislated fishery management 
scheme  for  this  sector.  However,  it  is  willing  to  consider  an  IFQ  program  for  this 
fishery,  which  would  achieve  the  benefits  being  identified  for  cooperatives  without 
forcing  unwilling  parties  to  necessarily  enter  into  business  relationships.  As  ex-
plained  above,  FCA’s  support  for  an  IFQ  program  is  conditioned  upon  application 
of  a  fair,  equitable,  and  legally  compliant  allocation  formula  that  does  not  work  at 
cross-purposes with years of efforts by the North Pacific Council and NMFS to limit 
capitalization of this sector. And, which, of course, gives full credit to the historical 
participants. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

82 

Question  19.  Wouldn’t  an  IFQ  system  place  the  burden  on  the  government  to 
make  allocation  decisions,  regulate  and  monitor  the  fishery,  and  enforce  quotas? 
Why  should  Congress  choose  to  keep  that  burden  on  the  government  when  we  can 
allow  the  formation  of  a  cooperative  that  will  largely  allocate,  monitor,  and  enforce 
its own agreement? 

Answer.  If  Congress  chooses  to  act  on  FLC’s  request,  the  Government  would  still 
be assuming the burdens of making allocative choices. It would just be the Congress 
making  these  choices—and  not  NMFS  and  the  Council  acting  subject  to  the  reau-
thorized  Magnuson-  Stevens  Act  standards.  Moreover,  NMFS  already  has  the  re-
sponsibility  to  monitor  and  enforce  allocations,  something  that  would  not  change 
with cooperative management. In the end, this is a public resource that is fully uti-
lized by many different sectors of the North Pacific fishing community, and as such, 
the government retains ultimate responsibility for sustainably managing and moni-
toring the fishery. 

Question  20.  Does  Fishing  Company  of  Alaska  support  allowing  vessel  replace-

ment in the pollock catcher processor fleet and the head & gut fleet? 

Answer. Yes. 

FREEZER LONGLINE COALITION’S RESPONSE TO DAVID FRULLA’S TESTIMONY [Freezer 
Longline  Coalition  submitted  comments  on  Mr.  Frulla’s  testimony,  herein.  Mr. 
Frulla’s  testimony  is  reprinted  here  with  Freezer  Longline  Coalition’s  comments 
in italics.] 

My  name  is  David  E.  Frulla.  I  am  a  partner  in  Kelley  Drye  &  Warren,  LLP,  in 
Washington,  D.C.  Since  2006,  we  have  served  as  counsel  to  The  Fishing  Company 
of  Alaska,  Inc.  (‘‘FCA’’)  with  respect  to  certain  matters  pending  before  the  U.S.  De-
partment  of  Commerce,  the  North  Pacific  Fishery  Management  Council,  and  the 
Congress. I would like to thank Chairwoman Cantwell on behalf of FCA for extend-
ing  this  opportunity  to  provide  testimony  on  rationalization  in  the  North  Pacific 
freezer longline fishery for Pacific cod. FCA was a pioneer in developing the Pacific 
cod  freezer  longline  fishery  in  the  1980s.  This  testimony  will  touch  first  upon  con-
cerns  that  FCA  has  with  the  private  cooperative  proposal  put  forth  by  some  mem-
bers  of  the  Freezer  Longline  Conservation  Cooperative  (‘‘FLCC’’).  Next,  I  will  set 
forth  in  general  terms  an  alternative  that  better  fits  the  legal  requirements  under 
the  Magnuson-Stevens  Fishery  Conservation  and  Management  Act  (‘‘MSA’’)  and  is 
consistent  with  recent  rationalization  programs  authorized  by  Congress  and  the 
North  Pacific  Fishery  Management  Council.  Finally,  this  testimony  will  touch  on 
issues related to vessel replacement and vessel safety. 
I.  FCA’s  Position  on  the  Legislative  Proposal  for  a  Pacific  Cod  Freezer 

Longline Cooperative 

Some  FLCC  members  arc  seeking  congressional  authorization  for  the  formation 
of a freezer longline cooperative to harvest Bering Sea/Aleutian Island (‘‘BSAI’’) Pa-
cific cod. The proposal would allow for formation of this cooperative upon agreement 
by eighty percent of the sector participants. Any vessels not choosing to participate 
in  the  cooperative  would  be  allocated  the  percentage  of  the  total  cod  quota  landed 
by  those  vessels,  on  average,  for  the  years  2003  to  2005.  However,  such  allocation 
is  not  exclusive  to  the  non-participating  vessels,  but  would  be  placed  in  a  common 
pool subject to a ‘‘race-for-fish.’’ The FLCC proposal does not purport to allocate Pa-
cific cod beyond this split between the cooperative and ‘‘open access’’ components of 
the  sector,  such  as  on  an  individual  vessel  basis,  and  does  not  allow  for  the  forma-
tion  of  other  cooperatives.  Accordingly,  it  is  an  incomplete  solution  to  the  safety 
issues about which this hearing is concerned. 

1.  All  of  the  freezer  longline  fleet,  with  the  exception  of  the  two  FCA  vessels  (34 
of 36 vessel owners) are the ‘‘some’’ Mr. Frulla references. 
2. As all other members have signed the FLCC membership agreement the ‘‘com-
mon  pool  subject  to  a  race  for  fish’’  would  be  a  race  for  fish  between  FCA’s  two 
vessels. They alone have the control to end this by signing our membership agree-
ment. 

The  terms  of  the  legislative  proposal  (as  we  understand  it)  are,  of  course,  a  bit 
of a formality as more than eighty percent of the sector participants have negotiated 
an  agreement  that  could  be  implemented  upon  passage.  FCA  has  participated  in 
these  discussions,  but  has  objected  to  the  terms  offered,  particularly  the  awarding 
of  significant  amounts  of  the  cooperative  share  to  new  and  recent  entrants.  FCA 
also  objects  to  the  proposal’s  use  of  2003  to  2005  as  the  baseline  for  determining 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

83 

the  split  between  the  cooperative  and  ‘‘open  access’’  components  of  the  sector.  In 
sum,  while  rationalization  of  a  sector  may  have  a  salutary  impact  on  vessel  safety, 
the imperative to increase safety should not be used as an excuse to drive an unfair 
allocation. 

1.  On  Mr.  Frulla’s  comments  that  ‘‘FCA  participated  in  these  discussions,  but 
has  objected  to  the  terms  offered.’’  The  terms  offered  in  Our  membership  agree-
ment  has  FCA’s  two  vessels  at  #  4  and  #  6  out  of  36  vessels  with  #1  being  the 
highest  vessel  in  percentage  and  #36  being  the  lowest.  FCA  has  two  of  the  top 
six spots in the agreement and yet is using the process and the position of being 
the  lone  holdout  to  push  for  more.  FCA  would  seemingly  riot  be  happy  unless 
their vessels were #1 and # 2, and even then we feel they may have issues. 
2.  On  Mr.  Frulla’s  comments  that  ‘‘the  imperative  to  increase  safety  should  not 
be used as an excuse to drive an unfair allocation.’’ The allocation in this legisla-
tive  proposal  is  more  than  fair,  evidenced  by  the  fact  that  the  FCA  vessels  will 
be  allocated  far  more  that  they  are  now  catching.  Dr.  Jack  Tagart  with  Tagart 
Consulting,  in  an  independent  assessment,  estimates  FCA’s  two  vessels  are  cur-
rently  taking  less  than  5  percent.  The  legislation  and  the  years  2003–2005  are 
estimated  to  give  FCA  6.6  percent,  a  substantial  increase.  While  several  compa-
nies are catching more fish than they will receive in the membership agreement, 
they  (vessels  currently  catching  more  fish)  are  willing  to  do  this  for  the  benefits 
a  cooperative  fishery  allows.  Safety  is  a  major  concern  for  our  fleet  as  are  all 
the  major  benefits  of  ending  the  race  for  fish  in  our  sector.  Mr.  Frulla’s  com-
ments  that  we  are  using  safety  as  an  excuse  to  drive  an  unfair  allocation  are 
both inaccurate and offensive. 

A.  The  Truncated  Allocation  Period  is  Inconsistent  with  Law  and  Recent  Allocation 

Programs 

First, the legislative proposal’s use of such a brief and recent qualification period, 
2003-  05,  is  inconsistent  with  allocative  decisions  by  both  Congress  and  the  North 
Pacific  Fishery  Management  Council.  For  instance,  when  allocating  cod  among  sec-
tors in Amendment 85 to the BSAI groundfish plan, that Council considered a range 
of years from 1995 to 2003, ultimately choosing allocations falling within this range. 
Currently,  the  Council  is  considering  1995  to  2005  (best  5  or  7  years)  as  the  basis 
for allocating Gulf of Alaska cod. Likewise, when Congress established the Rockfish 
Pilot Program in 2004, it chose 1996 to 2002, best 5 years, as the qualifying period. 
Similar ranges were utilized in Amendment 80 to the BSAI groundfish plan and the 
Bering  Sea  crab  rationalization  plan.  In  fact,  FLCC  itself  used  a  5-year  period  to 
justify the amount of capacity purchased for the $35 million freezer-longline Capac-
ity  Reduction  Program  authorized  by  Congress  in  section  219  of  the  Consolidated 
Appropriations Act of 2005. 

Throwing  out  all  of  these  sets  of  years  used  in  a  wide  variety  of  fisheries  pro-
grams  is  really  just  a  lightly  veiled  attempt  by  FCA  and  their  attorney  Mr. 
Frulla  to  strong-arm  and  manipulate  the  process  into  a  more  advantageous  cir-
cumstance  for  FCA  than  the  entire  rest  of  the  parties  have  already  settled  on. 
1. In all of our negotiations we (including the FCA representatives present at our 
meetings and negotiations) considered a range of years including 1995–2005 and 
many different sub-sets of years in that range. After much negotiation, we settled 
on  more  recent  years  in  that  range.  Our  primary  purpose  during  these  negotia-
tions was to form a 100 percent cooperative. The fact that 34 of 36 vessel owners 
agreed with using more recent years is evidence that we chose the correct method 
for our group at that time. 
2.  Congress  used  3  years  (1995–1997)  in  the  American  Fisheries  Act  (AFA).  Of 
all of the cooperatives in the North Pacific, this most matches the size and make 
up of our fleet. 
3. Amendment 85 is a ‘‘sector allocation’’ not a fisheries cooperative. Also the ‘‘al-
locating  of  Gulf  of  Alaska  cod’’  mentioned  in  Mr.  Frulla’s  testimony  is  also  a 
‘‘sector  allocation’’  and  not  a  fisheries  cooperative.  Adding  these  into  the  argu-
ment is just simply more mud for the waters. 

More inclusive timeframes are consistent with the MSA, which requires a council 
to  take  into  consideration  ‘‘historical  fishing  practices  in,  and  dependence  on,  the 
fishery’’  when  developing  a  limited  access  system.  16  U.S.C.  § 1853(b)(6)(B).  Like-
wise,  the  new  standards  contained  in  the  MSA  Reauthorization  Act  governing  lim-
ited  access  privilege  programs  require  consideration  of  both  ‘‘current  and  historic 
harvests.’’  Id.  § 1853a(c)(5).  By  comparison,  the  qualifying  period  recommended  by 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

84 

FLCC is not only an outlier with respect to other Council plans and recent statutory 
allocations, it entirely omits consideration of historical participation. 

On  Mr.  Frulla’s  claims  that  our  recommended  qualifying  period  ‘‘entirely  omits 
consideration of historical participation″, this is far from the truth. 
1. The requirements of MSA and MSA reauthorization to ‘‘consider both current 
and historical harvests’’ are exactly what led our groups’ negotiations. Ultimately 
after considering the widest range of years that data was available (1995–2005), 
we  settled  on  recent  years  as  the  best  years  to  use,  as  these  best  reflected  the 
recency  and  dependency  requirements  of  MSA.  Current  and  historic  harvest  in-
formation  was  provided  by  an  outside  fishery  statistician  at  all  of  our  negotia-
tions and this information was presented and considered by all participants, in-
cluding the FCA representatives present at the meetings. 

Congress  correctly  instituted  a  policy  of  honoring  historical  catches  to  avoid  re-
warding  speculative  entry  into  fully  utilized  fisheries,  like  that  for  Pacific  cod.  In-
deed,  there  have  been  five  new  entrants  into  this  sector  this  decade  (although  two 
of  these  new  vessels  were  just  bought  out  in  the  buyback  program),  even  as  cod 
TACs  have  been  steady  or  declining  relative  to  1990  levels.  This  recent  capitaliza-
tion,  which  FCA  understands  is  continuing,  runs  counter  to  efforts  by  the  Council 
and Congress to reduce capacity in this sector and others in the North Pacific. 

100 percent of the vessels in our fleet have entered into the fleet legally and fair-
ly. 
1. In 1995 the council passed a vessel moratorium and under A. 39 created LLP 
(Limited License Program) licenses, thus limiting the number of vessels qualified 
to  participated  in  the  groundfish  fishery.  In  2001,  A.  67  issued  Pacific  cod  en-
dorsements  on  each  participants  LLP,  thus  limiting  the  number  of  Hook  and 
Line vessels qualified to fish Pacific cod in the Bering Sea and Aleutian Islands. 
The current size of the fleet at 36 vessels is a direct result of these actions. Some 
vessels have been retired and their LLP’s and cod endorsements were transferred 
to the new or replacement vessels. 

B. The FLCC Proposal Undermines Capacity Reduction Efforts 

The pre-existing Pacific cod freezer longliner capacity control policy is reflected in 
the North Pacific Council’s 1995 vessel moratorium, and its institution of the license 
limitation  program  (‘‘LLP’’),  which  became  effective  in  2000.  Further,  in  2002, 
Amendment 67 to the BSAI groundfish plan was adopted to stabilize the Pacific cod 
fisheries  by  creating  gear  endorsements  designed  to  define  the  universe  of  eligible 
vessels. 67 Fed. Reg. 18129 (Apr. 15, 2002). To qualify for the freezer longline sector, 
a  vessel  must  have  had  a  catcher-processor  endorsed  LLP  groundfish  license  and 
harvested at least 270 tons of Pacific cod in at least 1 year between 1996–1999, in-
clusive, on the vessel that gave rise to the LLP. 

Yet,  as  explained  above,  despite  the  moratorium  and  LLP  program,  a  total  of  5 
new  vessels  entered  the  fleet  as  full-time  participants  between  2000  and  2006,  in-
cluding  the  new-built  Bering  Leader.  Although  it  is  not  clear  how  these  vessels  be-
came  qualified,  it  is  likely  that  they  are  using  LLPs  that  arose  from  one  of  the  ten 
vessels  that  fished  only  1  year  during  the  qualification  period  (five  of  which  only 
fished in 1996). 

The comment in paragraph two above ‘‘Although it is not clear how these vessels 
became qualified’’ is again mud in the water. 
1.  Mr.  Frulla  explains  in  the  above  paragraph  exactly  how  these  vessels  became 
qualified. They qualified like everyone else, including FCA’s two vessels—by hav-
ing sufficient landings in the control years to allow a qualified LLP and Pacific 
Cod  endorsement  to  be  issued.  The  Council’s  decision  to  have  a  small  landing 
threshold, and a one-year qualifying period, was by design to be inclusive, rather 
than  exclusive,  and  include  nearly  all  who  were  participating  in  the  fishery  at 
the  time.  The  goal  here  was  to  prevent  a  massive  overcapacity  that  would  have 
resulted if the Council had not taken action. 

During  this  post-LLP  timeframe,  Congress  also  became  concerned  with  the 
amount  of  capacity  in  this  (and  other)  BSA’s  groundfish  sectors,  and  so  authorized 
a publicly subsidized buyback program in 2005 (Section 219 of the Consolidated Ap-
propriations  Act  of  2005).  To  date,  the  freezer  longline  sector  is  the  only  sector  to 
have  proposed  and  consummated  a  buyback  under  the  capacity  reduction  program. 
This history is relevant to FCA’s main concerns with the FLCC proposal. For one, 
all  problems  relating  to  excess  capacity  in  this  sector,  which  cooperative  legislation 
is supposed to address, are entirely of the sector’s own making. Although the Coun-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

85 

cil at least attempted a good first few steps in moderating capacity, what happened 
in  fact  was  that  part-time  and  sporadically  used  LLPs  (which  only  had  to  land  270 
metric  tons  in  one  year  for  a  cod  endorsement)  were  placed  on  new,  full-time  ves-
sels, most now catching between 2,000 and 3,000 metric tons per year. Nor has the 
buyback  been  particularly  effective  in  reducing  capacity.  The  buyback,  as  privately 
administered by the proponents of this legislative cooperative, only purchased three 
vessels  and  an  unaffiliated  permit  for  $35  million;  however,  two  of  the  vessels  pur-
chased were new vessels that began fishing in 2000 and 2001. All this new capital-
ization  has  had  the  effect  of  eroding  FCA’s  recent  overall  share  of  the  Pacific  cod 
catch. 

Excess Capacity is only a small element of the need for a cooperative fishery. 
1.  The  members  of  the  Freezer  Longline  Coalition  are  proud  of  our  involvement 
in  the  fleet  buyback  program.  Overcapacity  is  nearly  always  the  result  of  non- 
cooperative fisheries that result in a ‘‘race for fish’’ Our group took an active role 
in  bringing  a  solution  to  the  overcapacity  problem  and  in  fact,  is  paying  back 
the buyback loan and currently is on pace to retire the loan early. 
2.  The  buyback  program  needed  a  75  percent  threshold  of  affirmative  votes  to 
move forward. All thirty four of the existing vessels in the Freezer Longline Coa-
lition  voted  in  the  affirmative  to  move  forward  with  the  buyback.  FCA  did  not 
vote in the buyback, nor did they comment in the public comment period allowed 
before the program was funded. 
3. The three vessels that were purchased in the buyback represented nearly 8 per-
cent of the recent catch. All of the members felt that this capacity and one latent 
permit  were  a  fair  purchase  considering  all  factors.  There  were  zero  ‘‘No’’  votes 
during  the  closing  of  the  buyback.  All  members  that  voted  agreed  this  was  fair 
market value. 
4.  The  Buyback  program  has  been  administered  by  National  Marine  Fisheries 
Service,  Financial  Services  Division.  The  entire  process  was  well  documented 
and conducted according to a strict, transparent process and FCA was included 
in all negotiations. 

The result has been far from the salutary effect Congress and the Council sought 
through  the  license  limitation  program  and  the  vessel  buyback.  Indeed,  the  desire 
to add capacity to the freezer longline sector continues. In fact, we understand that 
one  of  the  participants  in  the  buyback  has  attempted  to  use  buyback  funds  to  pur-
chase an otherwise non-qualified vessel and a currently unused freezer longline-en-
dorsed LLP to put new capacity back into the fishery. If this attempt were success-
ful,  then  this  buyback  will  have  repeated  the  failures  of  the  original  New  England 
groundfish buyback program, which the Government Accountability Office found has 
led to an increase in capacity, rather than the intended decrease. 

The  proposed  legislation  solves  this  problem  of  overcapacity.  The  situation  de-
scribed  above  only  exists  because  FCA  itself  refused  to  sell  a  latent  permit  it 
owns. This situation (A latent permit existing that could be used to add a vessel 
to  the  fleet)  continues  to  be  a  threat  that  only  FCA  controls.  However  with  this 
proposed  legislation  the  motivation  to  add  capacity  to  the  fleet  is  completely 
eliminated. 

This  history  is  relevant  to  the  qualification  period  being  advocated  by  FLCC  be-
cause  it  underscores  that  the  proposed  legislation  is  more  designed  to  garner  new 
entrants’  support  and  solidify  existing,  private  arrangements  among  the  members 
of FLCC, than it is to ensure equitable treatment of historical participants like FCA. 
Basing  allocations  on  fishing  patterns  in  2003–2005  locks  in  the  aberrations  that 
arose from the well-intentioned, but flawed LLP qualification program and rewards 
those  who  added  capacity  at  a  time  when  the  Council  and  Congress  were  trying  to 
stabilize  this  fishery  by  protecting  ‘‘long-time  participants.’’  67  Fed.  Reg.  at  18129. 
The  above  paragraph  comes  close  to  accusing  our  group  of  impropriety;  com-
ments  of  ‘‘private  arrangements  among  members’’  are  unfair,  in  poor  taste,  and 
offensive to our members. 
1. In prior testimony in this document (part B.) FCA claims that five new vessels 
have entered the fleet between 2000–2006, as pointed out earlier these vessels en-
tered  fairly  and  legally  as  did  all  the  vessels  in  the  fleet  including  the  two  FCA 
vessels.  Here  they  are  now  claiming  that  our  qualification  period  is  being  advo-
cated to garner support for these new entrants. This line of thinking defies com-
mon  thinking.  34  vessels  owners  are  in  favor  of  our  membership  agreement.  We 
chose  recent  years  to  reflect  current  participation  and  what  a  vessel  was  likely 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

86 

to catch if a race for fish were to continue. The accusation that a small number 
of new participants are in control of the rest of the group is ridiculous. 
2.  67  Fed.  Reg.  At  18129,  as  stated  above  is  the  final  action  for  A.  67  by  the 
Council  and  absolutely  was  successful  in  protecting  the  long-term  participants. 
Without  A.  67  many  more  vessels  would  have  poured  into  the  fishery.  We  have 
a  fixed  fleet  as  a  partial  result  of  Council  A.  67  and  this  allows  us  to  be  where 
we are today, ready and able to form a voluntary fishery cooperative. 

FLCC’s proposal is thus not only ill-advised as a matter of policy, but it is legally 
doubtful  as  well.  It  in  no  way  comports  with  existing  law,  which  is  geared  toward 
both  protecting  historical  participants  and  discouraging  speculative  entrants  in 
fully-utilized fisheries. 

This comment is just one more reason why we are seeking a legislative tool that 
will allow our group to form a voluntary fishery cooperative. 
1.  FCA  has  a  long  history  of  bringing  legal  action  against  any  Council  action 
they  do  not  agree  with.  They  have  filed  and  currently  have  lawsuits  on  both 
Council  A.  79  and  Council  A.  80.  The  Freezer  Longline  Coalition  could  easily 
spend the next 5 years in the Council process only to end up waiting on a lawsuit 
to be settled if the outcome was not in FCA’s favor. 
2.  The  Freezer  Longline  Coalition  believes  that  all  legal  hurdles  have  been  well 
cleared and welcomes legal scrutiny as this legislation goes forward. 

C. The Proposal Fails to Fully Allocate the Pacific Cod Fishery 

Aside  from  the  skewed  allocation  proposal,  the  FLCC  legislative  proposal  is 
flawed  in  that  it  does  not  fully  allocate  Pacific  cod  among  all  sector  participants, 
as  do  all  recent  rationalization  programs.  Rather,  the  proposed  legislation  merely 
seeks  to  establish  an  allocation  as  between  the  cooperative  that  it  authorizes  and 
those  vessels  which  do  not  choose  to  join  the  cooperative.  This  means  that  if  the 
parties  in  this  typically  fractious  sector  were  to  dissolve  the  cooperative,  the  sector 
would revert to the status quo and the legislation would have accomplished nothing. 
Under  a  typical  rationalization  program  involving  cooperatives,  such  as  Amend-
ment  80  to  the  BSAI  groundfish  plan,  allocations  are  made  to  individual  vessels, 
which can then either bring their allocation into a cooperative or into an open access 
pool. As the FLCC proposal does not purport to allocate fishing privileges on an in-
dividual  basis,  if  the  cooperative  were  to  fail,  the  sector  would  revert  to  a  race-for- 
fish.  The  former,  more  common,  approach  of  fully  allocating  a  fishery  and  allowing 
formation of cooperatives is a more rational and durable approach. 

The Membership Agreement signed by all participants besides FCA has a thresh-
old  of  75  percent  required  to  break  the  agreement.  It  is  our  firm  belief  that  the 
benefits  of  a  cooperative  fishery  far  outweigh  any  one  desire,  and  certainly  any 
possible desire by 75 percent of the group to break the agreement. 
1. Within the membership agreement our vessels are allocated catch on an indi-
vidual basis. 
2. Historically in other voluntary fisheries cooperatives such as the Pacific whit-
ing  co-op  and  the  Bering  Sea  pollock  cooperative  there  has  been  no  movement 
to  ‘‘break’’  the  co-op.  The  realized  benefits  are  just  too  great.  The  likelihood  that 
75 percent of the group will want to go back to the dangerous and highly ineffi-
cient methods of a race for fish are remote, at best. 

II. FCA’s Recommended Alternative 

Since  this  issue  was  initially  raised  before  Congress,  FCA  has  consistently  main-
tained  that  the  Council  is  the  appropriate  body  to  develop  fishery  management 
measures  such  as  the  one  FLCC  proposes.  It  has  become  apparent,  however,  that 
given  FLCC’s  persistence  and  the  Council’s  increasingly  heavy  workload,  it  would 
be constructive to offer an alternative that would meet the desire of the proponents 
of  rationalization  for  cooperative-style  management,  while  respecting  established 
legal standards for such a limited access privilege program. 

Therefore, FCA could agree to program structured either as an individual fishery 
quota  (‘‘IFQ’’),  with  authorization  to  form  a  cooperative,  or  a  program  structured 
along the lines of the Rockfish Pilot Program. Each program would allocate the sec-
tor’s  Pacific  cod  quota  to  individual  vessels  based  on  their  historical  catch.  The  lat-
ter  differs  from  an  IFQ  only  in  that  it  allows  any  two  or  more  vessels  to  form  a 
cooperative  or  to  join  their  allocation  with  others  in  a  common  pool  where  a  vessel 
is not guaranteed its individual allocation of fish. 

In  order  to  be  consistent  with  other  programs,  however,  the  qualification  years 
should  range  from  1995  to  2005.  This  would  both  respect  historical  participation, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

87 

as  well  as  respect  the  Council’s  and  Congress’s  intent  in  limiting  access  and  insti-
tuting  the  vessel  buyback  program.  To  use  just  recent  history,  as  FLCC  proposes, 
sends a counter-productive message that building up capacity in a speculative man-
ner can be rewarded. FCA would be pleased to work with staff to develop the details 
of such a program. 

This  alternative  is  just  another  way  to  give  FCA  more  quota  than  they  deserve 
and to give FCA a way to continue to operate without cooperating in any mean-
ingful way. FCA seems to give some credence to our approach of gaining the tool 
we  need  through  Congressional  legislation.  They  simply  want  a  better  deal  and 
feel they are in a position of power as the lone holdout. 
1.  The  members  of  the  Freezer  Longline  Cooperative  are  not  opposed  to  an  IFQ 
type  of  fishery.  The  benefits  of  lFQ  fisheries  are  identical  to  our  proposal.  How-
ever this is completely unnecessary in our situation. We already have a member-
ship  agreement  and  are  fully  ready,  with  very  little  additional  management  by 
government,  to  form  a  voluntary  cooperative.  A  voluntary  cooperative  is  far  less 
laborious for the Federal fisheries managers than an IFQ system. 

In  closing  the  Freezer  Longline  Coalition  is  asking  that  Congress  move  forward 
in  introducing  and  passing  legislation  that  will  give  us  the  tool  we  need  to  move 
forward  with  all  the  well  documented  benefits  of  a  fisheries  cooperative.  No  one 
company should be allowed to deter the remainder of the fleet from realizing a safer 
and much more efficient fleet. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:59 Apr 16, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\80369.TXT JACKIE

